




A SHOCKER ON 
SHOCK STREET 

Goosebumps - 35 
R.L. Stine 



1 


“This is creepy, Erin.” My friend Marty grabbed my sleeve. 

“Let go!” I whispered. “You’re hurting me!” 

Marty didn’t seem to hear. He stared straight ahead into the darkness, 
gripping my arm. 

“Marty, please—” I whispered. I shook my arm free. I was scared, too. But 
I didn’t want to admit it. 

It was darker than the darkest night. I squinted hard, trying to see. And then 
a gray light glowed dimly in front of us. 

Marty ducked low. Even in the foggy light, I could see the fear in his eyes. 

He grabbed my arm again. His mouth dropped open. I could hear him 
breathing hard and fast. 

Even though I was frightened, a smile crossed my face. I liked seeing Marty 
scared. 

I really enjoyed it. 

I know, I know. That’s terrible. I admit it. Erin Wright is a bad person. What 
kind of a friend am I? 

But Marty always brags that he is braver than me. And he is usually right. 
He usually is the brave one, and I’m the wimp. 

But not today. 

That’s why seeing Marty gasp in fright and grab my arm made me smile. 

The gray light ahead of us slowly grew brighter. I heard crunching sounds 
on both sides of us. Close behind me, someone coughed. But Marty and I didn’t 
turn around. We kept our eyes straight ahead. 

Waiting. Watching.... 

As I squinted into the gray light, a fence came into view. A long wooden 
fence, its paint faded and peeling. A hand-lettered sign appeared on the fence: 
DANGER. KEEP OUT. THIS MEANS YOU. 

Marty and I both gasped when we heard the scraping sounds. Soft at first. 
Then louder. Like giant claws scraping against the other side of the fence. 

I tried to swallow, but my mouth suddenly felt dry. I had the urge to run. 
Just turn and run as fast as I could. 

But I couldn’t leave Marty there all alone. And besides, if I ran away now, 



he would never let me forget it. He’d tease me about it forever. 

So I stayed beside him, listening as the scraping, clawing sounds turned into 
banging. Loud crashes. 

Was someone trying to break through the fence? 

We moved quickly along the fence. Faster, faster—until the tall, peeling 
fence pickets became a gray blur. 

But the sound followed us. Heavy footsteps on the other side of the fence. 

We stared straight ahead. We were on an empty street. A familiar street. 

Yes, we had been here before. 

The pavement was puddled with rainwater. The puddles glowed in the pale 
light from the streetlamps. 

I took a deep breath. Marty gripped my arm harder. Our mouths gaped 
open. 

To our horror, the fence began to shake. The whole street shook. The rain 
puddles splashed against the curb. 

The footsteps thundered closer. 

“Marty—!” I gasped in a choked whisper. 

Before I could say another word, the fence crumbled to the ground, and the 
monster came bursting out. 

It had a head like a wolf—snapping jaws of gleaming white teeth—and a 
body like a giant crab. It swung four huge claws in front of it, clicking them at us 
as its snout pulled open in a throaty growl. 

“NOOOOOOO!” Marty and I both let out howls of terror. 

We jumped to our feet. 

But there was nowhere to run. 



2 


We stood and stared as the wolf-crab crawled toward us. 

“Please sit down, kids,” a voice called out behind us. “I can’t see the 
screen.” 

“Ssshhhh!” someone else whispered. 

Marty and I glanced at each other. I guess we both felt like jerks. I know I 
did. We dropped back into our seats. 

And watched the wolf-crab scamper across the street, chasing after a little 
boy on a tricycle. 

“What’s your problem, Erin?” Marty whispered, shaking his head. “It’s 
only a movie. Why did you scream like that?” 

“You screamed too!” I replied sharply. 

“I only screamed because you screamed!” he insisted. 

“Sssshhh!” someone pleaded. I sank low in the seat. I heard crunching 
sounds all around me. People eating popcorn. Someone behind me coughed. 

On the screen, the wolf-crab reached out his big, red claws and grabbed the 
kid on the trike. SNAP. SNAP. Good-bye, kid. 

Some people in the theater laughed. It was pretty funny. 

That’s the great thing about the Shocker on Shock Street movies. They make 
you scream and laugh at the same time. 

Marty and I sat back and enjoyed the rest of the movie. We love scary 
movies, but the Shock Street films are our favorites. 

In the end, the police caught the wolf-crab. They boiled him in a big pot of 
water. Then they served steamed crab to the whole town. Everyone sat around 
dipping him in butter sauce. They all said he was delicious. 

It was the perfect ending. Marty and I clapped and cheered. Marty put two 
fingers in his mouth and whistled through his teeth the way he always does. 

We had just seen Shocker on Shock Street VI, and it was definitely the best 
one of the series. 

The theater lights came on. We turned up the aisle and started to make our 
way through the crowd. 

“Great special effects,” a man told his friend. 

“Special effects?” the friend replied. “I thought it was all real!” 



They both laughed. 

Marty bumped me hard from behind. He thinks it’s funny to try and knock 
me over. “Pretty good movie,” he said. 

I turned back to him. “Huh? Pretty good?” 

“Well, it wasn’t scary enough,” he replied. “Actually, it was kind of 
babyish. Shocker V was a lot scarier.” 

I rolled my eyes. “Marty, you screamed your head off—remember? You 
jumped out of your seat. You grabbed my arm and—” 

“I only did that because I saw how scared you were,” he said, grinning. 
What a liar! Why can’t he ever admit it when he’s scared? 

He stuck his sneaker out and tried to trip me. 

I dodged to the left, stumbled—and bumped hard into a young woman. 

“Hey—look out!” she cried. “You twins should be more careful.” 

“We’re not twins!” Marty and I cried in unison. 

We’re not even brother and sister. We’re not related in any way. But people 
always think that Marty and I are twins. 

I guess we do look a lot alike. We’re both twelve years old. And we’re both 
pretty short and kind of chubby. We both have round faces, short black hair, and 
blue eyes. And we both have little noses that sort of turn up. 

But we’re not twins! We’re only friends. 

I apologized to the woman. When I turned back to Marty, he stuck out his 
shoe and tried to trip me again. 

I stumbled, but quickly caught my balance. Then I stuck out my shoe—and 
tripped him. 

We kept tripping each other through the long lobby. People were staring at 
us, but we didn’t care. We were laughing too hard. 

“Do you know the coolest thing about this movie?” I asked. 

“No. What?” 

“That we’re the first kids in the world to see it!” I exclaimed. 

“Yeah!” Marty and I slapped each other a high five. 

We had just seen Shocker on Shock Street VI at a special sneak preview. My 
dad works with a lot of movie people, and he got us tickets for it. The others in 
the theater were all adults. Marty and I were the only kids. 

“Know what else was really cool?” I asked. “The monsters. All of them. 
They looked so incredibly real. It didn’t look like special effects at all.” 

Marty frowned. “Well, I thought the Electric Eel Woman was pretty phony- 



looking. She didn’t look like an eel—she looked like a big worm!” 

I laughed. “Then why did you jump out of your seat when she shot a bolt of 
electricity and fried that gang of teenagers?” 

“I didn’t jump,” Marty insisted. “You did!” 

“Did not! You jumped because it looked so real,” I insisted. “And I heard 
you choke when the Toxic Creep leaped out of the nuclear waste pit.” 

“I choked on a Milk Dud, that’s all.” 

“You were scared, Marty, because it was so real.” 

“Hey—what if they are real?!” Marty exclaimed. “What if it isn’t special 
effects? What if they’re all real monsters ?” 

“Don’t be dumb,” I said. 

We turned the corner into another hall. 

The wolf-crab stood waiting for me there. 

I didn’t even have time to scream. 

He opened his toothy jaws in a long wolf howl—and wrapped two giant red 
claws around my waist. 



3 


I opened my mouth to scream, but only a squeak came out. 

I heard people laughing. 

The big claws slid off my waist. Plastic claws. 

I saw two dark eyes staring out at me from behind the wolf mask. I should 
have known that it was a man in a costume. But I didn’t expect him to be 
standing there. 

I was surprised, that’s all. 

I blinked at a white flash of light. A man had just taken a picture of the 
creature. I saw a big red and yellow sign against the wall: SEE THE MOVIE— 
THEN PLAY THE GAME ON CD-ROM. 

“Sorry if I scared you,” the man inside the wolf-crab costume said softly. 

“She scares easily!” Marty declared. 

I gave Marty a hard shove, and we hurried away. I turned back to see the 
creature waving a claw at me. “We’ve got to go upstairs and see my dad,” I told 
Marty. 

“Tell me something I don’t know.” 

He thinks he’s so funny. 

Dad’s office is upstairs from the theater, on the twenty-ninth floor. We 
jogged to the elevators at the end of the hall and took one up. 

Dad has a really cool job. He builds theme parks. And he designs all kinds 
of rides. 

Dad was one of the designers of Prehistoric Park. That’s the big theme park 
where you go back to prehistoric times. It has all kinds of neat rides and shows 
—and dozens of huge dinosaur robots wandering around. 

And Dad worked on the Fantasy Films Studio Tour. Everyone who comes 
to Hollywood goes on that tour. 

Dad’s idea was the part where you walk through a huge movie screen and 
find yourself in a world of movie characters. You can star in any kind of movie 
you want to be in! 

I know it sounds as if I’m bragging, but Dad is really smart, and he’s an 
engineering genius! I think he is the world expert on robots. He can build robots 
that will do anything! And he uses them in all his parks and studio tours. 



Marty and I stepped off the elevator on the twenty-ninth floor. We waved to 
the woman at the front desk. Then we hurried to Dad’s office at the end of the 
hall. 

It looks more like a playroom than an office. It’s a big room. Huge, really. 
Filled with toys, and stuffed cartoon characters, movie posters, and models of 
monsters. 

Marty and I love to roam around the office, staring at all the neat stuff. On 
the walls, Dad has great posters from a dozen different movies. On a long table, 
he has a model of The Tumbler, the upside-down roller coaster he designed. The 
model has little cars that really screech around the tracks. 

And he has a lot of cool stuff from Shock Street —like one of the original 
furry paws that Wolf Girl wore in Nightmare on Shock Street. He keeps it in a 
glass case on the windowsill. 

He has models of tramcars and little trains and planes and rockets. Even a 
big, silver plastic blimp. It’s radio-controlled, and he can make it float round and 
around his office. 

What a great place! I always think of Dad’s office as the happiest place in 
the world. 

But today, as Marty and I stepped inside, Dad didn’t look too happy. He 
hunched over his desk with the telephone to his ear. His head was lowered, his 
eyes down. He kept a hand pressed against his forehead as he mumbled into the 
phone. 

Dad and I don’t look at all alike. I’m short and dark. He’s tall and thin. And 
he has blond hair, although there’s not much left of it. He’s pretty bald. 

He has the kind of skin that turns red easily. 

His cheeks get real pink when he talks. And he wears big, round glasses 
with dark frames that hide his brown eyes. 

Marty and I stopped at the doorway. I don’t think Dad saw us. He stared 
down at the desk. He had his tie pulled down and his shirt collar open. 

He muttered for a short while longer. Marty and I crept into the office. 

Finally, Dad set down the phone. He raised his eyes and saw us. “Oh, hi, 
you two,” he said softly. His cheeks turned bright pink. 

“Dad—what’s wrong?” I asked. 

He sighed. Then he pulled off his glasses and pinched the bridge of his 
nose. “I have very bad news, Erin. Very bad news.” 



4 


“Dad—what is it? What?” I cried. 

Then I saw the grin slowly spread across his face. I knew I’d been tricked 
again. 

“Gotcha!” he declared. His brown eyes flashed gleefully. His cheeks were 
bright pink. “Gotcha again. You fall for that gag every time.” 

“Dad—!” I let out an angry cry. Then I rushed up to the desk, wrapped my 
hands around his neck, and pretended to strangle him. 

We both collapsed against each other, laughing. Marty still stood in the 
doorway, shaking his head. “Mr. Wright, that is so lame,” he muttered. 

Dad struggled to slip his glasses back on. “I’m sorry. You kids are just too 
easy to fool. I couldn’t resist.” He smiled at me. “Actually, I’ve got good news.” 

“Good news? Is this another joke?” I demanded suspiciously. 

He shook his head. He picked up something from his desk. “Check this out, 
guys. Do you know what this is?” He held it in his palm. 

Marty and I came closer to examine it. It was a little, white plastic vehicle 
with four wheels. “Some kind of train car?” I guessed. 

“It’s a tramcar,” Dad explained. “See? People sit on long benches inside it. 
Here. It’s motor-driven.” He pointed to the front of the model to show where the 
engine went. “But do you know where this tramcar will be used?” 

“Dad, we give up. Just tell us,” I insisted impatiently. “Stop keeping us in 
suspense.” 

“Okay, okay.” His cheeks reddened. His smile grew wider. “This is a model 
of the tram that will be used at the Shocker Studio Tour.” 

My mouth dropped open. “Do you mean the tour is finally going to open?” 
I knew that Dad had been working on it for years. 

Dad nodded. “Yes. We’re finally about to open it to the public. But before 
we do, I want you two to test it out.” 

“Huh? You mean it?” I shrieked. I was so excited, I felt as if I’d burst out of 
my skin! 

I turned to Marty. He was leaping up and down, shooting both fists into the 
air. “Yes! Yes! Yes!” 

“I built this whole tour,” Dad said, “and I want you two to be the first kids 



in the world to go on it. I want to know your opinion. What you like and what 
you don’t like.” 

“Yes! Yes! Yes!” Marty kept leaping into the air. I thought I might have to 
tie a rope around his waist and hold onto it to keep him from floating away! 

“Dad—the Shock Street movies are the bestl” I cried. “This is awesome!” 
And then I added, “Is the tour very scary?” 

Dad rested a hand on my shoulder. “I hope so,” he replied. “I tried to make 
it as scary and real as I could. You get on the tram and you ride through the 
whole movie studio. You get to meet all of the characters from the horror 
movies. And then the tram takes you on a slow ride down Shock Street.” 

“The real Shock Street?” Marty cried. “Do you mean it? You get to ride 
down the real street where they make the movies?” 

Dad nodded. “Yes. The real Shock Street.” 

“Yes! Yes! Yes!” Marty started pumping his fists in the air again, shouting 
like a maniac. 

“Awesome!” I cried. “Totally awesome!” I was as excited as Marty. 

Suddenly Marty stopped leaping. His expression turned serious. “Maybe 
Erin shouldn’t go,” he told my dad. “She gets too scared.” 

“Huh?” I cried. 

“She was so scared during the movie sneak preview, I had to hold her 
hand,” Marty told Dad. 

What a liar! 

“Give me a break!” I cried angrily. “If anyone was a scaredy-cat wimp, it 
was you, Marty!” 

Dad raised both hands to signal halt. “Calm down, guys,” he said softly. 
“No arguing. You have to keep together. You know, you two will be the only 
ones on the tour tomorrow. The only ones.” 

“Yes!” Marty cheered happily. “Yes! Yes!” 

“Wow! That’s great!” I cried. “It’s totally great. It’s going to be the best!” 
Then I had an idea. “Can Mom come too? I bet she would really enjoy it.” 

“Excuse me?” Dad squinted at me through his glasses. His whole face 
turned bright red. “What did you say?” 

“I asked if Mom could come too,” I repeated. 

Dad kept staring at me for a long time, studying me. “Are you feeling okay, 
Erin?” he asked finally. 

“Yes. Fine,” I replied meekly. 



I suddenly felt very confused and upset. What had I done wrong? 
Was something wrong with Mom? 

Why was Dad staring at me like that? 



5 


Dad came around the desk and put an arm around my shoulder. “I think you and 
Marty will have a better time if you go by yourselves,” he said softly. “Don’t you 
agree?” 

I nodded. “Yeah. I guess.” 

I still wondered why he was staring at me so suspiciously. But I decided not 
to ask him. I didn’t want him to get angry or something and change his mind 
about us going on the tour. 

“Do you mean you’re not coming with us?” Marty asked Dad. “We’re 
really going by ourselves?” 

“I want you to go by yourselves,” Dad replied. “I think that will make it 
more exciting for you.” 

Marty grinned at me. “I hope it’s really scary!” he declared. 

“Don’t worry,” Dad replied. A strange smile spread over his face. “You 
won’t be disappointed.” 

The next afternoon, a gray haze hung in the air as Dad drove Marty and me 
to Shocker Studios. 

I sat up front with Dad, peering out the car window at the smog. “It’s so 
gloomy out,” I murmured. 

“Perfect for a horror movie tour,” Marty chimed in from the backseat. He 
was so excited, he could barely sit still. He kept bouncing his legs up and down 
and tapping his hands on the leather seat. 

I had never seen Marty so crazed. If he didn’t have his seat belt to hold him 
down, he’d probably bounce right out of the car! 

The car climbed up the Hollywood hills. The narrow road curved past 
redwood houses and tree-filled yards cut into the sides of the hills. 

As we climbed, the sky turned even darker. We’re driving up into a cloud of 
fog, I thought. Far in the distance, I could see the HOLLYWOOD sign, 
stretching in the haze across a dark peak. 

“Hope it doesn’t rain,” I muttered, watching the fog roll over the sign. 

Dad chuckled. “You know it never rains in Los Angeles!” 

“Which monsters are we going to see?” Marty asked, bouncing in the 
backseat. “Is Shockro on the tour? Do we really get to walk on Shock Street?” 



Dad squinted hard through his glasses, turning the wheel as the road curved 
and twisted. “I’m not telling,” he replied. “I don’t want to spoil it for you. I want 
it all to be a surprise.” 

“I just wanted to know so I could warn Erin,” Marty said. “I don’t want her 
to get too scared. She might faint or something.” He laughed. 

I let out an angry growl. Then I turned around and tried to punch him. But I 
couldn’t reach. 

Marty leaned forward and messed up my hair with both hands. “Get off 
me!” I screamed. “I’m warning you—!” 

“Take it easy, guys,” Dad said softly. “We’re here.” 

I turned and stared out the windshield. The road had flattened out. Up 
ahead, an enormous sign proclaimed SHOCKER STUDIOS in scary, blood-red 
letters. 

We drove slowly up to the huge iron gates in the front. The gates were 
closed. A guard in a small black booth sat reading a newspaper. I glimpsed gold 
script letters above the gate. They spelled out one word: BEWARE. 

Dad pulled right up to the gate, and the guard peered up. He gave Dad a big 
smile. Then he pressed a button, and the gates slowly swung open. Dad drove 
the car into the tall white parking garage beside the studio. He parked in the first 
space next to the entrance. The garage seemed to stretch on forever. But I could 
see only three or four other cars inside. 

“When we open next week, this garage will be jammed!” Dad said. “There 
will be thousands of people here. I hope.” 

“And today, we’re the only ones!” Marty cried excitedly, jumping out of the 
car. 

“We’re so lucky!” I agreed. 

A few minutes later, we were standing on the platform outside the main 
building, facing a wide street, waiting for the tram to take us on the tour. The 
street led to dozens of white studio buildings, spread out all the way down the 
hill. 

Dad pointed to two enormous buildings as big as airplane hangars. “Those 
are the soundstages,” he explained. “They film a lot of movie scenes inside those 
buildings.” 

“Does the tour go inside them?” Marty demanded. “Where is Shock Street? 
Where are the monsters? Are they making a movie now? Can we watch them 
making it?” 



“Whoa!” Dad cried. He placed his hands on Marty’s shoulders as if to keep 
him from flying off the ground. I had never seen Marty so totally wired! “Take it 
easy, fella,” Dad warned. “You’ll blow a fuse! You won’t survive the tour!” 

I shook my head. “Maybe we should put him on a leash,” I told Dad. 

“Arf, arf!” Marty barked. Then he snapped his teeth at me, trying to bite 
me. 

I shivered. The fog rolled in from the hills. The air felt damp and cold. The 
sky darkened. 

Two men in business suits came zooming along the street in a golf cart. 
They were both talking at once. One of them waved to Dad. 

“Can we ride in one of those carts?” Marty asked. “Can Erin and I each 
have our own cart?” 

“No way,” Dad told him. “You have to take the automated tram. And 
remember—stay in the tramcar. No matter what.” 

“You mean we can’t walk on Shock Street?” Marty whined. 

Dad shook his head. “Not allowed. You have to stay on the tram.” 

He turned to me. “I’ll be waiting for you here on the platform when you get 
back. I want a full report. I want to know what you like and what you don’t like. 
And don’t worry if things don’t work exactly right. There are still a few bugs to 
work out.” 

“Hey—here comes the tram!” Marty cried, hopping up and down and 
pointing. 

The tram came rolling silently around the corner. I counted six tramcars in 
all. They were shaped like roller-coaster cars, open on top—only much longer 
and wider. The cars were black. A grinning white skull was painted on the front 
of the first car. 

A young, red-haired woman wearing a black uniform was seated on the first 
bench in the front car. She waved to us as the tram rolled up to the platform. She 
was the only passenger. 

She hopped out as the tram stopped. “Hi, I’m Linda. I’m your tour guide.” 
She smiled at my dad. Her red hair fluttered in the wind. 

“Hello, Linda,” Dad said, smiling back at her. He gently shoved Marty and 
me forward. “Here are your first two victims.” 

Linda laughed and asked us our names. We told her. 

“Can we ride in front?” Marty asked eagerly. 

“Yes, of course,” Linda replied. “You can sit anywhere you want. This 



whole ride is just for you.” 

“All right!” Marty cried. He slapped me a high five. 

Dad laughed. “I think Marty is ready to begin,” he told Linda. 

Linda pushed her red hair out of her face. “You can start right away, guys. 
But first, there’s something I have to do.” 

She leaned over the tramcar and tugged out a black canvas bag. “This will 
only take a second, guys.” She pulled a red plastic gun from the bag. “This is a 
Shocker Stun Ray Blaster.” 

She gripped the plastic pistol tightly. It looked like something in a Star Trek 
movie. Her smile faded. Her green eyes narrowed. “Be careful with these 
blasters, guys. They can freeze a monster in its tracks from twenty feet.” 

She handed the blaster to me. Then she reached into her bag to get one for 
Marty. “Don’t fire them unless you have to.” She swallowed hard and bit her 
lower lip. “I sure hope you don’t have to.” 

I laughed. “You’re kidding—right? These are just toys—right?” 

She didn’t answer. She pulled another blaster from her bag and started to 
bring it to Marty. 

But she stumbled over a cord on the platform. “Ohh!” She let out a startled 
cry as the blaster went off in her hand. 

A loud buzz. A bright ray of yellow light. 

And Linda stood frozen on the platform. 



6 


“Linda! Linda!” I screamed. 

Marty’s mouth dropped open. He let out a choked gurgle. 

I turned to Dad. To my surprise, he was laughing. 

“Dad—she’s—she’s frozen!” I cried. But when I turned back to Linda, she 
had a big smile on her face, too. 

It took us both a while, but we soon realized the whole thing was a joke. 

“That’s the first shock on the Shocker tour,” Linda announced, lowering the 
red blaster. She put a hand on Marty’s shoulder. “I think I really shocked you, 
Marty!” 

“No way!” Marty insisted. “I knew it was a joke. I just played along.” 

“Come on, Marty!” I cried, rolling my eyes. “You nearly dropped your 
teeth!” 

“Erin, I wasn’t scared,” Marty insisted sharply. “Really. I just went along 
with the joke. Do you really think I’d fall for a dumb plastic blaster gun?” 

Marty is such a jerk. Why can’t he ever admit it when he’s scared? 

“Climb in, you two,” Dad urged. “Let’s get this show on the road.” 

Marty and I climbed into the front seat of the tram. I looked for a seat belt 
or a safety bar, but there wasn’t one. “Are you coming with us?” I asked Linda. 

She shook her head. “No. You’re on your own. The tram moves 
automatically.” She handed Marty his Stun Blaster. “Hope you don’t need it.” 

“Yeah. Sure,” Marty muttered, rolling his eyes. “This gun is so babyish.” 

“Remember—I’ll meet you back here at the end of the ride,” Dad said. He 
waved. “Enjoy it. I want a full report.” 

“Don’t get out of the tram,” Linda reminded us. “Keep your head and arms 
inside. And don’t stand up while the tram is moving.” 

She stepped on a blue button on the platform. The tram started up with a 
jolt. Marty and I were thrown back against the seat. Then the tram rolled 
smoothly forward. 

“First stop is The Haunted House of Horror!” Linda called after us. “Good 
luck!” 

I turned back to see her waving to us, her long red hair fluttering in the 
wind. A strong breeze blew against us as the tram made its way down the hill. 



The sky was nearly as dark as night. Some of the white studio buildings were 
hidden by the fog. 

“Stupid gun,” Marty muttered, rolling it around in his hands. “Why do we 
need this plastic gun? I hope the whole tour isn’t this babyish.” 

“I hope you don’t complain all afternoon,” I told him, frowning. “Do you 
realize how awesome this is? We’re going to see all the great creatures from the 
Shocker movies.” 

“Think we’ll see Shockro?” he asked. Shockro is his favorite. I guess 
because he’s so totally gross. 

“Probably,” I replied, my eyes on the low buildings we were passing. They 
all stood dark and empty. 

“I want to see Wolf Boy and Wolf Girl,” Marty said, counting the monsters 
off on his fingers. “And... the Piranha People, and Captain Sick, The Great 
Gopher Mutant, and—” 

“Wow! Look!” I cried, pounding his shoulder and pointing. 

As the tram turned a sharp corner, The Haunted House of Horror loomed 
darkly in front of us. The roof and its tall stone turrets were hidden by the fog. 
The rest of the mansion stood gray against the dusky sky. 

The tram took us nearer. Tall weeds choked the front lawn. The weeds bent 
and swayed in the wind. The gray shingles on the house were chipped and 
peeling. Pale green light, dim, eerie light, floated out from the tall window in 
front. 

As we rode closer, I could see a rusty iron porch swing—swinging by itself! 
—on a broken, rotting porch. 

“Cool!” I exclaimed. 

“It looks a lot smaller than in the movie,” Marty grumbled. 

“It’s exactly the same house!” I cried. 

“Then why does it look so much smaller?” he demanded. 

What a complainer. 

I turned away from him and studied The Haunted House. An iron fence 
surrounded the place. As we moved around to the side, the rusty gate swung 
open, squeaking and creaking. 

“Look!” I pointed to the dark windows on the second floor. The shutters all 
flew open at once, then banged shut again. 

Lights came on in the windows. Through the window shades, I could see 
the silhouettes of skeletons hanging, swinging slowly back and forth. 



“That’s kind of cool,” Marty said. “But not too scary.” He raised his plastic 
gun and pretended to shoot at the skeletons. 

We circled The Haunted House of Horrors once. We could hear screams of 
terror from inside. The shutters banged again and again. The porch swing 
continued to creak back and forth, back and forth, as if taken by a ghost. 

“Are we going inside or not?” Marty demanded impatiently. 

“Sit back and stop complaining,” I said sharply. “The ride just started. 
Don’t spoil it for me, okay?” 

He stuck his tongue out at me. But he settled back against the seat. We 
heard a long howl, and then a shrill scream of horror. 

The tram made its way silently to the back of the house. A gate swung open 
and we rolled through it. We moved quickly through the overgrown, weed- 
choked backyard. 

The tram picked up speed. We bounced over the lawn. Up to the back door. 
A wooden sign above the door read: ABANDON ALL HOPE. 

We’re going to crash right into the door! I thought. I ducked and raised my 
hands to shield myself. 

But the door creaked open, and we burst inside. 

The tram slowed. I lowered my hands and sat up. We were in a dark, dust- 
covered kitchen. An invisible ghost cackled, an evil laugh. Battered pots and 
pans covered the wall. As we passed, they clattered to the floor. 

The oven door opened and closed by itself. The teapot on the stove started 
to whistle. Dishes on the shelves rattled. The cackling grew louder. 

“This is pretty creepy,” I whispered. 

“Ooh. Thrills and chills!” Marty replied sarcastically. He crossed his arms 
in front of him. “Bor-ring!” 

“Marty—give me a break.” I shoved him away. “You can be a bad sport if 
you want. But don’t ruin it for me.” 

That seemed to get to him. He muttered, “Sorry,” and scooted back next to 
me. 

The tram moved out of the dark kitchen, into an even darker hallway. 
Paintings of goblins and ugly creatures hung on the hallway walls. 

As we approached a closet door, it sprang open—and a shrieking skeleton 
popped out in front of us, its jaws open, its arms jutting out to grab us. 

I screamed. Marty laughed. 

The skeleton snapped back into the closet. The tram turned a corner. I saw 



flickering light up ahead. 

We rode into a large, round room. “It’s the living room,” I whispered to 
Marty. I raised my eyes to the flickering light and saw a chandelier above our 
heads, with a dozen burning candles. 

The tram stopped beneath it. The chandelier began to shake. Then, with a 
hiss, the candles ah flickered out at once. 

The room plunged into darkness. 

Then a deep laugh echoed all around us. 

I gasped. 

“Welcome to my humble home!” a deep voice suddenly boomed. 

“Who is that?” I whispered to Marty. “Where is it coming from?” No reply. 
“Hey—Marty?” I turned to him. “Marty—?” He was gone. 



7 


“Marty?” 

My breath caught in my throat. I froze, staring into the darkness. 

Where did he go? I asked myself. He knows we aren’t supposed to leave the 
tramcar. Did he climb out? 

No. 

If he had, I would have heard him. 

“Marty?” 

Someone grabbed my arm. 

I heard a soft laugh. Marty’s laugh. 

“Hey—where are you? I can’t see you!” I cried. 

“I can’t see you, either,” he replied. “But I didn’t move. I’m still sitting 
right next to you.” 

“Huh?” I reached out and felt the sleeve of his shirt. 

“This is cool!” Marty declared. “I’m waving my arms, but I can’t see a 
thing. You really can’t see me?” 

“No,” I replied. “I thought—” 

“It’s some kind of trick with the lights,” he said. “Black light or something. 
Some kind of neat movie special effect.” 

“Well, it creeped me out,” I confessed. “I really thought you disappeared.” 

“Sucker,” he sneered. 

And then we both jumped. 

A fire suddenly blazed in the big brick fireplace. Bright orange light filled 
the room. A big black armchair spun around to reveal a grinning skeleton. 

The skeleton raised its bony yellowed head. The jaws moved. “I hope you 
like my house,” its voice boomed. “Becauseyou will never leave!” 

It tossed back its head and let out an evil cackle. 

The tram jolted to a start. We rumbled out of the living room. Into a long, 
dark hallway. The skeleton’s laugh followed us into the hall. 

I fell back against the seat as we picked up speed. 

We whirred around a corner. Down another long hall, so dark I couldn’t see 
the walls. 



Faster. Faster. 

We whipped around another corner. Made another sharp turn. 

We were climbing now. And then we took a sharp dip that made both of us 
throw up our hands and scream. 

Around another sharp turn. Up, up, up. And then we came crashing down. 

A wild roller-coaster ride in total darkness. 

It was awesome. Even better because we didn’t expect it. Marty and I 
screamed our heads off. We bumped hard against each other as the tram whirled 
around in the black halls of The Haunted House of Horrors. Up, up, again—then 
we tilted sharply down. 

I hung on to the front of the car for dear life. I gripped it so hard, both hands 
ached. There was no seat belt, no safety bar. 

What if we tumbled out? I wondered. 

The car tilted sharply sideways, as if reading my frightened thoughts. I let 
out a shriek and lost my grip. I slid against the side of the car. Marty fell on top 
of me. 

I frantically reached out for something to hold on to. 

The car tilted back rightside up. I took a deep breath, slid back into place on 
the long seat. 

“Whoa! That was excellent !” Marty cried, laughing. “Excellent!” 

Gripping the front of the car, I took another deep breath and held it. I was 
trying to slow my racing heart. 

A door swung open in front of us, and we burst through it. 

The car bounced hard. I saw trees. The gray-fogged sky. 

We were back outside. Racing through the backyard. Both of us were tossed 
from side to side as we roared over the weeds, zigzagging through the dark trees. 

“Whoa! Stop!” I choked out. I couldn’t catch my breath. The wind blew 
hard against my face. The tram clattered and squealed as we bumped over the 
rough ground. 

We were out of control. Something had definitely gone wrong with the 

tram. 

Bouncing hard on the plastic seat, holding on tightly, I searched for 
someone who could help us. 

No one in sight. 

We bumped onto the road. The tram started to slow. I turned to Marty. His 
hair was blown over his face. His mouth hung open. His eyes rolled around in 



his head. He was totally dazed. 

The tram slowed, slowed, slowed, until we were creeping smoothly along. 

“That was great]” Marty declared. He smoothed back his hair with both 
hands and grinned at me. I knew he had been scared, too. But he was pretending 
that he enjoyed the crazy, wild ride. 

“Yeah. Great.” I tried to pretend, too. But my voice came out weak and 
shaky. 

“I’m going to tell your dad that the roller-coaster ride through the halls was 
the best]” Marty declared. 

“It was kind of fun,” I agreed. “And kind of scary.” 

Marty turned away from me. “Hey. Where are we?” 

The tram had come to a stop. I pulled myself up and peered around. We had 
parked between two rows of tall evergreen bushes. The bushes were slender, 
shaped like spears reaching up to the sky. 

Above us, the afternoon sun was trying to break through the fog. Rays of 
pale light beamed down from the gray sky. The tall, thin shadows of the bushes 
fell over our tramcar. 

Marty stood up and turned to the back of the tram. “There’s nothing around 
here,” he said. “We’re in the middle of nowhere. Why did we stop?” 

“Do you think—?” I started. But I stopped talking when I saw the bush 
move. 

It wiggled. Then the bush next to it wiggled, too. 

“Marty—” I whispered, tugging his sleeve. I saw two glowing red circles 
behind the bush. Two glowing red eyes] 

“Marty—there’s someone there.” 

Another pair of eyes. And then another pair of eyes. Staring out at us from 
behind the evergreen bushes. 

And then two dark claws. 

And then rustling sounds. The bush tilted as a dark figure leaped out. 
Followed by another. 

Snarling, growling. 

I gasped. Too late to run. 

We were surrounded by the ugly creatures. Snuffling, wheezing creatures, 
who staggered out from the bushes. Reaching out, reaching out for us, they 
began to climb into the tram. 



8 


Marty and I jumped to our feet. 

“Ohhhhhh.” I heard Marty let out a frightened moan. 

I started to back away. I thought maybe I could scramble out the other side 
of the car. 

But the snarling, growling monsters came at us from both sides. 

“L-leave us alone!” I stammered. 

A monster covered in tangled brown fur opened his jaws to reveal long, 
jagged rows of yellow teeth. His hot breath exploded in my face. He stepped 
closer. Then he swiped at me with a fat paw and uttered a menacing roar. “Would 
you like an autograph?” he growled. 

I gaped at him, my mouth hanging down to my knees. “Huh?” 

“Autographed photo?” he asked. He raised his furry paw again. He held a 
black-and-white snapshot in it. 

“Hey—you’re Ape Face!” Marty cried, pointing. 

The hairy creature nodded his head. He raised the photo to Marty. “Want a 
photo? This is the autographing part of the tour.” 

“Yeah! Okay,” Marty replied. 

The big ape pulled a marker from behind his ear and bent to sign the photo 
for Marty. 

Now that my heartbeat was returning to normal, I began to recognize some 
of the other creatures. The guy covered in purple slime was The Toxic Wild 
Man. And I recognized Sweet Sue, the walking-talking baby doll with real hair 
you can brush. Sweet Sue was really a mutant murderer from Mars. 

The frog-faced guy covered from head to toe with purple and brown warts 
was The Fabulous Frog, also known as The Toadinator. He starred in Pond Scum 
and Pond Scum II, two of the scariest movies ever made. 

“Frog—can I have your autograph?” I asked. 

“Grrrbbit. Grrbit.” He croaked and slipped a pen into his wart-covered 
hand. I leaned forward eagerly and watched him sign his photo. It was hard for 
him to write. The pen kept slipping in his slimy frog hands. 

Marty and I collected a bunch of autographs. Then the creatures went 
snarling and wheezing back into the bushes. 



When they were gone, we both burst out laughing. “That was so dumb!” I 
cried. “When I saw them creeping out from behind the bushes, I thought I’d have 
a cow!” I glanced down at the photos. “But it’s kind of cool to get their 
autographs.” 

Marty made a disgusted face. “It’s just a bunch of actors in costumes,” he 
sneered. “It’s for babies.” 

“But—but—they looked so real,” I stammered. “It didn’t look as if they 
were wearing costumes—did it? I mean, The Toadinator’s hands were really 
slimy. And Ape Face’s fur was so real. The masks were awesome. I couldn’t tell 
they were masks.” 

I brushed the hair out of my eyes. “How do they get into those costumes? I 
didn’t see any buttons or zippers, or anything!” 

“That’s because they’re movie costumes,” Marty explained. “They’re better 
than regular costumes.” 

Mr. Know-It-All. 

The tram started to back out. I settled down into the seat. I watched the two 
rows of evergreen bushes fade into the distance. 

Down the long, sloping hill, I could see the white studio buildings. I 
wondered if they were making a movie on one of the soundstages. I wondered if 
the tram would take us to watch them shoot. 

I could see two golf carts moving along the road. 

They were carrying people down to the sound-stage buildings. 

The sun still struggled to shine through the fog. The tram bounced over the 
grass, up the hill. 

“Whoa!” I cried out as we turned sharply and headed back toward the trees. 

“Please remain in the car at all times.” A woman’s voice burst from a 
speaker in the tram car. “Your next stop will be The Cave of The Living Creeps.” 

“The Cave of The Living Creeps? Wow! That sounds scary!” Marty 
exclaimed. 

“Sure does!” I agreed. 

We had no idea just how scary it would turn out to be. 



9 


The tram zigzagged its way through the trees. Their shadows rolled over us like 
dark ghosts. 

We moved so silently. I tried to imagine what the ride would be like if the 
tram was packed with excited kids and adults. I decided it would be a lot less 
scary with a crowd. 

But I wasn’t complaining. Marty and I were really lucky to be the first kids 
ever to try out this ride. 

“Wow!” Marty grabbed my arm as The Cave of The Living Creeps loomed 
in front of us. The mouth of the cave was a huge dark hole, cut into the side of 
the hill. I could see pale, silvery light flickering past the entrance. 

The tram slowed down as we approached the dark opening. A sign above 
the entrance had one word carved roughly into it: FAREWELL. 

The tramcar lurched forward. “Hey—!” I cried out and ducked my head. 
What a tight squeeze! 

Into the dim, flickering light. 

The air instantly grew colder. And damp. A sour, earthy smell rose to my 
nostrils, making me gasp. 

“Bats!” Marty whispered. “What do you think, Erin? Think there are bats in 
here?” He leaned close and let out an evil laugh in my ear. 

Marty knows that I hate bats! 

I know, I know. Bats aren’t really evil creatures. And they aren’t dangerous. 
Bats eat mosquitoes and other insects. And they don’t attack people or get 
tangled in your hair or try to suck your blood. That’s only in movies. 

I know all that. But I don’t care. 

Bats are ugly and creepy and disgusting. And I hate them. 

One day, I told Marty how much I hate bats. And so he’s been teasing me 
about them ever since. 

The tram moved deeper into the cave. The air grew colder. The sour aroma 
nearly choked me. 

“Look—over there!” Marty screamed. “A vampire bat!” 

“Huh? Where?” I couldn’t help myself. I cried out in alarm. 

Of course it was one of Marty’s dumb jokes. He laughed like a maniac. 



I growled at him and punched him hard on the shoulder. “You’re not funny. 
You’re just dumb.” 

That made him giggle even harder. “I’ll bet there are bats in this cave,” he 
insisted. “You can’t go into a deep, dark cave like this one without seeing bats.” 

I turned away from his grinning face and listened hard. I was listening for 
fluttering bat wings. I didn’t hear any. 

The cave narrowed. The walls seemed to close in on us. The side of the car 
scraped against the dirt wall. I could feel that we were heading down. 

In the dim, silvery light, I saw a long row of pointy icicle-type things 
hanging down from the cave ceiling. I know they have a name, but I can never 
remember which one it is—stalagmites or stalactites. 

I ducked my head again as the tram shot under them. Up close, they looked 
like pointed elephant tusks. 

“We’re getting closer to the bats!” Marty teased. 

I ignored him. I kept my eyes straight ahead. The cave grew wide again. 
Dark shadows shifted and danced over the walls as we rolled past. 

“Ohhh.” I uttered a groan as I felt something cold and slimy drop onto the 
back of my neck. 

I jerked away and turned sharply to Marty. “Cut it out!” I snapped. “Get 
your cold hands off me!” 

“Who—me?” 

He wasn’t touching me. Both of his hands gripped the front of the car. 

Then what was on the back of my neck? So cold and wet. Icy wet. I 
shuddered. My whole body shook. 

“M-Marty!” I stammered. “H-help!” 

Marty stared at me, confused. “Erin—what’s your problem?” 

“The back of my neck—” I choked out. 

I could feel the cold, wet thing start to move. I decided not to wait for 
Marty to help me. 

I reached back and pulled it off. It felt sticky and cold between my fingers. 
It slithered and wriggled, and I dropped it on the seat. 

A worm! 

A huge, long white worm. So cold, so wet and cold. 

“Weird!” Marty exclaimed. He leaned close to examine it. “I’ve never seen 
a worm that big! And it’s white.” 

“It—it dropped from the ceiling,” I said, watching it wiggle next to me. 



“It’s ice-cold.” 

“Huh? Let me touch it,” Marty said. He raised his hand and slowly lowered 
his pointer finger to the worm. 

His finger poked the worm in its middle. 

And then Marty opened his mouth in a scream of horror that echoed 
through the cave. 



10 


“What is it? Marty—what’s wrong?” I shrieked. 

“I—I—I—” He couldn’t speak. He could only utter, “I—I—I—!” His eyes 
bulged. His tongue flopped out. 

He reached up and pulled a white worm off the top of his head. “I—I—I got 
one too!” 

“Yuck!” I cried. His worm was nearly as long as a shoelace! 

We both tossed our worms out of the tram. 

But then I felt a soft, damp plop on my shoulder. And then a cold plop on 
top of my head. Another on my forehead, like a cold slap. 

“Ohhh—help!” I moaned. I started thrashing my arms, grabbing at the 
worms, struggling to pull them off me. 

“Marty—please!” I turned to him for help. 

But he was battling them, too. Twisting and ducking. Trying to dodge, as 
more and more white worms fell from the ceiling. 

I saw one fall on his shoulder. I saw another one begin to wrap itself around 
his ear. 

As fast as I could, I pulled the sticky, wet creatures off me and tossed them 
over the side of the slow-rolling tram. 

Where are they coming from? I wondered. 

I glanced up—and a fat, wet one fell over my eyes. 

“Yeowwww!” I let out a shriek, grabbed it, flung it away. 

The tram turned sharply, sending us both sliding over the seat. The cave 
narrowed again as we entered a different tunnel. The silvery light glowed dimly 
around us as we bounced forward. 

Two white worms, each at least a foot long, wriggled across my lap. I 
tugged them off and heaved them over the tram. 

Breathing hard, I searched for more. My whole body itched. The back of 
my neck tingled. I couldn’t stop shaking. 

“They stopped falling,” Marty announced in a shaky voice. 

Then why did I still itch? 

I rubbed the back of my neck. Stood up and searched the seat, then the 
floor. I found one last worm, climbing over my shoe. I kicked it away, then 



dropped back onto the seat with a loud sigh. 

“That was totally gross!” I wailed. 

Marty scratched his chest, then rubbed his face with both hands. “I guess 
that’s why they call it The Cave of The Living Creeps,” he said. He swept a hand 
back through his black hair. 

I shivered. I couldn’t stop itching. I knew the worms were gone, but I could 
still feel them. “Those disgusting white worms—do you think they were alive?” 

Marty shook his head. “Of course not. They were fakes.” He snickered. “I 
guess they fooled you, huh?” 

“They sure felt real,” I replied. “And the way they wriggled around—” 

“They were robots or something,” Marty said, scratching his knees. 
“Everything here is fake. It has to be.” 

“I’m not so sure,” I said, my whole body still itchy and tingling. 

“Well, just ask your father,” Marty replied grumpily. 

I had to laugh. I knew why Marty was suddenly so grouchy. Whether the 
worms were real or fake, they had scared him. And he knew that I knew that he 
had been frightened. 

“I don’t think little kids will like the worms,” Marty said. “I think they’ll 
get too scared. I’m going to tell that to your dad.” 

I started to reply—and felt something drop over me. Something scratchy 
and dry. 

It covered my face, my shoulders—my entire body. 

I shot both hands up and tried to push it away. It’s some kind of a net, I 
thought. 

I grabbed at it, desperate to get it off my face. As I struggled, I turned and 
saw Marty squirming and batting his arms, caught under the same net. 

The tram bounced through the dim cave tunnel. The sticky net felt like 
cotton candy on my skin. 

Marty let out a yelp. “It—it’s a big spider-web!” he stammered. 

I tugged and grabbed and pulled. But the sticky threads clung to my face, 
my arms, and my clothes. “Yuck! This is so gross!” I choked out. 

And then I saw the black dots scurrying through the net. It took me a few 
seconds to realize what they were. Spiders! Hundreds of them! 

“Ohhhh.” A low moan escaped my throat. 

I batted the spiderweb with both hands. I rubbed my cheeks frantically, 
trying to scrape away the sticky threads. I pulled a spider off my forehead. 



Another one off the shoulder of my T-shirt. 

“The spiders—they’re in my hair!” Marty wailed. 

He suddenly forgot about acting cool. He began raking his hair with both 
hands, slapping himself in the head, pinching and swiping at the spiders. 

As the tram rolled silently on, we both twisted and squirmed, struggling to 
flick away the black spiders. I pulled three of them out of my hair. Then I felt 
one climb into my nose! 

I opened my mouth in a horrified scream—and sneezed it out. 

Marty plucked a spider off my neck and sent it soaring through the air. The 
last spider. I couldn’t see—or feel—any more. 

We both dropped down in the seat, breathing hard. My heart pounded in my 
chest. “Still think everything is a fake?” I asked Marty, my voice weak and 
small. 

“I—I don’t know,” he replied softly. “The spiders could be puppets maybe. 
You know. Radio-controlled.” 

“They were realV I cried sharply. “Face it, Marty—they were real! This is 
The Cave of The Living Creeps—and they were living !” 

Marty’s eyes grew wide. “You really think so?” 

I nodded. “They had to be real spiders.” 

A smile spread over Marty’s face. “That’s so coo/!” he declared. “Real 
spiders! That is totally cool!” 

I let out a long sigh and slumped lower in the seat. I didn’t think it was cool 
at all. I thought it was creepy and disgusting. 

These rides are supposed to be fake. That’s what makes them fun. I decided 
to tell my dad that the worms and spiders were too scary. He should get rid of 
them before the studio tour opens to the public. 

I crossed my arms in front of me and kept my eyes straight ahead. I 
wondered what we would mn into next. I hoped there weren’t any other 
disgusting insects waiting to fall on us and climb all over our faces and bodies. 

“I think I hear the bats!” Marty teased. He leaned close to me, grinning. 
“Hear those fluttering sounds? Giant vampire bats!” 

I shoved him back to his side of the seat. I wasn’t in any mood for his 
joking around. 

“When do we get out of this cave?” I asked impatiently. “This isn’t any 

fun.” 

“I think it’s cool,” Marty repeated. “I like exploring caves.” 



The narrow tunnel opened into a wide cavern. The ceiling appeared to be a 
mile high. There were giant rocks scattered over the cavern floor. Rocks piled on 
rocks. Rocks everywhere. 

Somewhere ahead of us, I heard water dripping. Plunk plunk plunk. 

Eerie green light glowed from the cave walls. The tram pulled up to the 
back wall—and then stopped. 

“Now what?” I whispered. 

Marty and I turned in our seat, letting our eyes explore the huge cavern. All 
I could see were rocks. Smooth rocks, some round, some square. 

Plunk plunk plunk. Water dripped somewhere to our right. The air felt cold 
and damp. 

“This is kind of boring,” Marty murmured. “When do we get going?” 

I shrugged. “I don’t know. Why did we stop here? It’s just a big empty 
cave.” 

We waited for the tram to back up and take us out of there. 

And waited. 

A minute went by. Then another few minutes. 

We both turned around and got up on our knees, peering to the back of the 
tram. Nothing moved. We listened to the steady drip of water, echoing off the 
high stone walls. No other sound. 

Leaning forward against the seatback, I cupped my hands around my mouth 
and shouted. “Hey—can anybody hear us?” 

I waited, listening. No reply. 

“Can anybody hear us?” I tried again. “I think we’re stuck here!” 

No reply. Just the steady drip drip drip. 

I waited, squinting hard into the glow of green light. 

Why wouldn’t the tram get moving? Had it broken down? Were we really 
stuck here? 

I turned to Marty. “What’s up with this tram? Do you think we’re—HEY!” 

I gasped as I stared at the empty seat beside me. 

I reached both hands out. I grabbed for Marty. 

Another lighting trick? Another optical illusion? 

“Marty? Hey—Marty?” I croaked. 

A cold shiver rolled down my back. 

This time Marty was really gone. 



11 


“Marty—?” 

A scraping sound beside the tram made me jump. 

I spun around and saw Marty grinning at me from the cave floor. “Gotcha.” 

“You creep!” I shouted. I swung my fist, but he dodged away, laughing. 
“You’re The Living Creep!” I cried. “You deliberately tried to scare me.” 

“It isn’t too hard a job!” he shot back. His smile faded. “I climbed down to 
check things out.” 

“But the tram might start up any second!” I told him. “You know what that 
tour guide told us. She said we should never leave the tram.” 

Marty squatted down and studied the tires. “I think the tram is stuck or 
something. Maybe it came off its tracks.” He raised his eyes to me and shook his 
head fretfully. “But there aren’t any tracks.” 

“Marty—get back in,” I pleaded. “If it starts up and leaves you standing 
there—” 

He grabbed the side of the car with both hands and shook it. The tramcar 
bounced on its tires. But it didn’t move. 

“I think it broke down,” Marty said softly. “Your father said that some 
things might not work.” 

I felt a stab of fear in my chest. “You mean we’re stranded here? All by 
ourselves in this creepy cave?” 

He stepped to the front of the car and squeezed between the tram and the 
cave wall. Then he tried to push the tram back, shoving with both hands as hard 
as he could. 

It wouldn’t budge. 

“Oh, wow,” I muttered, shaking my head. “This is horrible. This isn’t any 
fun at all.” 

I got back up on my knees on the seat and tried shouting again, as loud as I 
could: “Is anybody in here? Does anybody work here? The tram is stuck!” 

Plunk plunk plunk. The dripping water was my only reply. 

“Can somebody help us?” I shouted. “Please—can somebody help?” 

No answer. 

“Now what?” I cried. 



Marty was still shoving with all his might against the front of the tram. He 
gave one last hard push, then gave up with a sigh. “You’d better climb down,” he 
said. “We have to walk.” 

“Huh? Walk? In this creepy dark cave? No way, Marty!” 

He came around to my side of the car. “You’re not afraid —are you, Erin?” 

“Yes, I am,” I confessed. “A little.” I glanced around the huge cavern. “I 
don’t see any exits. We’d have to walk back through those tunnels. With all the 
spiders and worms and everything.” 

“We can find a way out,” Marty insisted. “There’s got to be a door 
somewhere. They always build emergency exits in these theme park rides.” 

“I think we should stay in the tram,” I said uncertainly. “If we stay here and 
wait, someone will come and find us.” 

“It could take days,” Marty declared. “Come on, Erin. I’m going to walk. 
Are you coming with me?” 

I shook my head, my arms crossed tightly in front of me. “No way,” I 
insisted. “I’m staying here.” 

I knew he wouldn’t go off by himself. I knew he wouldn’t go unless I 
joined him. 

“Well. ’Bye then,” he said. He turned and started walking quickly across the 
cave floor. 

“Hey, Marty—?” 

“’Bye. I’m not waiting here all day. See you later.” 

He was really leaving. Leaving me alone in the stalled tram, in the scary 
cave. “But, Marty—wait!” 

He turned back to me. “Are you coming or not, Erin?” he called back 
impatiently. 

“Okay, okay,” I murmured. I saw that I had no choice. I climbed over the 
side of the tram and dropped to the cave floor. 

The dirt was smooth and damp. I started walking slowly toward Marty. 

“Hurry it up,” he called. “Let’s get out of here.” He was walking backward 
now, motioning for me to catch up to him. 

But I stopped and my mouth dropped open in horror. 

“Don’t look at me like that!” he shouted. “Don’t stare at me as if I’m doing 
something wrong!” 

But I wasn’t staring at Marty. 

I was staring at the thing creeping up behind Marty. 



12 


“Uh... uh... uh...” I struggled to warn Marty, but only frightened grunts escaped 
my throat. 

He kept backing up, backing right into the enormous creature. 

“Erin, get a move on. What’s your problem ?” he demanded. 

“Uh... uh... uh...” I finally managed to point. 

“Huh?” Marty spun around—and saw it, too. “Whoa!” he screamed. His 
sneakers slid on the soft cave floor as he came running back to me. “What is that 
thing?” 

At first, I thought it was some kind of machine. It looked like one of those 
tall steel cranes you see on construction sites. All silvery and metallic. 

But as it rose up on its wire-thin back legs, I saw that it was alive ! 

It had round black eyes the size of billiard balls. They spun wildly in its 
skinny silver skull. Two slender antennae bobbed at the top of the head. Its 
mouth appeared soft, mushy. A gray tongue darted out between long, bristly 
whiskers. 

Its long body stretched back like a folded-up leaf. As it stood, it waved its 
front legs, short white sticks. 

The whole creature looked like some kind of gross stick figure. Its long 
back legs bent and sprang forward, bent then sprang forward. The thick tongue 
swung from side to side. The black eyes stopped whirling and focused on me. 

“Is it—is it a grasshopper ?” I choked out. 

Marty and I had both backed up to the tram. 

Waving its stick arms, the creature sprang closer, its antennae circling 
slowly on top of its head. 

Marty and I pressed our backs against the cold cave wall. We couldn’t move 
back any farther. 

“I think it’s a praying mantis,” Marty replied, staring up at it. The insect had 
to be at least three times as tall as us. As it moved forward, its head nearly 
scraped the cave ceiling. 

The tongue licked its soft, mushy mouth. The mouth puckered and made 
loud sucking sounds. My stomach lurched. The sound was so sick\ 

The round black eyes stared down at Marty and me. The giant praying 



mantis, its body shining like aluminum, took another hopping step toward us. It 
started to lower its head. 

“Wh-what’s it going to do?” I stammered, pressing my back hard against 
the cave wall. 

To my surprise, Marty suddenly started to laugh. 

I turned to him and grabbed his shoulder. Was he totally losing it? 

“Marty—are you okay?” 

“Of course!” he replied. He pulled away from me and took a step toward 
the towering insect. “Why should we be scared, Erin? It’s a big robot. It’s 
programmed to walk up to the tram.” 

“Huh? But, Marty—” 

“It’s all on a computer,” he continued, staring up as the big head bobbed 
lower on its stick body. “It isn’t real. It’s part of the ride.” 

I stared up at the creature. Big drops of saliva rolled off its fat tongue and 
hit the cave floor with a splat. 

“It’s... uh... really lifelike,” I murmured. 

“Your dad is a genius at this stuff!” Marty declared. “We’ll have to tell him 
what a good job he did on the praying mantis.” He laughed. “Your dad said there 
were still some bugs, remember? This must be one of them!” 

The insect rubbed its front legs together. It made a shrill whistling sound. 

I covered my ears. The high-pitched note made my ears ache! 

I was still holding my ears as a second giant praying mantis hopped out 
from behind a tall rock. 

“Look—another one!” Marty cried, pointing. He tugged my arm. “Wow. 
They move so smoothly. You can’t even tell that they’re machines.” 

The two silvery insects chittered at each other, a sharp shrill, metallic 
sound. Their black eyes twirled. Their antennae rotated rapidly, excitedly. 

Gobs of saliva rolled off their tongues and splattered to the floor. The 
second one flashed silvery wings on its back, then quickly closed them up again. 

“Great-looking robots!” Marty declared. He turned to me. “We’d better get 
back in the tram. It’ll probably start up again now that we’ve seen these giant 
bugs.” 

The two insects chittered to each other. They hopped closer, their sticklike 
legs springing hard, bouncing off the smooth cave floor. 

“I hope you’re right,” I told Marty. “Those insects are too real. I want to get 
out of here!” 



I started to follow him to the tramcar. 

The first mantis leaped forward quickly. It hopped between us and the tram, 
blocking our path. 

“Hey—!” I cried. 

We tried to step around it. But it took a big hop to stay in front of us. 

“It—it won’t let us pass!” I stammered. 

“Ohhh!” I cried out as the big creature suddenly swung down and slammed 
its head against my chest. The powerful head-butt sent me sprawling backward. 

“Hey—stop that!” I heard Marty shout. “That machine must be broken!” 

Its black eyes glowing, the mantis lowered its head again—and gave me 
another hard push toward the center of the cave. 

Its partner moved quickly to trap Marty. It lowered its body and prepared to 
head-butt Marty. But Marty quickly backed away, raising his hands in front of 
him like a shield. He hurried to join me. 

I heard scraping sounds. Shrill chirps and chittering. 

I spun around to discover two more huge, ugly mantises climbing out from 
behind rocks. Then two more, their antennae twisting excitedly. Their fat gray 
tongues rolling around their open mouths. 

Marty and I huddled together in the middle of the cavern as the creatures 
hopped and scraped around us. Then they rose up high on their hind legs, their 
black eyes gleaming, their short stick arms waving. 

“We—we’re surrounded!” I cried. 



13 


The giant insects all began chittering at once. They scraped their front legs 
together excitedly. The shrill whistle rose through the cave, echoing off the stone 
walls. 

They formed a circle around us, leaning back on their spindly hind legs. 
Moving closer. Tightening the circle. Their tongues whipped back and forth. 
Thick gobs of mantis saliva hit the floor. 

“They’re out of control!” Marty shrieked. 

“What are they going to do to us?” I cried, covering my ears against their 
excited chirps and the deafening whistle. 

“Maybe they are voice-controlled,” Marty shouted. He tilted back his head 
and shouted up at them: “Stop! Stop!” 

They didn’t stop. 

One of them tilted its silvery head, opened its ugly mouth wide, and spit out 
a black gob. It splattered onto Marty’s sneaker. 

He jumped back. His sneaker stuck to the floor. 

He struggled to tug it free. “Yuck! Watch out! That black stuff—it’s like 
glue!” he cried. 

THOOOM. 

Another mantis opened its mouth wide and spit out a big black gob of 
sticky goo. It splotched the shoulder of my T-shirt. 

“Oww!” I wailed. It was so hot—it burned me right through my shirt. 

The others chittered shrilly and scraped their hairy stick arms. Their 
tongues darting back and forth, they began to lower their heads to us. 

“The stun guns!” I cried, grabbing Marty’s arm. “Maybe the guns will work 
against these bugs!” 

“Those guns are only toys!” he wailed. 

THUPPP. 

Another black gob missed Marty’s foot by inches. 

“Besides, the guns are in the tram,” Marty continued, staring up at the ugly 
creatures. “No way they’ll let us get to the tram.” 

“Then what are we going to do?” I cried. 

As I asked the question, an idea flashed into my mind. 



“Marty—” I whispered. “How do you normally get rid of bugs?” 

“Huh? Erin—what are you talking about?” 

“You step on them—right? Don’t you usually step on them?” 

“But, Erin—” he protested. “These bugs are big enough to step on us!” 

“It’s worth a try!” I cried. 

I raised my sneaker—and tromped as hard as I could on the foot of the 
nearest mantis. 

The giant insect let out a shrill hiss and hopped backward. 

Beside me, Marty stomped on another insect, bringing the heel of his 
sneaker down hard on its spindly foot. That creature fell back, too, raising its 
head in a shrill hiss of pain. Its eyes spun wildly. Its antennae shot straight up. 

I stomped down hard again. With a hoarse choking sound, the big mantis 
fell onto its side. All four stick legs thrashed the air. 

“Let’s go!” I shouted. 

I turned and burst through the circle of insects. I didn’t know where to run. I 
only knew I had to get away. 

The cave erupted in hisses and shrill whistles, angry cluttering and croaks. I 
glimpsed Marty lurching after me. 

I ignored the echoing, ringing sounds and ran. 

Ran to the tram. 

Leaned over the side and grabbed both plastic stun guns into my arms. 

Then I pushed away from the tram and hurtled along the stone cave wall. 

Where could I go? 

How could I escape? 

The cluttering and hissing grew louder, more frantic. The tall shadows of 
the giant insects danced on the wall as I ran. I had the feeling that the shadows 
could reach out and grab me. 

I glanced back. 

Marty came running behind me at full speed. 

The mantises were hopping, scrabbling, limping across the dirt floor after 
us. 

Where to run? Where? 

And then I saw the narrow opening in the cave wall. Just a crack, really. 

But I dove for it. Slipped into it. Squeezed myself into the dark hole 
between the stone. 

And burst out the other side. Into the misty daylight. 



Outside! 

I could see trees tilting down the hill. The road that led down to the studio 
buildings. 

Yes! Outside! I made it! 

I felt so happy. So safe. 

But I didn’t have long to enjoy the feeling. 

As I started to catch my breath, I heard Marty’s terrified cry: “Erin—help! 
Help! They got me! They’re eating me!” 



14 


With a gasp, I spun around. 

How could I help Marty? How could I get him out of the cave? 

To my surprise, he was leaning against the cave wall, one elbow against the 
rock, his legs crossed. A big grin on his round face. 

“April Fools,” he said. 

“YAAAIIIII!” I let out an angry scream. Then I dropped the two plastic 
pistols and rushed at him, ready to pound him with my fists. “You jerk! You 
scared me to death!” 

He laughed and dodged to the side as I came at him. I swung my fist and hit 
air. 

“Don’t play any more dumb jokes like that!” I cried breathlessly. “This 
place is too scary! Those big insects—” 

“Yeah. They were scary,” he agreed, his smile fading. “They were so real! 
How do you think they made them spit like that?” 

I shook my head. “I don’t know,” I muttered. 

I had a heavy feeling in my stomach. I knew it was a crazy idea. But I was 
beginning to think these creatures we were seeing were real. 

Maybe I’ve seen too many scary movies. But the big praying mantises and 
the white worms and all the other creatures and monsters really seemed to be 
alive. 

They didn’t move like mechanical creatures. They appeared to breathe. And 
their eyes focused on Marty and me as if they could really see us. 

I wanted to tell Marty what I was thinking. But I knew he would only laugh 
at me. 

He was so sure that they were all robots and that we were seeing some 
awesome movie special effects. Of course, that made sense. We were on a movie 
studio tour, after all. 

I hoped Marty was right. I hoped it was all tricks. Movie magic. 

My dad was a genius when it came to designing mechanical creatures and 
building theme park rides. And maybe that’s all we were seeing. Maybe Dad had 
really outdone himself this time. 

But the heavy feeling in my stomach wouldn’t go away. I had the feeling 



that we were in danger. Real danger. 

I had the feeling that something had gone wrong here. That something was 
out of control. 

I suddenly wished we weren’t the first two kids to try out the tour. I knew it 
was supposed to be a thrill to be the only ones here. But it was too quiet. Too 
empty. Too scary. It would be so much more fun if hundreds of other people 
were along with us. 

I wanted to tell Marty all this. But how could I? 

He was so eager to prove that he was braver than me. So eager to prove that 
he wasn’t afraid of anything. 

I couldn’t tell him what I was really thinking. 

I picked up the two plastic stun guns and handed him one. I didn’t want to 
carry them both. 

He tucked the barrel of his gun into his jeans pocket. “Hey, Erin—look 
where we are!” he cried. He jogged past me, his eyes straight ahead. “Check it 
out!” 

He started running across the grass. I turned and started to follow him. I 
didn’t want him to get too far ahead. 

The sky had darkened. The sun had disappeared behind a heavy blanket of 
clouds. Wisps of gray fog hung low in the cool air. It was nearly evening. 

We crossed the road and stepped into a town. I mean, it was a movie set of a 
town. A small town with low, one- and two-story buildings, small shops, a 
country-looking general store. Big, old houses in the block beyond the stores. 

“Do you think this is a set they really use in the movies?” I asked, hurrying 
to catch up to Marty. 

He turned to me, his dark eyes flashing with excitement. “Don’t you 
recognize it? Don’t you know where you are?” 

And then my eyes fell on the crumbling, old mansion half-hidden by the 
twisted trees. And across from it, I saw the crooked picket fence that ran around 
the old cemetery. 

And I knew we were on Shock Street. 

“Wow!” I exclaimed, spinning around, trying to take it all in at once. “This 
really is Shock Street. This is where they filmed all of the movies!” 

“It doesn’t look the way I imagined it,” Marty said. “It looks even scarier!” 

He was right. As the sky darkened to evening, long shadows fell over the 
empty buildings. The wind made a moaning sound as it swept around the corner. 



Marty and I made our way down the street, trying to see everything. We 
kept crossing from side to side, peering into a dark, dust-covered shop window 
—then running to examine the front yard of a rundown, old mansion. 

“Check out that empty lot,” I said, pointing. “That’s where The Mad 
Mangier hung out. Remember? In Shocker III? Remember—he mangled 
everyone who walked by?” 

“Of course I remember,” Marty snapped. He stepped into the empty lot. Tall 
weeds bent low, blown by the moaning wind. Shadows moved against the fence 
at the back. 

I stayed on the sidewalk and squinted hard, trying to see what cast the 
shadows. 

Did The Mad Mangier still lurk back there? 

The lot was totally empty. So how could there be tall, shifting shadows on 
the fence? 

“Marty—come back,” I pleaded. “It’s getting dark.” 

He turned back. “Scared, Erin?” 

“It’s just an empty lot,” I told him. “Let’s keep walking.” 

“People always thought it was just an empty lot,” Marty replied in a low, 
scary voice. “Until The Mad Mangier jumped out and mangled them!” He let out 
a long, evil laugh. 

“Marty—you’re losing it,” I murmured, shaking my head. 

He came trotting out of the lot, and we crossed the street. “I wish I had a 
camera,” he said. “I’d really like a picture of me standing in The Mangler’s lot.” 
His eyes lit up. “Or even better—!” 

He didn’t finish his sentence. Instead, he took off, running full speed. 

“Hey—wait up!” I cried. 

A few seconds later, I saw where he was headed. The old cemetery. 

He ran up to the cracked and peeling wooden gate and turned back to me. 
“Even better, I’d like a photo of me standing in the cemetery. The actual set 
where they filmed Cemetery on Shock Street.” 

“We don’t have a camera,” I called from the street. “Get away from there.” 

He ignored me and started to open the gate. The bottom was stuck in the 
grass. Marty tugged hard. Finally, the gate started to pull open, creaking and 
groaning as it moved. 

“Marty—let’s go,” I insisted. “It’s getting late. Dad is probably waiting for 
us, wondering what happened to us.” 



“But this is part of the tour!” he insisted. He tugged the heavy gate open 
just wide enough to squeeze inside the cemetery. 

“Marty—please! Don’t go in!” I begged. I ran up beside him. 

“Erin, it’s just a movie set,” he replied. “You didn’t used to be such a total 
wimp!” 

“I—I just have a bad feeling about this cemetery,” I stammered. “A very 
bad feeling.” 

“It’s part of the tour,” he repeated. 

“But this gate was c/osed!” I cried. “It was closed so that people don’t go 
in.” I raised my eyes to the cemetery. I saw the old graves tilting up from the 
ground like crooked teeth. “I have such a bad feeling...” 

Marty ignored me. He tugged the gate open a little wider and slipped into 
the cemetery. 

“Marty—please—!” I gripped the low fence tightly with both hands and 
watched him. 

He took three steps toward the old graves. Then his hands shot straight up 
in the air—and he dropped out of sight. 



15 


I stared into the darkness, blinking hard. 

I swallowed. Once. Twice. 

I couldn’t believe that he was gone, that he had vanished so quickly. 

The wind moaned between the jagged, tilting gravestones. 

“Marty—?” My voice came out in a choked whisper. “Marty?” 

I gripped the picket fence so hard, my hands ached. I knew I had no choice. 
I had to go in there and see what had happened to him. 

I took a deep breath and pushed myself through the opening. The ground 
was soft. My sneakers sank into the tall grass. 

I took one step. 

Then another. 

I stopped when I heard Marty’s voice. “Hey—be careful.” 

“Huh?” I gazed around. “Where are you?” 

“Down here.” 

I peered down—into a deep, dark hole. An open grave. Marty stared up at 
me. He had dirt on his cheeks and down the front of his T-shirt. He raised both 
hands. “Help me out. I fell!” 

I had to laugh. He looked ridiculous, standing in that hole, covered in dirt. 

“It’s not funny. Help me out,” he repeated impatiently. 

“I warned you,” I said. “I had a bad feeling.” 

“It smells down here,” Marty complained. 

I leaned down. “What does it smell like?” 

“Like dirt. Get me out!” 

“Okay, okay.” I grabbed his hands and tugged. He kicked his feet, digging 
his toes of his sneakers into the soft dirt. 

A few seconds later, he was back on the ground, frantically brushing 
himself off. “That was cool!” he declared. “Now I can tell people I was in a 
grave in The Shock Street Cemetery.” 

A chill ran down my back as the wind picked up. “Let’s get out of here,” I 
pleaded. 

Something gray floated silently between two old gravestones. A wisp of 



fog? A gray cat? 

“Check out these graves,” Marty said, still brushing dirt off his jeans. 
“They’re all cracked and faded. I can barely read the names. That’s so cool. And 
look how they sprayed cobwebs over that row of stones. Creepy, huh?” 

“Marty—can we go?” I begged again. “Dad is probably worried by now. 
Maybe the tram started up again. Maybe we can find it.” 

He ignored me. I watched him lean over a tombstone to read the words cut 
into it. “Jim Socks,” he read. “Eighteen forty to eighteen eighty-seven.” He 
laughed. “Jim Socks. Get it? And look at the ones next to it. Ben Dover. Sid 
Upp. These are all funny!” 

I laughed. Ben Dover and Sid Upp were pretty funny. 

My laugh was cut short when I heard a soft cry from the back of the 
graveyard. I saw another gray wisp dart behind a tombstone. 

I held my breath and listened hard. The wind whistled through the tall 
grass. 

Rising above the wind came another shrill cry. 

A cat? I wondered. Is the cemetery filled with cats? Or is it a child? 

Marty heard it, too. He moved down the row of stones until he stood beside 
me. His dark eyes glowed excitedly. “This is so cool. Did you hear the sound 
effects? There must be a speaker hidden in the ground.” 

Another shrill cry. 

Definitely human. A girl? 

I shivered. “Marty, I really think we should try to get back to my dad. 
We’ve been here all afternoon. And—” 

“But what about the rest of the tour?” he argued. “We have to see 
everything!” 

I heard another cry. Louder. Closer. A cry of terror. 

I tried to ignore it. Marty was probably right. The cries had to be coming 
from a loudspeaker somewhere. 

“How can we finish the tour?” I demanded. “We were supposed to stay on 
the tram—remember? But the tram—OHH!” 

I cried out as a hand shot up from the ground in front of us. A green hand. 
Its long fingers unfolded, as if reaching for us. 

“Whoa!” Marty cried, stumbling back. 

Another green hand shot up from the dirt. Then two more. 

Hands reaching up from graves. 



I let out a frightened gasp. Hands were bursting up through the grass. Hands 
all around us. Their fingers twisting and arching, reaching out. 

Marty started to laugh. “This is totally awesome! Just like in the movie!” 

He stopped laughing as a hand poked up beside him and grabbed his ankle. 
“Erin—help!” he cried. 

But I couldn’t help. 

Two green hands had wrapped around my ankles and were pulling me 
down, down into the grave. 



16 


“Come dowwwwwnnnnn, ” a soft voice moaned. “Come dowwwwwnnnn with 
us.” 

“Nooo!” I shrieked. 

My arms thrashed the air. I tried to kick, but the hands gripped me so 
tightly, so firmly. 

My whole body frantically jerked and tilted back and forth, as I struggled 
not to fall. If I fell, I knew they would grab my hands, too. And pull me 
facedown into the earth. 

“Come dowwwwwwwnnnnnnn. Come dowwwwwnnnn with us. ” 

This isn’t a joke, I thought. These hands are real. They are really trying to 
pull me underground. 

“Help! Oh, help!” I heard Marty’s cry. Then I saw him fall. He toppled to 
the grass, onto his knees. 

Two hands gripped his ankles. Two more green hands poked up from the 
dirt to grab his wrists. 

“Come dowwwwwwwnnnnnnn. Come dowwwwwnnnn with us,” the sad 
voice moaned. 

“Noooo!” I shrieked, tugging wildly, desperately. 

To my surprise, I pulled free. 

One foot sank into the soft grass. I glanced down. My sneaker had slid off. 
The hand still gripped the sneaker—but my foot was free. 

With a happy cry, I bent down. Pulled off the other sneaker. 

I was free now. Free! 

Breathing hard, I bent and quickly pulled off my socks. I knew it would be 
easier to run barefoot. I tossed the socks away. Then I hurried over to Marty. 

He was flat on his stomach. Six hands held him down, tugging at him, 
tugging hard. His whole body twisted and shook. 

He raised his head when he saw me. “Erin—help me!” he gasped. 

I dropped to my knees. Reached for his sneakers. Tugged them off. 

The green hands gripped the sneakers tightly. Marty kicked his feet free and 
tried to climb to his knees. 

I grabbed a green hand and pulled if off his wrist. The hand slapped at me. 



A cold, hard slap that made my hand ring with pain. 

Ignoring it, I grabbed for another green hand. 

Marty rolled over. Rolled free. Jumped to his feet, gasping, trembling, his 
mouth hanging open, his dark eyes bulging. 

“Your socks—” I cried breathlessly. “Pull them off! Hurry!” 

He clumsily tore them off his feet. 

The hands grabbed wildly for us. Dozens of hands stretching up from the 
dirt. Hundreds of hands reaching up for us from the tall graveyard grass. 

“Come dowwwwwwwnnnnnnn. Come dowwwwwnnnn with us,” the voice 
moaned. 

“Come dowwwwurwwnnnnnrm. Come dowwwwwnnnn, ” a dozen other soft 
voices called from beneath the ground. 

Marty and I froze. The soft, sad voices seemed to hypnotize me. My legs 
suddenly felt as if they were made of stone. 

“Come dowwwwurwwnnnnnrm. Come dowwwwwnnnn. ” 

And then I saw a green head pop up from the dirt. And then another head. 
Another. Bald green heads with empty eye sockets and open, toothless mouths. 

I saw shoulders, then arms. More heads poking up. Bright-green bodies 
pulling up from beneath the ground. 

“M-Marty—” I choked out. “They’re coming up after us!” 



17 


The cemetery rang out with grunts and groans as the ugly green figures pulled 
themselves up from the ground. 

I took one last glance at their tattered, shredded clothing, at their blackened 
eye sockets, their toothless, grinning mouths. 

And then I started to run. 

Marty and I both ran without saying a word. Side by side, we darted across 
the tall grass between the rows of crooked tombstones. 

My heart thudded in my chest. My head throbbed. My bare feet sank into 
the cold dirt, slipped on the tall, damp grass. 

Marty reached the wooden gate first. He was running so hard, he banged 
into the fence. He let out a cry—then slipped through the gate onto Shock Street. 

I could hear moans and groans and eerie calls of the disgusting green 
people behind me. But I didn’t look back. I dove for the gate. Squeezed through. 
Then I shoved it shut behind me. 

Running into the street, I stopped to catch my breath. I bent over and 
pressed my hands against my knees. My side ached. I sucked in breath after 
breath. 

“Don’t stop!” Marty cried frantically. “Erin—keep going!” 

I took a deep breath and followed him down the street. Our bare feet 
slapped the pavement. 

I could still hear the moans and calls behind us. But I was too scared to 
glance back. 

“Marty—where is everybody?” I called breathlessly. 

Shock Street was empty, the houses and shops all dark. 

Shouldn’t there be people around? I wondered. This is a big movie studio. 
Where are the people who work for Shocker Studios? Where are the people who 
work on the studio tour? 

Why isn’t anyone around to help us? 

“Something is wrong!” Marty choked out, running at full speed. We passed 
The Horror Hardware Store and Shock City Electronics. “The robots are out of 
control or something!” 

At last! Marty agreed with me. He finally agreed that something was 



terribly wrong. 

“We’ve got to find your dad,” Marty said, running across the street to the 
next block of dark houses. “We’ve got to tell him there’s a problem.” 

“We have to find the tram,” I called, struggling to keep up with him. “Ow!” 

My bare foot came down on something hard. A rock or something. Pain 
shot up my leg. But I hobbled on. 

“If we can get back on the tram, it will take us back to Dad,” I called. 

“There has to be a way out of Shock Street,” Marty said. “It’s only a movie 

set.” 

We ran past a tall mansion with two turrets. It looked like an evil castle. I 
didn’t remember it from any of the Shocker movies. 

Beyond the mansion stretched a big, empty dirt lot. At the back of the lot 
stood a low brick wall, just a foot or two taller than Marty and me. 

“Cut through here!” I told Marty. “If we can climb up on that wall, we can 
probably see the studio road.” 

I was just guessing. But it was worth a try. 

We both turned into the empty lot. 

My bare feet thudded over the soft dirt. 

The dirt felt cold and wet. As we crossed the field, our feet tossed up big 
clumps of mud. 

I pumped my legs harder as the mud grew softer. My bare feet were sinking 
into it. As I ran, the cold mud rose up over my ankles. 

Marty and I were nearly to the brick wall when we ran into the sinkhole. 

“Yaaaaaiiii!” We both uttered hoarse cries as the ground gave way beneath 
us. 

The mud made a sick splussssh as we sank. 

I tossed up both hands. Tried to grab onto something. 

But there was nothing to grab. 

The mud oozed around me. Over my ankles. My legs. Up over my knees. 

It’s sucking me down, I thought. I tried to cry out again—but panic choked 
my throat. 

I glimpsed Marty beside me. His arms were waving wildly. His whole body 
twisted and squirmed as he sank. The mud was up over his waist—and he was 
still sinking fast. 

I kicked hard. Tried to raise my knees. 

But I was trapped. Trapped and dropping down, down into the dark, wet 



ooze. 

My mud-covered arms slapped against the surface. 

I couldn’t stop myself. 

The mud bubbled up over my neck. And I was sinking fast. 



18 


I held my breath. The mud rose up to my chin. 

In a second, it will be over my head, I thought. 

A sob escaped my throat. 

The mud crept higher, up over my chin. I started to spit as it reached my 
mouth. 

And then I felt something grab my arm. Strong hands slipped under my 
arms. I felt the hands slide in the mud. 

They gripped me harder. 

I felt myself being tugged up, tugged by someone very strong. 

The mud made a loud plop as I rose up. I felt the mud roll down my chest, 
my legs, my knees. 

And then I was standing on the surface, still held by the two powerful 
hands. 

“Marty—!” I called, tasting the sour mud on my lips. “Are you—?” 

“I’m up!” I heard his hoarse reply. “Erin, I’m okay!” 

The strong hands finally let go. My legs trembled. I wobbled but remained 
standing. 

I turned to see who had rescued me. 

And stared into the glowing red eyes of a wolf. 

A human with the face of a wolf. Clawed hands covered in black fur. A 
long, brown snout curved in an open, toothy grin. Sharp, pointed ears above a 
thick tuft of black wolf fur. 

A female. She wore a silvery catsuit. Sleek and tight-fitting. As I stared in 
shock, she opened her mouth in a throaty growl. 

I recognized her at once. Wolf Girl! 

I turned to see her companion—Wolf Boy. He had pulled Marty out of the 
mud hole. Marty’s whole body was caked in mud. He tried to wipe his face, but 
only managed to smear more mud over his cheeks. 

“You—saved us! Thank you!” I cried, finally finding my voice. 

The two werewolves uttered low growls in reply. 

“We—we lost the tram,” I explained to Wolf Girl. “We need to get back. 



You know. Back to where the ride began.” 

She let out a sharp growl. Then she snapped her toothy jaw hard. 

“Please—” I begged. “Can you help us get back to the tram? Or can you 
take us to the main building? My dad is waiting for me there.” 

Wolf Girl’s red eyes flashed. She growled again. 

“We know you’re just actors!” Marty blurted out shrilly. “But we don’t 
want to be scared anymore. We’ve had enough scares for today. Okay?” 

The two werewolves growled. A long white string of saliva drooled over 
Wolf Boy’s black lips. 

Something inside me snapped. I totally lost it. “Stop it!” I screamed. “Just 
stop it! Marty is right! We don’t want to be scared now. So stop the werewolf act 
—and help us!” 

The werewolves growled again. Wolf Girl snapped her jaws. A long pink 
tongue slid out, and she licked her jagged teeth hungrily. 

“That’s enough !” I shrieked. “Stop the act! Stop it! Stop it!” 

I was so angry, so furious —I reached up with both hands. I grabbed the fur 
on the sides of Wolf Girl’s mask. 

And I tugged the mask with all my strength. 

Tugged. Tugged with both hands as hard as I could. 

And felt real fur. And warm skin. 

It wasn’t a mask. 



19 


“Ohh.” I let out a gasp, and jerked my hands away. 

The werewolf’s red eyes glowed. Her black lips parted. Once again, her 
tongue flicked hungrily over her yellow, pointed teeth. 

My whole body trembled as I backed up against the brick wall. “M-Marty 
—” I stammered. “It’s not an act.” 

“Huh?” Marty stood stiffly in front of Wolf Boy, his dark eyes wide in his 
mud-caked face. 

“They’re not actors,” I whispered. “Something is wrong here. Something is 
terribly wrong.” 

Marty’s mouth dropped open. He took a step back. 

Both werewolves uttered low growls. They lowered their heads as if 
preparing to attack. 

“Do you believe me?” I cried. “Do you finally believe me?” 

Marty nodded. He didn’t say a word. I think he was too terrified to talk. 

Saliva poured from the werewolves’ mouths. Their eyes glowed like fire in 
the darkness. Their furry chests began to heave in and out. Their breaths came 
loud and hoarse. 

I jumped back against the wall as both werewolves raised their heads and 
let out long, frightening howls. 

What were they going to do to us? 

I grabbed Marty and tugged him to the wall. “Up!” I cried. “Get up! Maybe 
they can’t reach us up there!” 

Marty leaped high, stretching up his arms. His hands slapped the top of the 
wall, then slid back down. He tried again. He bent his knees. Jumped. Grabbed 
for the top of the wall. Slipped back down. 

“I can’t!” he wailed. “It’s too high.” 

“We’ve got to!” I shrieked. 

I turned back and saw the two werewolves lean back on their hind legs and 
then spring up. They were snarling and growling now, thick gobs of saliva 
running over their snapping teeth. 

“Up!” I cried. 

As Marty leaped for the wall again, I reached down and grabbed his muddy 



foot. “Up!” I gave him a hard boost. 

His hands thrashed the air. Caught the top of the brick wall. Held on. 

His bare feet kicked the air. But he held on and tugged himself up. 

On his knees on top of the wall, he turned and grabbed my hands. He pulled 
and I jumped. I struggled to scramble up beside him. 

But I couldn’t get my knees up. Couldn’t get them onto the wall. 

My bare feet thrashed wildly. My knees scraped against the wall as Marty 
tugged. 

“I can’t do it! I can’t!” I gasped. 

The werewolves howled again. 

“Keep trying!” Marty choked out. He tugged my arms. Tugged with all his 
strength. 

I was still struggling as the two werewolves leaped. 



20 


I heard the snap of jaws. 

I felt hot breath on the bottom of my foot. 

The two werewolves thudded against the wall. 

With a desperate cry, I sprang to the top. Gasping for air, I pressed myself 
flat against the bricks. 

I raised my head in time to see the two snarling werewolves leap again. 
Jaws snapped in front of my face. Red eyes gleamed hungrily at me. 

“No!” With a cry, I scrambled to my feet. 

The werewolves raised their heads in angry howls and prepared to attack 
again. 

Marty and I stood pressed close together, staring down at them. 

They jumped. 

Their claws scraped against the bricks. The shrill screech sent chills down 
my back. Their teeth snapped. 

They dropped down. Prepared another leap, snarling excitedly. 

“We can’t stay up here forever!” Marty cried. “What do we do?” 

I squinted into the darkness. Was that the studio road on the other side of 
the wall? 

Too dark to tell. 

The werewolves leaped again. Jagged teeth scraped against my ankle. 

I jumped back. Nearly toppled off the wall. 

Marty and I bumped into each other, our eyes on the two growling creatures 
preparing another leap. 

The gun! The plastic stun gun! 

Mine had fallen from my hand. It was probably buried in that mud hole. But 
my eyes fell on Marty’s gun. Its handle poked out from his jeans pocket. 

Without saying a word, I grabbed the handle and tugged the plastic pistol 
from Marty’s jeans. 

“Hey—!” he cried. “Erin—what are you doing?” 

“They gave us the guns for a reason,” I explained, shouting over the 
frightening howls of the two werewolves. “Maybe this will stop them.” 



“It—it’s only a toy!” Marty stammered. 

I didn’t care. It was worth a try. 

Maybe it would frighten them. Maybe it would hurt them. Maybe it would 
chase them away. 

I raised the plastic gun. Aimed it as the two werewolves made another leap 
of attack. “One—two—three—FIRE!” I squeezed the trigger. Again. Again. 
Again! 



21 


The gun made a loud buzzing sound. It shot out a beam of yellow light. 

Yes! I thought. Yes! I prayed. 

The light will stop them. 

It’s a stun gun—right? The buzzing sound and the bright light will stun 
them. It will freeze them in place so Marty and I can make our escape. 

I squeezed the trigger hard. Again. Again. 

It didn’t stop the werewolves. It didn’t even seem to surprise them. 

They leaped higher. I felt sharp claws scrape my leg. I cried out in pain. 

And the plastic gun flew out of my hand. 

It clattered against the top of the wall, then slid to the ground. 

Just a toy. Marty was right. It wasn’t a real weapon. It was just a stupid toy. 

“Look out!” Marty opened his mouth in a shrill shriek as the snarling 
creatures made another high leap at the wall. 

Claws scraped the brick—and held on. Red eyes glared up at me. Hot wolf 
breath tingled my skin. 

“Ohhh.” My arms flew up as I lost my balance. I struggled to stay up. But 
my knees bent. My feet slipped. 

I grabbed for Marty. Missed. 

And toppled off. Landed hard on my back on the other side of the wall. 

Gazing up in horror, I saw Marty leap down beside me. 

The two werewolves were on the top of the wall now. They glared down at 
us, red eyes glowing, tongues out, breathing hard. 

Preparing to pounce. 

Marty dragged me to my feet. “Run!” he cried hoarsely, his eyes wide with 
panic. 

The werewolves growled above us. 

The ground tilted. I still felt dizzy, a little dazed from my fall. “We—we 
can’t outrun them!” I moaned. 

I heard a rumbling sound. A clatter. 

Marty and I both turned. And saw two yellow eyes, glowing against the 
dark sky. 



Yellow eyes of a creature roaring toward us. 

No. Not a creature. 

As it drew nearer, I could make out its long, sleek shape. 

The tram! 

The tram bouncing over the road behind yellow headlights. Coming closer. 
Closer. 

Yes! 

I turned to Marty. Did he see it, too? He did. 

Without saying a word, we both began running to the road. The tram was 
rolling fast. Somehow we had to climb on it. We had to! 

Behind us, I heard the werewolves howl. I heard a hard thump, then another 
as they dropped off the wall. 

The twin yellow headlights of the tram swept over us. 

The werewolves snarled and howled angrily as they chased after us. 

A few feet ahead of me, Marty was hurtling forward, his head down, his 
legs pumping furiously. 

The tram bumped closer. Closer. 

The howling werewolves were inches behind us. I could almost feel their 
hot breath on the back of my neck. 

A few more seconds. A few more seconds—and Marty and I would make 
our jump. 

I watched the tram speed around a curve, the yellow headlights washing 
over the dark road. I kept my eyes on the front car. Took a deep breath. Prepared 
to jump. 

And then Marty fell. 

I saw his hands shoot out. Saw his mouth open wide in surprise. In horror. 

He stumbled over his own bare feet and dropped to the ground, landing 
hard on his stomach. 

I couldn’t stop in time. 

I ran right into him. Stumbled over him. 

Fell heavily on top of him. 

And watched the tram speed past us. 



22 


“Owoooooooo!” 

The two werewolves uttered long howls of triumph. 

My heart pounding, I scrambled to my feet. “Get up!” I frantically pulled 
Marty up by both arms. 

We took off after the tram, our bare feet pounding the hard road. The last 
car bounced a few feet ahead of us. 

I reached it first. Shot out my right hand. Grabbed the back of the car. 

With a desperate leap, I hoisted myself up. Up. And into the last seat. 

Struggling to catch my breath, I turned back to find Marty running behind 
the tram. His hands reached for the back of the tramcar. “I—I can’t make it!” he 
gasped. 

“Run! You’ve got to!” I screamed. 

Behind him, I could see the werewolves scampering close behind. 

Marty put on a burst of speed. He grabbed the back of the car with both 
hands. It dragged him for several feet—until he swung himself around and 
dropped into the seat beside me. 

Yes! I thought happily. We made it! We got away from those howling 
werewolves. 

Or did we? 

Would they jump into the tram after us? 

I spun around, my whole body trembling. And I watched the werewolves 
fade into the distance. They ran for a while, then gave up. They both stood in the 
road, hunched over in defeat, watching us escape. 

Escape. 

What a wonderful word. 

Marty and I grinned at each other. I slapped him a high five. 

We were both breathing hard, covered in mud. My legs ached from running. 
My bare feet throbbed. My heart still thudded from the frightening chase. 

But we had escaped. And now we were safe in the tram, on our way back to 
the starting platform. Back to my dad. 

“We’ve got to tell your dad that this place is messed up,” Marty said 
breathlessly. 



“Something is horribly wrong here,” I agreed. 

“Those werewolves—they weren’t kidding around,” Marty continued. 
“They—they were real, Erin. They weren’t actors.” 

I nodded. I felt so glad that Marty finally agreed with me. And he wasn’t 
pretending to be brave anymore. He wasn’t pretending that it was all robots and 
special effects. 

We both knew that we had faced real dangers. Real monsters. 

Something was terribly wrong at Shocker Studios. Dad had told us he 
wanted a full report. Well, he was going to get one! 

I settled back in the seat, trying to calm down. 

But I shot straight up again when I realized we weren’t alone. “Marty— 
look!” I pointed to the front of the tram. “We aren’t the only passengers.” 

In fact, every tramcar appeared to be filled with people. 

“What’s going on?” Marty murmured. “Your dad said we were the only 
ones on the tour. And now the tram is—OH!—” 

Marty never finished his sentence. His mouth fell open in a gasp. His eyes 
bulged open wide. 

I gasped, too. 

The other passengers on the tram all turned around at the same time. And I 
saw their grinning jaws, their dark, empty eye sockets, the gray bones of their 
skulls. 

Skeletons. 

The other passengers were all grinning skeletons. 

Their jaws opened in dry laughter. Cruel laughter that sounded like the 
wind screeching through bare trees. Bones rattled and clattered as they raised 
their yellowed, skeletal hands to point at us. 

Their skulls bobbed and bounced as the tram carried us, faster, faster, 
through the darkness. 

Marty and I slumped low in the seat, trembling, staring at the grinning 
skulls, the pointing fingers. 

Who were they? 

How did they get on this tram? 

Where were they taking us? 



23 


The skeletons laughed their wheezing laugh. Their bones clanked and rattled. 
Their yellowed skulls bounced loosely on their clattering shoulder bones. 

The tram picked up speed. We were flying through the darkness. 

I forced myself to turn away from the grinning skulls and peered out. 
Beyond the trees, I could see the low buildings of the movie studio. As I stared, 
they grew smaller, faded into the blackness of the night. 

“Marty—we’re not going back to the main platform,” I whispered. “We’re 
heading the wrong way. We’re going away from all the buildings.” 

He swallowed hard. I could see the panic in his eyes. “What can we do?” he 
choked out. 

“We’ve got to get off!” I replied. “We’ve got to jump.” 

Marty had slumped all the way down in the seat, as low as he could get. I 
think he was trying to hide from the skeletons. 

Now he raised his head and peeked over the side of the tram. “Erin—we 
can’t jump!” he cried. “We’re going too fast.” 

He was right. 

We were rocketing along the road. And the tram kept picking up speed. The 
trees and shrubs whirred past in a dark blur. 

And then as we squealed into a sharp curve, a tall building seemed to jump 
into our path. 

A castle, bathed in swirling spotlights. All gray and silver. Twin towers 
reached up to the sky. A solid stone wall rose up from the road. 

The road. 

It curved straight into the castle wall. The road ended at the wall. 

And we were roaring down the road, still picking up speed. 

Roaring toward the castle. 

The skeletons rattled and clattered and laughed their dry, screeching laugh. 
They bounced in their seats, bones cracking, jumping in excitement as we 
zoomed at the castle. 

Closer. Closer. 

Right up to it now. Up to the solid stone wall. 

About to smash right into it. 



24 


My legs trembled. My heart pounded. But somehow I managed to stand up on 
the seat. 

I took a deep breath. Held it. Closed my eyes—and jumped. 

I landed hard on my side, and rolled. 

I saw Marty hesitate. The tram bounced. Marty dove over the side. 

He hit the ground on his stomach. Rolled onto his back. And kept rolling. 

I came to a stop under a tree. And turned to the castle—in time to see the 
tram plunge into the stone wall. 

Without a sound. 

The first tramcar hit the castle wall and flew through it. 

Silently. 

I could see the skeletons bobbing and bouncing. 

And I saw the next car and the next and the next—all shoot into the castle 
wall and disappear through it without making a sound. 

A few seconds later, the tram disappeared. 

A heavy silence fell over the road. 

The spotlights on the castle wall dimmed. 

“Erin—are you okay?” Marty called weakly. 

I turned to find him on his hands and knees on the other side of the road. I 
scrambled to my feet. I had scraped my side, but it didn’t hurt too badly. 

“I’m okay,” I told him. I pointed to the castle. “Did you see that?” 

“I saw it,” Marty replied, standing up slowly. “But I don’t believe it.” He 
stretched. “How did the tram go through the wall? Do you think the castle isn’t 
really there? That it’s an optical illusion? Some kind of trick?” 

“There’s an easy way to find out,” I said. 

We walked side by side on the road. The wind rustled the trees, making 
them whisper all around us. The pavement felt cold under my bare feet. 

“We’ve got to find my dad,” I said quietly. “I’m sure he can explain 
everything to us.” 

“I hope so,” Marty murmured. 

We stepped up to the castle wall. I stuck out both hands, expecting them to 



go right through. 

But my hands slapped solid stone. 

Marty lowered his shoulder and shoved it against the castle wall. His 
shoulder hit the wall with a thud. 

“It’s solid,” Marty said, shaking his head. “It’s a real wall. So how did the 
tram go through it?” 

“It’s a ghost tram,” I whispered, rubbing my hand against the cold stone. “A 
ghost tram filled with skeletons.” 

“But we rode in it!” Marty cried. 

I slapped the wall with both hands and spun away from it. “I’m sick of 
mysteries!” I wailed. “I’m sick of being scared! I’m sick of werewolves and 
monsters! I’m never going to another scary movie as long as I live!” 

“Your father can explain it all,” Marty said softly, shaking his head. “I’m 
sure he can.” 

“I don’t want him to explain it!” I cried. “I just want to get away from 
here!” 

Keeping close together, we made our way around to the side of the castle. I 
could hear strange, animal howls behind us. And a frightening cackle cut 
through the air somewhere above our heads. 

I ignored all the sounds. I didn’t want to think about whether they were 
being made by real monsters or fakes. I didn’t want to think about the 
frightening creatures we had run into—or the close calls Marty and I had had. 

I didn’t want to think. 

At the back of the castle, the road appeared again. “I hope we’re going in 
the right direction,” I murmured, following it as it curved into the hill. 

“Me, too,” Marty replied in a tiny voice. 

We picked up our pace, walking quickly in the middle of the road. We tried 
not to pay attention to the sharp animal calls, the shrill cries, the howls and 
moans that seemed to follow us everywhere. 

The road sloped uphill. Marty and I leaned forward as we climbed. The 
frightening cries and howls followed us up the hill. 

As we neared the top, I saw several low buildings. 

“Yes!” I cried. “Marty—look! We must be heading back to the main 
platform.” I started jogging toward the buildings. Marty trotted close behind. 

We both stopped when we realized where we were. 

Back on Shock Street. 



Somehow we had made a circle. 

Past the old houses and small shops, The Shock Street Cemetery came into 
view. Staring at the fence, I remembered the green hands poking up from the 
ground. The green shoulders. The green faces. The hands pulling us, pulling us 
down. 

My whole body shuddered. 

I didn’t want to be back here. I never wanted to see this terrifying street 
again. 

But I couldn’t turn away from the cemetery. As I stared at the old 
gravestones from across the street, I saw something move. 

A wisp of gray. Like a tiny cloud. 

It rose up between two crooked, old stones. Floated silently into the air. 

And then another puff of gray lifted off the ground. And another. 

I glimpsed Marty. He stood beside me, hands pressed against his waist, 
staring hard. He saw them, too. 

The gray puffs rose silently, like snowballs or cotton. Dozens of them, 
floating up from the graves. 

Floating over the cemetery and out over the street. 

Floating above Marty and me. Hovering so low. 

And then as we stared up at them, they started to grow. To inflate, like gray 
balloons. 

And I saw faces inside them. Dark faces, etched in shadow like the Man in 
the Moon. The faces scowled at us. Old faces, lined and creased. Eyes narrowed 
to dark slits. Frowning faces. Sneering faces inside the billowing, white puffs. 

I grabbed Marty’s shoulder. I wanted to run, to get away, to get out from 
under them. 

But, like smoke, the wisps of mist with their evil faces, swirled down, 
swirled around us. Trapped us. Trapped us inside. 

The faces, the ugly, scowling faces, spinning around us. Spinning faster, 
faster, holding us in the swirling, choking mist. 



25 


I pressed my hands over my eyes, trying to shut them out. 

I froze in total panic. I couldn’t think. I couldn’t breathe. 

I could hear the shrill rush of wind as the ghostly clouds swirled around us. 

And then I heard a man’s voice, shouting over the wind: “Cut! Print that 
one! Good scene, everyone!” 

I lowered my hands slowly and opened my eyes. I let out my breath in a 
long whoosh. 

A man came striding up to Marty and me. He wore jeans and a gray 
sweatshirt under a brown leather jacket. He had a blue-and-white Dodgers cap 
sideways on his head. A blond ponytail tumbled out from under it. 

He carried a clipboard in one hand. He had a silver whistle around his neck. 
He smiled at Marty and me and flashed us a thumbs-up. 

“Hey, what’s up, guys? I’m Russ Denver. Good job! You looked really 
scared.” 

“Huh?” I cried, my mouth dropping open. “We were really scared!” 

“I’m so glad to see a real live human!” Marty cried. 

“This tour—it’s totally messed up!” I shrieked. “The creatures—they’re 
alive! They tried to hurt us! They really did! It wasn’t any fun! It wasn’t like a 
ride!” The words spilled out of me in a rush. 

“It was really gross! The werewolves snapped at us and chased us up a 
wall!” Marty exclaimed. 

The two of us started talking at once, telling this guy Denver all of the 
frightening things that had happened to us on the tour. 

“Whoa! Whoa!” A smile crossed his handsome face. He raised his 
clipboard as if to shield himself from us. “It’s all special effects, guys. Didn’t 
they explain to you that we’re making a movie here? That we were filming your 
reactions?” 

“No. No one explained that, Mr. Denver!” I replied angrily. “My dad 
brought us here. He designed the studio tour. And he told us we were the first to 
try it out. But he didn’t tell us about any movie being filmed. I really think—” 

I felt Marty’s hand on my shoulder. I knew Marty was trying to calm me 
down. But I didn’t want to be calmed down. 



I was really angry. 

Mr. Denver turned back to a group of crew members behind him in the 
street. “Take thirty, guys. Let’s break for dinner.” 

They moved away, talking among themselves. Mr. Denver turned back to 
us. “Your father should have explained to you—” 

“It’s okay. Really,” Marty interrupted. “We just got a little scared. All of the 
creatures seemed so real. And we didn’t see any other people anywhere. You’re 
the first real person we’ve seen all afternoon.” 

“My dad must be really worried,” I told the movie director. “He said he’d 
be waiting for us on the main platform. Can you tell us how to get there?” 

“No problem,” Mr. Denver replied. “See that big house there with the open 
door?” He pointed with his clipboard. 

Marty and I stared at the house across the street. A narrow path led up to the 
house. A pale yellow light shone inside the open front door. 

“That’s Shockro’s House of Shocks,” the director explained. “Go right in 
that door and straight through the house.” 

“But won’t we get shocked in there?” Marty demanded. “In the movie, 
anyone who goes into Shockro’s house gets jolted with twenty million volts of 
electricity!” 

“That’s just in the movie,” Mr. Denver replied. 

“The house is just a set. It’s perfectly safe. Go through the house. Then out 
the back, and you will see the main building on the other side of the street. You 
can’t miss it.” 

“Thank you!” Marty and I called out at once. 

Marty turned and started running full speed toward the house. 

I turned back to Mr. Denver. “I’m sorry for yelling before,” I told him. “I 
was just so scared, and I thought—” 

I gasped. 

Mr. Denver had turned away. And I saw the long power cord—the power 
cord that was plugged into his back. 

He wasn’t a real human. He wasn’t a movie director. He was some kind of 
robot. 

He was fake like all the others. He was lying to us. Lying! 

I turned and cupped my hands around my mouth. I started to run, frantically 
calling after Marty: “Don’t go in there! Marty—stop! Don’t go in that house!” 

Too late. 



Marty was already running through the door. 



26 


“Marty—wait! Stop!” I shouted as I ran. 

I had to stop him. 

The director was a fake. I knew he wasn’t telling the truth. 

“Marty— please\” 

My bare feet pounded the hard pavement. I plunged up the path as Marty 
trotted into the doorway. 

“Stop!” 

I flew to the doorway. Reached out both hands. Made a wild dive to tackle 

him. 

And missed. 

I skidded across the walk on my stomach. 

As soon as Marty entered the house, I saw the flash of white light. I heard a 
loud buzz. Then the sharp crackle of electricity. 

The room exploded in a flash of lightning. So bright I had to shield my 

eyes. 

When I opened them, I saw Marty sprawled facedown on the floor. 
“Nooooo!” I let out a terrified wail. 

Scrambling to my feet, I dove into the house. 

Would I get shocked, too? 

I didn’t care. I had to get to Marty. I had to help him out of there. 

“Marty! Marty!” I screamed his name again and again. 

He didn’t move. 

“Marty—please!” I grabbed his shoulders and started to shake him. “Wake 
up, Marty! Snap out of it! Marty!” 

He didn’t open his eyes. 

I suddenly felt a chill. A dark shadow slid over me. 

And I realized I wasn’t alone in the house. 



27 


I spun around with a gasp. 

Was it Shockro? Some other scary creature? 

A tall figure leaned over me. I squinted into the darkness, struggling to see 
his face. 

“Dad!” I cried as he came into focus. “Dad! Oh, I’m so glad to see you!” 

“Erin, what are you doing here?” he asked in a low voice. 

“It—it’s Marty!” I stammered. “You’ve got to help him, Dad. He’s been 
shocked and he—he—” 

Dad leaned closer. Behind his eyeglasses, his brown eyes were cold. His 
face set in a troubled frown. 

“Do something, Dad!” I pleaded. “Marty is hurt. He isn’t moving. He won’t 
open his eyes. The studio tour was so awful, Dad! Something is wrong. 
Something is terribly wrong!” 

He didn’t reply. He leaned closer. 

And as his face came into the soft light, I saw that he wasn’t my father! 

“Who are you?” I shrieked. “You’re not my dad! Why aren’t you helping 
me? Why aren’t you helping Marty? Do something—please! Where’s my dad? 
Where is he? Who are you? Help me! Somebody? Help me 
AAAAAARRRRRRRRR. Help MRRRRRRRRRRRR. Dad— 
MARRRRRRRRRRRRRR. DRRRMMMMMMMMmmmmm.” 



28 


Mr. Wright stood staring down at Erin and Marty. He shook his head unhappily. 
He shut his eyes and let out a long sigh. 

Jared Curtis, one of the studio engineers, came running into The House of 
Shocks. “Mr. Wright, what happened to your two kid robots?” he demanded. 

Mr. Wright sighed again. “Programming problems,” he muttered. 

He pointed to the Erin robot, frozen in place on her knees beside the Marty 
robot. “I had to shut the girl off. Her memory chip must be bad. The Erin robot 
was supposed to think of me as her father. But just now, she didn’t recognize 
me.” 

“And what about the Marty robot?” Jared asked. 

“It’s totally down,” Mr. Wright replied. “I think the electrical system 
shorted out.” 

“What a shame,” Jared said, bending to roll the Marty robot over. He pulled 
up the T-shirt and fiddled with some dials on the back. “Hey, Mr. Wright, it was 
a great idea to make robot kids to test the park. I think we can fix them.” 

Jared opened up a panel on Marty’s back and squinted at the red and green 
wires. “All the other creatures, and monsters, and robots worked perfectly. Not a 
single bug.” 

“I should have known there was a problem yesterday,” Mr. Wright said. 
“We were in my office. The Erin robot asked about her mother. I built her. She 
doesn’t have a mother.” 

Mr. Wright tossed up his hands. “Oh, well. No problem. We’ll reprogram 
these two. Put in new chips. They’ll be good as new in no time. Then we’ll try 
them out once again on the Shocker Studio Tour, before we open the park to real 
kids.” 

He took the Marty robot from Jared and slung it over his shoulder. Then he 
picked up the Erin robot. He tossed it over his other shoulder. Then, humming to 
himself, he carried them to the engineering building. 




THE HAUNTED 
MASK II 

Goosebumps - 36 
R.L. Stine 



1 


I don’t know if you have ever spent any time with first graders. But there is only 
one word to describe them. And that word is ANIMALS. 

First graders are animals. 

You can quote me. 

My name is Steve Boswell, and I am in the sixth grade. I may not be the 
smartest guy at Walnut Avenue Middle School. But I know one thing for sure: 
First graders are animals. 

How do I know this fact? I learned it the hard way. I learned it by coaching 
the first-grade soccer team after school every day. 

You might want to know why I chose to coach their soccer team. Well, I 
didn’t choose it. It was a punishment. 

Someone set a squirrel loose in the girls’ locker room. That someone was 
me. But it wasn’t my idea. 

My best friend, Chuck Green, caught the squirrel. And he asked me where I 
thought he should set it free. 

I said, “How about the girls’ locker room before their basketball game on 
Thursday?” 

So maybe it was partly my idea. But Chuck was just as much to blame as I 

was. 

Of course, I was the one who got caught. 

Miss Curdy, the gym teacher, grabbed me as I was letting the squirrel out of 
its box. The squirrel ran across the gym to the bleachers. The kids in the 
bleachers all jumped up and started running and screaming and acting crazy. 

It was just a dumb squirrel. But all the teachers started chasing after it. It 
took hours to catch it and get everyone calmed down. 

So Miss Curdy said I had to be punished. 

She gave me a choice of punishments. One: I could come into the gym after 
school every day and inflate basketballs—by mouth—until my head exploded. 
Or two: I could coach the first-grade soccer team. 

I chose number two. 

The wrong choice. 

My friend Chuck was supposed to help me coach the team. But he told 



Miss Curdy he had an after-school job. 

Do you know what his after-school job is? Going home and watching TV. 

A lot of people think that Chuck and I are best friends because we look so 
much alike. We’re both tall and thin. We both have straight brown hair and dark 
brown eyes. We both wear baseball caps most of the time. Sometimes people 
think we’re brothers! 

But that’s not why I like Chuck and Chuck likes me. We’re best friends 
because we make each other laugh. 

I laughed really hard when Chuck told me what his after-school job was. 
But I’m not laughing now. 

I’m praying. Every day I pray for rain. If it rains, the first graders don’t 
have soccer practice. 

Today, unfortunately, is a bright, clear, beautiful October day. Standing on 
the playground behind school, I searched the sky for a cloud—any cloud—but 
saw only blue. 

“Okay, listen up, Hogs!” I shouted. I wasn’t making fun of them. That’s the 
name they voted for their team. Do you believe it? The Walnut Avenue Hogs. 

Does that give you an idea of what these kids are like? 

I cupped my hands around my mouth and shouted again. “Line up, Hogs!” 

Andrew Foster grabbed the whistle I wear around my neck and blew it in 
my face. Then Duck Benton tromped down hard on my new sneakers. Everyone 
calls him Duck because he quacks all the time. He and Andrew thought that was 
a riot. 

Then Marnie Rosen jumped up behind me, threw her arms around my neck, 
and climbed on my back. Marnie has curly red hair, freckles all over her face, 
and the most evil grin I ever saw on a kid. “Give me a ride, Steve!” she shouted. 
“I want a ride!” 

“Marnie—get off me!” I cried. I tried to loosen her grip on my neck. She 
was choking me. The Hogs were all laughing now. 

“Marnie—I... can’t... breathe!” I gasped. 

I bent down and tried to throw her off my back. But she hung on even 
tighter. 

Then I felt her lips press against my ear. 

“What are you doing?” I cried. Was she trying to kiss me or something? 

Yuck! She spit her bubble gum into my ear. 

Then, laughing like a crazed fiend, she hopped off me and went running 



across the grass, her curly red hair bouncing behind her. 

“Give me a break! ” I cried angrily. The purple gum stuck in my ear. It took 
me a while to scrape it all out. 

By the time I finished, they had started a practice game. 

Have you ever watched six-year-olds play soccer? It’s chase and kick, chase 
and kick. Everybody chase the ball. Everybody try to kick it. 

I try to teach them positions. I try to teach them how to pass the ball to each 
other. I try to teach them teamwork. But all they want to do is chase and kick, 
chase and kick. 

Which is fine with me. As long as they leave me alone. 

I blow my whistle and act as umpire. And try to keep the game going. 

Andrew Foster kicked a big clump of dirt on my jeans as he ran by. He 
acted as if it were an accident. But I knew it was deliberate. 

Then Duck Benton got into a shoving fight with Johnny Myers. Duck 
watches hockey games on TV with his dad, and he thinks you’re supposed to 
fight. Some days Duck doesn’t chase after the ball at all. He just fights. 

I let them chase-and-kick, chase-and-kick for an hour. Then I blew the 
whistle to call practice to an end. 

Not a bad practice. Only one bloody nose. And that was a win because it 
wasn’t mine! 

“Okay, Hogs—see you tomorrow!” I shouted. I started to trot off the 
playground. Their parents or baby-sitters would be waiting for them in front of 
the school. 

Then I saw that a bunch of the kids had formed a tight circle in the middle 
of the field. They all wore grins on their faces, so I decided I’d better see what 
they were up to. 

“What’s going on, guys?” I asked, trotting back to them. 

Some kids stepped back, and I spotted a soccer ball on the grass. Marnie 
Rosen smiled at me through her freckles. “Hey, Steve, can you kick a goal from 
here?” 

The other kids stepped away from the ball. I glanced to the goal. It was 
really far away, at least half the field. 

“What’s the joke?” I demanded. 

Mamie’s grin faded. “No joke. Can you kick a goal from here?” 

“No way!” Duck Benton called. 

“Steve can do it,” I heard Johnny Myers say. “Steve can kick it farther than 



that.” 

“No way!” Duck insisted. “It’s too far even for a sixth grader.” 

“Hey—that’s an easy goal,” I bragged. “Why don’t you give me something 
hard to do?” 

Every once in a while I have to do something to impress them. Just to prove 
that I’m better than they are. 

So I moved up behind the ball. I stopped about eight or ten steps back. 
Gave myself plenty of running room. 

“Okay, guys, watch how a pro does it!” I cried. 

I ran up to the ball. Got plenty of leg behind it. 

Gave a tremendous kick. 

Froze for a second. 

And then let out a long, high wail of horror. 



2 


On my way home a few minutes later, I passed my friend Chuck’s house. Chuck 
came running down the gravel driveway to greet me. 

I didn’t really feel like talking to anyone. Not even my friend. 

But there he was. So what could I do? 

“Yo—Steve!” He stopped halfway down the driveway. “What happened? 
Why are you limping?” 

“Concrete,” I groaned. 

He pulled off his black-and-red Cubs cap and scratched his thick brown 
hair. “Huh?” 

“Concrete,” I repeated weakly. “The kids had a concrete soccer ball.” 

Chuck squinted at me. I could see he still didn’t understand. 

“One of the kids lives across the street. He had his friends help roll a ball of 
concrete to the school,” I explained. “Painted white and black to look like a 
soccer ball. Solid concrete. They had it there on the field. They asked me to kick 
a goal and—and—” My voice caught in my throat. I couldn’t finish. 

I hobbled over to the big beech tree beside Chuck’s driveway and leaned 
back against its cold, white trunk. 

“Wow. That’s not a very funny joke,” Chuck said, replacing his cap on his 
head. 

“Tell me about it,” I groaned. “I think I broke every bone in my foot. Even 
some bones I don’t have.” 

“Those kids are animals /” Chuck declared. 

I groaned and mbbed my aching foot. It wasn’t really broken. But it hurt. A 
lot. I shifted my backpack on my shoulders and leaned back against the tree. 

“Know what I’d like to do?” I told Chuck. 

“Pay them back?” 

“You’re right!” I replied. “How did you know?” 

“Lucky guess.” He stepped up beside me. I could see that he was thinking 
hard. Chuck always scrunches up his face when he’s trying to think. 

“It’s almost Halloween,” he said finally. “Maybe we could think of some 
way to scare them. I mean, really scare them.” His dark eyes lit up with 
excitement. 



“Well... maybe.” I hesitated. “They’re just little kids. I don’t want to do 
anything mean.” 

My backpack felt weird—too full. I pulled it off my shoulder and lowered it 
to the ground. 

I leaned over and unzipped it. 

And about ten million feathers came floating out. 

“Those kids—!” Chuck exclaimed. 

I pulled open the backpack. All of my notebooks, all of my textbooks— 
covered in sticky feathers. Those animals had glued feathers to my books. 

I tossed down the backpack and turned to Chuck. “Maybe I do want to do 
something mean!” I growled. 

A few days later, Chuck and I were walking home from the playground. It was a 
cold, windy afternoon. Dark storm clouds rose up in the distance. 

The storm clouds were too late to help me. I had just finished afternoon 
practice with the Hogs. 

It hadn’t been a bad practice. It hadn’t been a good practice, either. 

Just as we started, Andrew Foster lowered his head and came at me full 
speed. He weighs about a thousand pounds, and he has a very hard head. He 
plowed into my stomach and knocked the wind out of me. 

I rolled around on the ground for a few minutes, groaning and choking and 
gasping. The kids thought it was pretty funny. Andrew claimed it was an 
accident. 

I’m going to get you guys back, I vowed to myself. I don’t know how. But 
I’m going to get you guys. 

Then Marnie Rosen jumped on my back and tore the collar off my new 
winter coat. 

Chuck met me after practice. He’d started doing that now. He knew that 
after one hour with the first graders, I usually needed help getting home. 

“I hate them,” I muttered. “Do you know how to spell hate? H-O-G-S.” My 
torn coat collar flapped in the swirling wind. 

“Why don’t you make all of them practice with a concrete ball?” Chuck 
suggested. He adjusted his Cubs cap over his hair. “No. Wait. I’ve got it. Let 
them take turns being the ball!” 

“No. No good,” I replied, shaking my head. The sky darkened. The trees 
shook, sending a shower of dead leaves down around us. 



My sneakers crunched over the leaves. “I don’t want to hurt them,” I told 
Chuck. “I just want to scare them. I just want to scare them to death.” 

The wind blew colder. I felt a cold drop of rain on my forehead. 

As we crossed the street, I noticed two girls from our class walking on the 
other side. I recognized Sabrina Mason’s black ponytail swinging behind her as 
she hurried along the sidewalk. And next to her, I recognized her friend Carly 
Beth Caldwell. 

“Hey—!” I started to call out to them, but I stopped. 

An idea flashed into my mind. 

Seeing Carly Beth, I knew how to scare those first graders. 

Seeing Carly Beth, I knew exactly what I wanted to do. 



3 


I started to call to the girls. But Chuck clamped his hand over my mouth and 
dragged me behind a wide tree. 

“Hey—get your clammy paws off me. What’s the big idea?” I cried when 
he finally pulled his hand away. 

He pushed me against the rough bark of the tree trunk. “Ssshhh. They 
haven’t seen us.” He motioned with his eyes toward the two girls. 

“So?” 

“So we can sneak up and scare them,” Chuck whispered, his dark eyes 
practically glowing with evil excitement. “Let’s make Carly Beth scream.” 

“You mean for old times’ sake?” 

Chuck nodded, grinning. 

For many years, making Carly Beth scream had been our hobby. That’s 
because she was a really good screamer, and she would scream at just about 
anything. 

One day in the lunchroom last year, Chuck tucked a worm inside his turkey 
sandwich. Then he gave the sandwich to Carly Beth. 

She took one bite and knew that something tasted a little weird. When 
Chuck showed her the big bite she had taken out of the worm, Carly Beth 
screamed for a week. 

Chuck and I took bets on who could scare Carly Beth the most and who 
could make her scream. I guess it was kind of mean. But it was funny too. 

And sometimes when you know that people are real easy to scare, you have 
no choice. You have to scare them as often as you can. 

Anyway, that all changed last Halloween. 

Last Halloween Chuck and I had a horrible scare. Carly Beth wore the most 
frightening mask I had ever seen. It wasn’t a mask. It was like a living face. 

It was so ugly, so real. It glared at us with evil, living eyes. Its mouth 
sneered at us with real lips. The skin glowed a sick green. And Carly Beth’s 
normally soft voice burst out in a terrifying animal growl. 

Chuck and I ran for our lives. 

No joke. We were terrified. 

We ran for blocks, screaming the whole way. It was the worst night of my 



life. 


Everything changed after that. 

Nearly a whole year has gone by, and we haven’t tried to scare Carly Beth 
once. I don’t think Carly Beth can be scared. Not anymore. 

After last Halloween, I don’t think anything scares her. 

She is totally fearless. I haven’t heard her shriek or scream once the entire 

year. 

So I didn’t want to try to scare her now. I needed to talk to her. About that 
scary mask of hers. 

But Chuck kept pressing me back against the tree trunk. “Come on, Steve,” 
he whispered. “They don’t see us. We’ll duck down behind the hedges and get 
ahead of them. Then when they come by, we’ll jump out and grab them.” 

“I don’t really—” I started. But I could see that Chuck had his heart set on 
scaring Carly Beth and Sabrina. So I let him pull me down out of sight. 

A light rain had started to fall. The gusting wind blew the raindrops into my 
face. I crept along the hedge, bent low, following Chuck. 

We passed by the girls and kept moving. I could hear Sabrina’s laugh 
behind us. I heard Carly Beth say something else. Then Sabrina laughed again. 

I wondered what they were talking about. I stopped to glance through the 
hedge. Carly Beth had a weird expression on her face. Her dark eyes stared 
straight ahead. She was moving stiffly. She had the collar of her blue down 
jacket pulled up high around her face. 

I ducked down low again as the girls came closer. I turned and saw that 
Chuck and I were standing on the wide front lawn of the old Carpenter mansion. 

I felt a chill as I stared across the weed-choked lawn at the gloomy old 
house, covered in a deep darkness. Everyone said that the house was haunted— 
haunted by people who had been murdered inside it a hundred years ago. 

I don’t believe in ghosts. But I don’t like standing so close to the creepy old 
Carpenter mansion, either. 

I pulled Chuck into the empty lot next door. Rain pattered the ground. I 
wiped raindrops off my eyebrows. 

Carly Beth and Sabrina were only a few yards away. I could hear Sabrina 
talking excitedly about something. But I couldn’t make out her words. 

Chuck turned to me, an evil grin spreading across his face. “Ready?” he 
whispered. “Let’s get ’em!” 

We leaped to our feet. Then we both jumped out, screaming at the top of 



our lungs. 

Sabrina gasped in shock. Her mouth dropped to her knees. Her hands flew 
up in the air. 

Carly Beth stared at me. 

Then her head tilted against the blue jacket collar—tilted and fell. 

Her head fell off her shoulders. 

It dropped to the ground and bounced onto the grass. 

Sabrina lowered her eyes to the ground. She gaped at Carly Beth’s fallen 
head in disbelief. 

Then Sabrina’s hands began to flail the air crazily. She opened her mouth in 
a scream of horror. And screamed and screamed and screamed. 



4 


I swallowed hard. My knees started to buckle. 

Carly Beth’s head stared up at me from the grass. Sabrina’s shrieks rang in 
my ears. 

And then I heard soft laughter. Laughter from inside Carly Beth’s jacket. 

I saw a clump of brown hair poke up through the raised collar. And then 
Carly Beth’s laughing face shot up from under the jacket. 

Sabrina stopped her wild cries and started to laugh. 

“Gotcha!” Carly Beth cried. She and Sabrina fell all over each other, 
laughing like lunatics. 

“Oh, wow,” Chuck groaned. 

My knees were still shaking. I don’t think I had taken a breath the whole 

time. 

I bent down and picked up Carly Beth’s head. Some kind of dummy head. 
A sculpture, I guess. I rolled it around between my hands. It was amazing. It 
looked just like her. 

“It’s plaster of Paris,” Carly Beth explained, grabbing it away from me. 
“My mom made it.” 

“But—it’s so real-looking!” I choked out. 

She grinned. “Mom is getting pretty good. She keeps doing my head over 
and over. This is one of her best.” 

“It’s okay. But it didn’t fool us,” Chuck said. 

“Yeah. We knew it was a fake,” I quickly agreed. But my voice cracked 
when I said it. I was still kind of in shock. 

Sabrina shook her head. Her black ponytail waved behind her. Sabrina is 
very tall, taller than Chuck and me. Carly Beth is a shrimp. She only comes up to 
Sabrina’s shoulder. 

“You should have seen the looks on your faces!” Sabrina exclaimed. “I 
thought your heads were going to fall off!” 

The two girls hugged each other again and had another good laugh. 

“We saw you a mile away,” Carly Beth said, twirling the head in her hands. 
“Luckily, I brought this head in to show off in art class today. So I pulled my 
jacket over my head, and Sabrina tucked the plaster head into the collar.” 



“You guys scare pretty easy,” Sabrina smirked. 

“We weren’t scared. Really,” Chuck insisted. “We were just playing along.” 

I wanted to change the subject. The girls would talk all day and night about 
how dumb Chuck and I were. If we let them. I didn’t want to let them. 

The rain kept pattering down, blown by the gusting wind. I shivered. We 
were all getting pretty wet. 

“Carly Beth, you know that mask you wore last Halloween? Where did you 
get it?” I asked. I tried to sound casual. I didn’t want her to think it was any big 
deal. 

She hugged her plaster head against the front of her jacket. “Huh? What 
mask?” 

I groaned. She is such a jerk sometimes! 

“Remember that really scary mask you had last Halloween? Where did you 
get it?” 

She and Sabrina exchanged glances. Then Carly Beth said, “I don’t 
remember.” 

“Give me a break!” I groaned. 

“No. Really—” she insisted. 

“You remember,” Chuck told her. “You just don’t want to tell.” 

I knew why Carly Beth didn’t want to tell. She was probably planning to 
get another truly terrifying mask at the same store for this Halloween. She 
wanted to be the scariest kid in town. She didn’t want me to be scary too. 

I turned to Sabrina. “Do you know where she bought that mask?” 

Sabrina made a zipper motion over her lips. “I’m not telling, Steve.” 

“You don’t want to know,” Carly Beth declared, still hugging the head. 
“That mask was too frightening.” 

“You just want to be scarier than me,” I replied angrily. “But I need a really 
scary mask this year, Carly Beth. There are some kids I want to scare and—” 

“I’m serious, Steve,” Carly Beth interrupted. “There was something totally 
weird about the mask. It wasn’t just a mask. It came alive. It clamped onto my 
head, and I couldn’t get it off. The mask was haunted or something.” 

“Ha-ha,” I said, rolling my eyes. 

“She’s telling the truth!” Sabrina cried, narrowing her dark eyes at me. 

“The mask was evil,” Carly Beth continued. “It started giving me orders. It 
started talking all by itself, in a horrible, harsh growl. I couldn’t control it. And I 
couldn’t get it off. It was attached to my head! I—I was so scared!” 



“Oh, wow,” Chuck murmured, shaking his head. “You’ve got a good 
imagination, Carly Beth.” 

“Good story,” I agreed. “Save it for English class.” 

“But it’s the truth!” Carly Beth cried. 

“You just don’t want me to be scary,” I grumbled. “But I need a good, scary 
mask like that one. Come on,” I begged. “Tell.” 

“Tell us,” Chuck insisted. 

“Tell,” I repeated, trying to sound tough. 

“No way,” Carly Beth replied, shaking her fake round, little head. “Let’s get 
home. It’s really raining hard.” 

“Not till you tell!” I cried. I stepped in front of her to block her path. 

“Grab the head!” Chuck cried. 

I grabbed the plaster head from Carly Beth’s hands. 

“Give it back!” she shrieked. She swiped at it, but I swung it out of her 
reach. Then I tossed it to Chuck. 

He backed away. Sabrina chased after him. “Give that back to her!” 

“We’ll give it back when you tell us where you bought that mask!” I told 
Carly Beth. 

“No way!” she cried. 

Chuck tossed the head to me. Carly Beth made a wild grab for it. But I 
caught it and heaved it back to Chuck. 

“Give it back! Come on!” Carly Beth cried, running after Chuck. “My mom 
made that. If it gets messed up, she’ll kill me!” 

“Then tell me where you bought the mask!” I insisted. 

Chuck tossed the head to me. Sabrina jumped up and batted it down. She 
made a wild dive for it, but I got there first. I picked it up off the grass and 
heaved it back to Chuck. 

“Stop it! Give it back!” 

Both girls were screaming angrily. But Chuck and I kept up our game of 
keep-away. 

Carly Beth made a frantic leap for the head and fell on her stomach onto the 
grass. When she stood up, the front of her jacket and her jeans were soaked, and 
she had grass stains on her forehead. 

“Tell!” I insisted, holding the head high in the air. “Tell, and you can have 
the head back!” 

She growled at me. 



“Okay,” I warned her. “I guess I have to drop-kick it onto that roof.” 

I turned toward the house at the top of the lawn. Then I held the head in 
front of me in both hands and pretended I was going to punt it onto the roof. 

“Okay, okay!” Carly Beth cried. “Don’t kick it, Steve.” 

I kept the head in front of me. “Where did you get the mask?” 

“You know that weird little party store a couple of blocks from school?” 

I nodded. I had seen the store, but I had never gone in. 

“That’s where I bought it. There’s a back room. It was filled with weird, 
ugly masks. That’s where I got mine.” 

“All right!” I cried happily. I handed Carly Beth back her head. 

“You guys are creeps,” Sabrina muttered, pulling her collar up against the 
rain. She pushed me out of the way and wiped the grass stain off Carly Beth’s 
forehead. 

“I really didn’t want to tell you,” Carly Beth moaned. “I wasn’t making that 
story up about the mask. It was so terrifying.” 

“Yeah. Sure.” I rolled my eyes again. 

“Please, don’t go there!” Carly Beth begged. She grabbed my arm tightly. 
“Please, Steve. Please, don’t go to that party store!” 

I pulled my arm away. I narrowed my eyes at her. And I laughed. 

Too bad I didn’t take her seriously. 

Too bad I didn’t listen to her. 

It might have saved me from a night of endless horror. 



5 


“Get off me! Get off me, Mamie! I mean it!” I shouted. 

The little redheaded pest hung onto my back, laughing and digging her 
pudgy fingers into my neck. Why did she think I was some kind of thrill ride? 

“Get off! This is my good sweater!” I cried. “If you wreck it—” 

She laughed even harder. 

It had rained all night and all morning. But the clouds had parted at 
lunchtime. Now the sky was blue and clear. I had no choice. I had to hold soccer 
practice for the Hogs. 

Across the playground, I saw Duck Benton fighting with Andrew Foster. 
Andrew picked up the soccer ball and heaved it with all his might into Duck’s 
stomach. 

Duck’s mouth shot open. He let out a whoosh of breath, and a huge wad of 
bubblegum went flying into the air. 

“Get off!” I pleaded with Marnie. I tried spinning and twirling as fast as I 
could, trying to throw her off my back. I knew if anything happened to this 
sweater, Mom would have a fit. 

You might ask why I was wearing my best, blue wool sweater to soccer 
practice. Good question. 

The answer is: It was Class Photo Day. And Mom wanted me to take a 
really good picture to send to all my aunts and uncles. She made me wear the 
sweater. And she made me shampoo my hair before school and not wear my 
Orlando Magic cap over it. 

So I looked like a jerk all day. And now, here was soccer practice. And I 
had forgotten to bring a sweatshirt or something to replace my good sweater. 

“Whoooooa!” Marnie gave me a final kick in the side as she hopped off my 

back. 

I pulled down my sweater, hoping it wasn’t stretched too badly. I heard 
angry shouts and glanced up to find Andrew and Duck swinging their fists at 
each other and butting heads across the field. 

I reached for my whistle. 

And grabbed air. 

Marnie had swiped it. She held it high above her head and ran, laughing, 



over the grass. 

“Hey, you—!” I screamed, chasing after the little thief. 

I took three steps—and my sneakers slid in the mud. My feet flew out from 
under me. With an angry cry, I fell forward. And landed on my stomach in deep, 
wet mud. 

“Noooooo!” I let out a howl of dread. “Please. Nooooo!” 

But when I pulled myself up, the mud came with me. My entire body was 
caked in thick, wet mud. My beautiful blue sweater? It was now an ugly brown 
sweater. 

With a sad groan, I sank back onto the ground. I just wanted to disappear, to 
sink from sight into the big mud hole. 

My faithful team, the Horrible Hogs, were laughing and hooting. They 
thought it was a riot. Nice kids, huh? 

At least my mud dive had stopped Andrew and Duck from fighting. 

The mud weighed me down as I climbed slowly to my feet. I felt like 
Andrew. I felt as if I weighed a thousand pounds. Maybe I did! 

I wiped mud off my eyes with both hands—and saw Chuck standing over 
me. He tsk-tsked a few times. “You look really bad, man.” 

“Tell me something I don’t know,” I muttered. 

“Why did you do that?” he asked. 

I squinted through two inches of mud at him. “Excuse me?” 

“You look like a Mud Monster or something.” Chuck snickered. 

“Ha-ha,” I said glumly. 

“You told me to meet you here, Steve. You said we were going straight to 
that party store to buy the you-know-what.” 

He glanced back at my team of first graders. They weren’t listening to our 
conversation. They were too busy flinging mud balls at each other. 

I scooped my hand along the front of my sweater and scraped off about ten 
pounds of glop. “I... uh... I think I’d better go home after practice and get 
changed first,” I told Chuck. 

Talk about your long afternoons! 

I had to break up the mud ball fight. Then I had to hand over all of the little 
angels to their parents and baby-sitters. 

Then I had to explain to their angry parents and baby-sitters why they had 
practiced mud ball fighting instead of soccer. 



I crept home. Chuck waited for me outside. I hid my mud-caked clothes in 
the back of my closet. I didn’t have time to explain to my mom. 

Then I changed into a clean pair of jeans and a gray-and-red Georgetown 
Hoyas sweatshirt one of my uncles had sent me. I don’t know anything about the 
Hoyas. I don’t even know what a Hoya is. But it is a cool sweatshirt. 

I pulled my cap down over my mud-drenched hair. Then I hurried to meet 
Chuck. 

“Steve—is that you?” Mom called from the den. 

“No, it isn’t!” I called back. I closed the front door behind me and ran down 
the driveway before she could stop me from going out again. 

I was really eager to find that party store and check out the weird masks. So 
eager, I forgot to bring any money with me. 

Chuck and I walked two blocks before I reached into my jeans pocket and 
realized it was empty. We jogged back to my house, and I crept up to my room 
once again. 

“This just isn’t my day,” I muttered to myself. 

But I knew that buying a really gross and frightening mask would instantly 
cheer me up. Then I could go ahead with my plan to terrify the Hogs, to get my 
revenge. 

Revenge! 

What a beautiful word. 

When I’m older and have my own car, that’s what I want it to say on my 
license plate. 

I pulled all of my allowance money out of the dresser drawer where I hide 
it. I counted it quickly—about twenty-five dollars. Then I jammed the bills into 
my jeans pocket and hurried back downstairs. 

“Steve—are you going out again?” Mom called from the den. 

“Be right back!” I shouted. I slammed the front door and ran down the 
driveway to meet Chuck. 

Our sneakers slid over fat, wet leaves as we walked. A pale full moon hung 
low over the trees. 

The streets and sidewalks still glistened from all the rain. 

Chuck had his hands stuffed into the pockets of his hooded sweatshirt. He 
leaned into the wind as we walked. “I’m going to be late for dinner,” he 
grumbled. “I’m probably going to get into major trouble.” 

“It’ll be worth it,” I told him, feeling a little more cheerful. We crossed the 



street that led to the party store. A small grocery stood on the corner. Other small 
shops came into view. 

“I can’t wait to see these masks!” I exclaimed. “If I find one just half as 
scary as Carly Beth’s...” 

There it stood! In the darkness above a small, square store, I could make out 
the sign: THE PARTY PLACE. 

“Let’s check it out!” I cried. 

I leaped over a fire hydrant. 

Flew over the sidewalk. Up to the big front window. 

And peered in the window. 



6 


“Oh, wow!” Chuck cried breathlessly, stepping up beside me. 

We both pressed our faces against the window glass and stared in. 

Stared into total darkness. 

“Is it closed?” Chuck asked softly. “Maybe it’s just closed for the night.” 

I uttered an unhappy sigh. “No way. It’s closed for good. The store is gone.” 

Peering through the dust-smeared glass, I could see empty shelves and 
display racks inside. A tall metal shelf lay on its side across the center aisle. A 
trash basket, overflowing with paper and empty soda cans, stood on top of the 
counter. 

“There’s no 'Out of Business’ sign on the door,” Chuck said. He’s a good 
friend. He saw how disappointed I looked. He was trying to stay hopeful. 

“It’s empty.” I sighed. “Totally cleaned out. It isn’t going to open up again 
tomorrow morning.” 

“Yeah. Guess you’re right,” Chuck murmured. 

He slapped my shoulder. “Yo—snap out of it. You’ll find a scary mask at 
some other store.” 

I pushed myself away from the window. “I wanted one like Carly Beth’s,” I 
complained. “You remember that mask. You remember those glowing eyes, 
right? And the way the mouth moved. The way it growled at us with those long, 
dripping fangs. It was so gross. And it looked totally real. Like a real monster!” 

“They probably have masks like that at K-Mart,” Chuck said. 

“Give me a break,” I muttered. I kicked at a candy wrapper that blew across 
the sidewalk. 

A car rumbled past slowly. Its headlights rolled over the front of the store, 
lighting up the bare shelves, the empty counters inside. 

“We’d better get home,” Chuck warned, pulling me away from the store. 
“I’m not allowed to wander around town after dark.” 

He said something else, but I didn’t hear him. I was still picturing Carly 
Beth’s mask, still unable to get over my disappointment. 

“You don’t understand how important this is to me,” I told Chuck. “Those 
first graders are ruining my life. I have to pay them back this Halloween. I have 
to.” 



“They’re just first graders,” he replied. 

“No, they’re not. They’re monsters. Vicious, man-eating monsters.” 

“Maybe we can make a scary mask,” Chuck suggested. “You know. Out of 
papier-mache and stuff.” 

I didn’t even bother to answer him. Chuck is a good guy, but sometimes he 
has the dumbest ideas ever thought up by a human. 

I could just see Marnie Rosen and Duck Benton when I popped out on 
Halloween. “Ooh, we’re scared! We’re scared! Papier-mache!” 

“I’m hungry,” Chuck grumbled. “Come on, Steve. Let’s get out of here.” 

“Yeah. Okay,” I agreed. I started to follow him down the sidewalk—then 
stopped. 

Another car had turned onto the street. Its headlights rolled over a narrow 
alley beside the party store. 

“Whoa, Chuck! Check it out!” I grabbed the shoulder of his sweatshirt and 
spun him around. “Look!” I pointed into the alley. “That door is open!” 

“Huh? What door?” 

I dragged Chuck into the alley. A large black trapdoor in the sidewalk had 
been left up. It caught the light from a streetlamp on the sidewalk. 

Chuck and I peered in through the door. Steep concrete steps led down to a 
basement. 

The basement of the party store! 

Chuck turned to me, a confused expression on his face. “So? They left the 
basement door open. So what?” 

I grabbed the open trapdoor and leaned over the steps, squinting into the 
dim light from the streetlamp. “There are boxes down there. A whole bunch of 
cartons.” 

He still didn’t understand. 

“Maybe all the masks and costumes and party things are packed up in those 
cartons. Maybe the stuff hasn’t been shipped away yet.” 

“Whoa. What are you thinking about?” Chuck demanded. “You’re not 
going down there—are you? You’re not going to sneak down to that dark 
basement and try to steal a mask —are you ? ” 

I didn’t answer him. 

I was already halfway down the stairs. 



7 


My heart began to pound as I made my way down. The steps were narrow and 
slippery. Slick from all the rain. 

“Ohh!” I let out a cry as one foot slid over the concrete step and I felt 
myself start to fall. I shot out both hands in search of a railing—but there wasn’t 
one. 

I landed on the hard basement floor with a loud thud —luckily, on both feet. 
Feeling shaken, I took a deep breath and held it. 

Then I turned back to the trapdoor and called up to Chuck. “I’m okay. Get 
down here.” 

In the light from the streetlamp, I could see his unhappy face peering down 
at me. “I—I really don’t want to,” he called softly. 

“Chuck—hurry,” I insisted. “Get out of the alley. If someone drives by and 
sees you, they’ll get suspicious.” 

“But it’s so late, Steve,” he whined. “And it isn’t right to break into 
basements and—” 

“We’re not breaking in,” I called up to him impatiently. “The door was open 
—right? Hurry up. If the two of us search the boxes, we can do it in five 
minutes.” 

He leaned down over the opening. “It’s too dark,” he complained. “We 
don’t have a flashlight or anything.” 

“I can see fine,” I replied. “Get down here. You’re wasting time.” 

“But it’s against the law...” he started. Then I saw his expression change. 
His mouth dropped open as car headlights washed over him. With a low gasp, 
Chuck ducked through the opening, and bolted down the stairs. 

He stepped up close beside me, breathing hard. “I don’t think they saw me.” 
His eyes darted around the large basement. “It’s too dark, Steve. Let’s go home.” 

“Give your eyes a chance to adjust,” I instructed him. “I can see okay.” 

I gazed slowly around the basement. It was bigger than I’d thought. I 
couldn’t really see the walls. They were hidden in darkness. 

The ceiling was low, only a foot or two over our heads. Even in the dim 
light, I could see the thick cobwebs in the rafters. 

The cartons had been stacked in two rows near the steps. Somewhere way 



across the room, I could hear the steady drip drip drip of water. 

“Oh!” I jumped when I heard a clattering sound. 

It took me a few seconds to figure out that it was the wind blowing against 
the metal trapdoor up in the alley. 

I made my way over to the nearest carton and bent over to examine it. The 
flaps were folded over each other. But the carton wasn’t sealed. 

“Let’s have a look,” I murmured, reaching for the flaps. 

Chuck had his arms crossed tightly in front of his chest. “This isn’t right,” 
he protested. “It’s stealing.” 

“We haven’t taken anything,” I protested. “And even if we do find a good, 
scary mask and take it, we’ll just borrow it. We’ll return it after Halloween.” 

“Aren’t you... a little scared?” Chuck asked softly, his eyes moving all 
around the dark room. 

I nodded. “Yeah. I’m a little scared,” I admitted. “It’s cold and creepy down 
here.” The wind clattered the trapdoor above us again. I heard the faint drip of 
water against the concrete floor. 

“Let’s hurry,” I urged. “Help me.” 

Chuck stepped beside me, but he just stared down at the box and didn’t try 
to help. 

I pulled open the first carton, pushed back the cardboard flaps, and peered 
inside. “What is this stuff?” I reached in and pulled out a cone-shaped party hat. 
The box was stuffed with party hats. 

“This is great!” I whispered happily to Chuck. 

I dropped the hat back in the box. “I was right. All the stuff from the store is 
packed up down here. We’re going to find the scary masks. I know we will!” 

Cartons were stacked on top of cartons. I pulled down another one and 
started to pull it open. “Chuck, you take the bottom one,” I instructed. 

He hesitantly reached for the box. “I have a bad feeling about this, Steve,” 
he murmured. 

“Just find the masks,” I replied. My heart was thudding. My hands were 
shaking as I pulled open the second carton. I was really excited. 

“This one is filled with candles,” Chuck reported. 

My carton had piles of party place mats, napkins, and paper cups. “Keep 
going,” I urged. “The masks have got to be down here.” 

Above our heads, the wind shook the trapdoor. I hoped it wouldn’t suddenly 
slam shut on us. I didn’t want to be trapped down in this cold basement in the 



dark. 


Chuck and I slid two more cartons into the pale square of light from 
outside. My carton was taped shut. I struggled to pull off the tape. 

I stopped when I heard the creaking sound above my head. 

Creaking floorboards? 

I froze, my hands over the carton. “What was that?” I whispered. 

Chuck frowned at me. “What was what?” 

“Didn’t you hear that noise upstairs? It sounded like a footstep.” 

Chuck shook his head. “I didn’t hear anything.” 

I listened for a few more seconds. Silence now. So I went back to work on 
the carton. 

I pulled it open and peered eagerly inside. 

Greeting cards. Dozens of greeting cards. I sifted through them. Birthday 
cards. Valentines. A whole carton of cards. 

Disappointed, I shoved the carton to the side and turned to Chuck. “Any 
luck?” 

“Not yet. Let’s see what’s in this one.” 

He pulled open the carton with both hands. Then he leaned over it and 
peered inside. 

“Oh, yuck! ” he cried. 



8 


“It’s so gross!” Chuck groaned. 

“What is? What?” I demanded. I leaped over my carton to get to him. 

“Check it out.” A grin spread over Chuck’s face as he pulled something out 
of the carton. 

I gasped as I saw an ugly purple face with broken teeth and a long, fat 
worm poking out of a hole in its cheek. 

“You found them!” I shrieked. 

Chuck let out a gleeful laugh. “A whole carton of masks! And they’re all 
totally gross!” 

I grabbed the ugly mask from his hand and studied it. “Hey—it feels 
warm!” 

It was so cold down in that basement. Why did the mask feel warm? 

The worm bobbed out of the ugly face, as if it were alive. 

I dropped the mask, plunged my hand into the carton, and pulled out 
another one. A disgusting pig face with thick gobs of green stuff dripping from 
its snout. 

“That one looks like Carly Beth!” Chuck joked. 

“These are scarier than the mask Carly Beth had last year,” I said. 

I pulled another one from the box. A furry animal face, sort of like a gorilla, 
except that it had two long pointed fangs sliding down past its chin. 

I dropped it and grabbed up another mask. Then another. A hideous bald 
head with one eye hanging down by a thread and an arrow through the forehead. 

I tossed it to Chuck and pulled out another one. 

“This is amazing!” I cried happily. “These will terrify those kids. How will 
I ever choose the best one?” 

Chuck let out a disgusted groan and dropped the mask he was holding into 
the box. “They feel like real skin. They’re so warm.” 

I didn’t pay any attention to him. I was busy digging down to the bottom of 
the carton. I wanted to check out each mask before I made my choice. 

I wanted the scariest, grossest mask in the box. I wanted a mask that would 
give those first graders more nightmares than they had given me! 

I pulled out a mask of a girl’s face with a lizard’s head poking out from her 



mouth. 

No. Not scary enough. 

I pulled out a mask of a snarling wolf, its lips pulled back to show two 
jagged rows of pointed teeth. 

Too wimpy. 

I pulled out an ugly mask of a leering old man, his mouth twisted in an evil 
grin. One long, crooked tooth stuck down over his lower lip. 

The mask had long, stringy yellow hair that drooped down over the old 
man’s craggy forehead. I could see big black spiders climbing in the hair and in 
the ears. A chunk of forehead was missing, revealing a patch of gray skull 
underneath. 

Not bad, I thought. 

This one even smelled bad! 

I started to put it back when I heard a creaking sound again. 

Louder this time. 

The ceiling above my head groaned. 

I gasped. It really sounded like a footstep. Someone walking around up 
there. 

But the store had appeared dark and empty. Chuck and I had both stared 
into the window for a long time. If anyone was hiding there in the darkness, we 
would have seen them. 

Another creak made me suck in a mouthful of air. 

I froze, listening hard. I could hear the steady drip drip of water across the 
dark basement. I could hear the trapdoor rattling outside. 

And I could hear my own shallow breathing. 

The ceiling squeaked. I swallowed hard. 

It’s an old building, I told myself. All old buildings squeak and creak. 
Especially on a windy night. 

A scraping footstep made me gasp out loud. 

“Chuck—did you hear that?” 

Gripping the old-man mask, I listened hard. 

“Did you hear that?” I whispered. “Do you think someone else is in the 
building?” 

Silence. 

Another scraping footstep. 

“Chuck?” I whispered. “Hey—Chuck?” 



My heart pounding, I turned to him. 
“Chuck?” 

He was gone. 



9 


“Chuck?” 

A stab of fear made my breath catch in my throat. 

I heard the hard thud of sneakers against concrete, and turned to the stairs. 
In the dim light, I saw Chuck disappear out through the trapdoor. 

As soon as he reached the alley, he poked his head back in. “Steve—get 
out!” he called down in a loud whisper. “Hurry! Get out of there!” 

Too late. 

A ceiling light flashed on. 

As I blinked against the bright light, I saw a man move quickly across the 
basement. He swept along the wall, pulled a long, black cord—and the trapdoor 
slammed shut with a deafening clang. 

“Oh!” I uttered a weak cry as he turned angrily to me. 

I was trapped. 

Chuck got out. But I was trapped. Trapped in the basement with this guy. 

And what a weird-looking guy! To begin with, he wore a long black cape 
that swept behind him as he crossed the room to me. 

Is that a Halloween costume? I wondered. 

Does he wear a black cape all the time? 

Beneath the billowing cape, he wore a black suit, kind of old-fashioned 
looking. 

He had shiny black hair, parted in the middle and slicked down with some 
kind of hair grease, and a pencil-thin, black mustache that curled over his upper 
lip. 

As he stood over me, his black eyes glowed like two burning coals. 

Like vampire eyes! I thought. 

My whole body was shaking. I gripped the sides of the carton and tried to 
return his stare. 

Trapped, I thought, waiting for him to speak. Trapped with a vampire. 

“What are you doing here?” he asked finally. He pushed back his cape and 
crossed his arms in front of him. The glowing eyes glared down at me sternly. 

“Uh... just looking at masks,” I managed to choke out. I was still on my 



knees on the floor. I knew that my legs were shaking too hard to stand up. 

“The store is closed,” the man said through gritted teeth. 

“I know,” I admitted, lowering my eyes to the floor. “I—” 

“The store went out of business. We’re closed for good.” 

“I... I’m sorry,” I murmured. 

Was he going to let me go? What was he going to do with me? 

If I started to scream, no one would hear me. 

Would Chuck try to get help for me? Or was he halfway home by now? 

“I live upstairs,” the man explained, still glaring at me angrily. “I heard 
scraping sounds down here. Boxes being moved around. I was going to call the 
police.” 

“I’m not a burglar,” I blurted out. “Please don’t call the police. The trapdoor 
was open and my friend and I came down.” 

His eyes moved quickly around the room. “Your friend?” 

“He ran away when he heard you coming,” I told him. “I just wanted to see 
if there were any masks. You know. For Halloween. I wasn’t going to steal 
anything. I just—” 

“But the store is closed,” the man repeated. He glanced at the open carton in 
front of me. “Those masks are very special. They’re not for sale.” 

“N-not for sale?” I stammered. 

“You shouldn’t break into stores,” the man replied, shaking his head. His 
slicked-down hair gleamed under the low ceiling light. “How old are you?” 

I drew a blank. My mouth dropped open, but no answer came out. I was so 
terrified, I forgot how old I was! 

“Twelve,” I answered finally. I took a deep breath, trying to calm myself. 

“Twelve and you’re already breaking into stores,” the man said softly. 

“I don’t break into stores!” I protested. “I mean, I never did before. I came 
to buy a mask. Look. I brought money.” 

I jammed my trembling hand into my jeans pocket and pulled out the wad 
of bills. “Twenty-five dollars,” I said, holding up the money so he could see it. 
“Here. Is it enough for one of these masks?” 

He rubbed his chin. “I told you, young man. These masks are special. They 
cannot be sold. Believe me—you do not want one of these.” 

“But I do!” I cried. “They’re awesome! They’re the best masks I’ve ever 
seen. Halloween is only a few days away. I need one. I need one desperately. 
Please—!” 



“No!” the man shouted sharply. “Not for sale.” 

“But why not?” I wailed. 

He eyed me thoughtfully. “Too real,” he replied. “The masks are too real.” 

“But that’s why they’re so awesome!” I exclaimed. “Please? Please? Take 
my money. Here.” I pushed the wad of bills toward him. 

He didn’t reply. Instead, he turned away. His cape swirled behind him. 
“Come with me, young man.” 

“Huh? Where?” Cold fear ran down my back. I was still holding the money 
out in front of me. 

“Come upstairs with me. I’m going to call your parents.” 

“No!” I shrieked. “Please—!” 

If my mom and dad found out I got caught breaking into the basement of a 
store, they would go totally ballistic! They’d ground me for life! I’d miss this 
Halloween—and the next thirty Halloweens to come! 

The man eyed me coldly. “I don’t want to call the police,” he said softly. 
“I’d rather call your parents.” 

“Please...” I murmured again, climbing to my feet. 

I suddenly had an idea. 

I could make a run for it. 

I glanced quickly at the concrete stairs leading up to the trapdoor. If I took 
off—and really flew—I could get up those stairs before the man could reach me. 

The trapdoor was shut. But it probably wasn’t locked. I could push it open 
from underneath, and just keep running. 

I glanced again at the steps. It was worth a try, I decided. 

I took a deep breath and held it. 

Then I silently counted to three. 

One... two... THREE! 

On three, I took off. My heart thudded louder than my sneakers on the hard 
floor. But I made it to the stairs in about a second and a half! 

“Hey—stop!” I heard the caped man cry out in surprise. I could hear his 
heavy steps as he plunged after me. 

“Stop, young man! Where are you going?” 

I didn’t slow down or glance back. 

I took the stairs two at a time. 

Yes! Yes! Em getting away! I thought. 

As I reached the top, I shot out both hands—and pushed up on the trapdoor 



with all of my might. 
It didn’t budge. 



“Ohh!” I let out a terrified moan. 

The caped man had reached the bottom of the steps. I could practically feel 
his breath on the back of my neck. 

The door has got to open! I told myself. It’s got to! 

I took a deep breath. Then I heaved my shoulder against the door. I uttered 
a desperate groan as I pushed. 

Pushed. 

The caped man made a grab for me. 

I felt his hand brush my ankle. 

I kicked the hand away. Then I shoved my shoulder hard against the 
trapdoor. 

And it opened. 

“Yes!” A happy cry escaped my throat as I scrambled out into the alley. 

The cold air rushed against my hot face. I stumbled over something hard—a 
stone or a brick. I didn’t stop to look. I ran through the narrow alley, to the 
sidewalk in front of the store. 

My eyes swept back and forth. I searched for Chuck. No sign of him. 

Had the caped man followed me out the trapdoor? Was he chasing after me? 

I turned back to the alley. And saw only darkness. 

Then I took off, running fast, my feet practically flying over the pavement. I 
shot across the street. Bright lights washed over me. A car horn honked, making 
me jump about a mile! The car roared past. 

“Hey, Steve—!” 

Chuck stepped out from behind a tall evergreen shrub. “You made it!” 

“Yeah. I made it,” I replied, gasping for breath. 

“I—I didn’t know what to do!” he stammered. 

I shook my head. “So you just stood here?” 

“I waited for you,” he said. “I was kind of scared.” 

Big help. 

“Get going,” I urged, glancing back across the street. “He may be chasing 



We ran side by side, our breath steaming up into the cold night air. The 
houses and dark lawns whirred past in a gray-black blur. We didn’t say another 
word to each other. 

Three blocks later, I slowed down as we reached Chuck’s house. I leaned 
over and tried to shake away the sharp pain in my side. I always get a pain like 
that when I run more than a few blocks. 

“See you!” Chuck cried breathlessly. “Sorry you didn’t get your mask.” 

“Yeah. It’s too bad,” I murmured glumly. 

I watched him run along the side of his house until he disappeared around 
the back. Then I took a deep breath and took off again, jogging now, toward my 
house on the next block. 

My heart was still racing in my chest. But I was starting to feel calmer. The 
man in the black cape didn’t chase after us. In a few seconds, I would be safe in 
my own home. 

Halfway up our driveway, I slowed to a stop. The pain in my side had faded 
to a dull ache. 

I stepped into the yellow light from the front porch. I could hear my dog 
Sparky barking inside the house. Sparky knew I was home. 

As I climbed onto the front stoop, a smile crossed my face. 

Avery wide smile. 

I was pleased with myself. In fact, I was overjoyed. I felt like leaping in the 
air. Or maybe doing a wild, crazy dance. Or crowing like a rooster. Or tilting 
back my head and howling at the moon. 

The evening had been a total success. 

I didn’t tell Chuck. I didn’t want Chuck to know. 

But when the caped man clicked on the basement light—in that split second 
before he saw me and I saw him—I grabbed a mask from the carton. And I 
shoved it under my sweatshirt. 

I had a mask! 

It hadn’t been easy. In fact, being trapped in that eerie basement with that 
strange man had been the scariest time of my life. 

But I had a mask! Safely tucked under my sweatshirt. 

I could feel it against my chest as I ran. And I could feel it now, warm 
against my skin as I reached for the front door. 

I was so happy. So pleased with myself. 

And then I felt the mask start to move. 



And I screamed as something sharp bit into my chest. 



11 


I grabbed the front of my sweatshirt. I pressed both hands tight against the bulge 
of the mask. 

“Whoa,” I murmured, holding the mask in place under the sweatshirt. 

Stop imagining things, Steve, I scolded myself. 

Calm down. The mask started to slip down your chest. That’s all. It wasn’t 
moving. It didn’t bite you. 

Get in the house, I ordered myself. Hide the thing in a drawer in your room. 
And pull yourself together. 

Why was I so nervous? 

The scary part was over. I had escaped with one of the great masks. Now it 
was my turn to scare other people. Why was I standing there scaring myself? 

Still holding the front of my sweatshirt, I pushed open the front door and 
stepped into the house. “Down, boy! Get down, Sparky!” I cried as the little 
black terrier greeted me. He leaped high off the floor, bouncing off me, barking 
and whining as if he hadn’t seen me in twenty years. 

“Get down, Sparky! Down!” 

I wanted to sneak into the house, run up to my room, and stash the mask 
away before my parents heard me return. But Sparky ruined that plan. 

“Steve—is that you?” Mom stormed into the living room, a fretful frown on 
her face. She glared at me and angrily blew a curl of blond hair from in front of 
her eyes. “Where on earth were you? Your father and I went ahead and ate 
dinner. Yours is ice-cold by now!” 

“Sorry, Mom,” I said, still holding the front of my sweatshirt to keep the 
mask in place as I tried to push Sparky away. 

The lock of hair fell back over her forehead. She blew at it again. “Well? 
Where were you?” 

“I... well...” 

Think fast, Steve. 

You can’t tell her you sneaked out to steal a Halloween mask from the 
basement of a store. 

“I had to help Chuck with something,” I finally answered. 

Sure, it was a lie. But it wasn’t a serious lie. 



I’m usually a very honest guy. But right then, all I cared about was having 
the mask! I had it, and I was desperate to get it out from under my sweatshirt and 
hidden in a safe place in my room. 

“Well, you should have told me where you were going,” Mom scolded. 
“Your father went out to do the grocery shopping. But he’s very angry, too. You 
should have been home for dinner.” 

I lowered my head. “Sorry, Mom.” 

Sparky gazed up at me. Was he staring at the bulge in my sweatshirt? 

If the dog could see it, Mom could see it too. 

“I’ll take off my coat and come right down,” I told her. 

I didn’t give her a chance to reply. I spun around, leaped onto the stairs, and 
ran up two at a time. I flew down the hall, burst into my room, and slammed the 
door behind me. 

I took a few seconds to catch my breath. I listened hard, making sure that 
Mom hadn’t followed me upstairs. 

No. I could hear her banging around in the kitchen, getting my dinner ready. 

I couldn’t wait to check out the mask! 

Which one did I take? When the light came on in the store basement, I 
grabbed a mask without looking. I stuffed it under my sweatshirt before I could 
see it. 

Now I eagerly reached under the sweatshirt and pulled out my hard-won 
prize. 

“Wow!” I raised it in both hands and admired it. 

The old-man mask. I took the mask of the creepy old man. 

I smoothed out its long strings of yellow-white hair. Holding it by the big, 
pointy ears, I lifted it in front of my face and examined it closely. 

A single white tooth hung down over the bottom lip. A brown wormhole 
poked through the center of the tooth. 

Outside on the front stoop, the big tooth had scraped my chest, I realized. 
That’s what made me think the mask was biting me. 

The mouth was twisted in an evil sneer. The lips curled like two brown 
worms. 

The long nose had gobs of green dripping from each nostril. A square patch 
of skin was missing just above the forehead. I could see gray skull bone in the 
hole. 

The whole face was creased and lined. The flesh was a sickly green. The 



skin appeared to be peeling off the face. Dark scabs bulged from the sunken 
cheeks. 

Black spiders appeared to crawl through the stringy, yellow hair. Spiders 
poked out of the two ears. 

“Yuck!” I cried. 

Was I holding the scariest Halloween mask in the world? 

No. In the universe! 

I began to feel a little queasy just holding it. I rubbed the scabby cheek with 
one finger. The skin felt warm, like real skin. 

“Heh-heh-heh.” I practiced laughing like an old man. “Heh-heh-heh.” I 
tried a dry cackle. 

Look out, Hogs! I told myself. When I come leaping out at you on 
Halloween night in this mask, you will jump out of your skins! 

“Heh-heh-heh.” 

I raked the ugly, long hair back over the head. My fingers bumped over the 
spiders tangled in the hair. The spiders didn’t feel rubbery. They felt soft and 
warm like the skin. 

I gazed down happily at the disgusting, old face. It sneered back at me. The 
brown worm lips quivered. 

Should I try it on? 

I carried it over to the mirror on my closet door. I was dying to see what I’d 
look like. 

I’ll slip it on for just a second, I decided. Long enough to see how ugly and 
frightening I’d look. 

Holding it in both hands, I raised the mask over my head. 

Then slowly, carefully... very carefully... I began to pull the mask down, 
down, down over my face. 



12 


“Steve—!” 

Mom’s loud cry from downstairs startled me. 

“Steve—where are you? Get down here for your dinner!” 

“Coming!” I shouted back. I lowered the mask. I’d try it on later, I decided. 

I walked quickly to the dresser and pulled open my sock drawer. Smoothing 
the long, spidery hair over the ugly face, I set the mask down carefully in the 
drawer. Then I hid it under several pairs of socks and closed the drawer. 

I hurried down to the kitchen. Mom had a salad on the table and a plate of 
warmed-up macaroni-and-cheese. 

My stomach growled. I suddenly realized that I was starved! I sat down, 
pushed the salad aside, and started forking up the macaroni as fast as I could. 

I glanced down to see Sparky staring up at me with his big, black, soulful 
eyes. He saw me looking at him and tilted his head. 

“Sparky,” I said, “you don’t like macaroni—remember?” 

He tilted his head the other way, as if trying to understand. I slipped him a 
couple of noodles. He sniffed them and left them on the floor. 

Behind me, Mom busily cleaned out the refrigerator, making room for the 
groceries Dad was out buying. I was dying to tell her about the scary mask. I 
wanted to show it to her. Maybe put it on and make her scream. 

But I knew she’d ask too many questions about where I bought it, and how 
much it cost, and how much of my allowance I used up to pay for it. 

All questions I couldn’t answer. 

So I bit my tongue and forced myself not to blurt out the exciting news that 
I wouldn’t have to be a hobo again this Halloween. 

That was my costume for the past five years. A hobo. Actually, it wasn’t 
much of a costume. I wore one of Dad’s baggy old suits with patches on the 
pants. Mom rubbed charcoal on my face to make me look dirty. And I carried a 
knapsack on a fishing pole over my shoulder. 

Bor-ring! 

This Halloween will be different, I promised myself. This Halloween will 
not be boring. 

I was so happy. As I sat gobbling down macaroni-and-cheese, I couldn’t get 



that creepy mask out of my mind. 

I’m not going to tell anyone about it, I decided. I’m going to scare everyone 
I know. 

I’m not even going to tell Chuck. After all, he ran away and left me down in 
that dark basement. 

Look out, Chuckie Boy! I told myself, grinning so hard some noodles 
slipped out of my mouth. I’m going to get you too! 



13 


I had soccer practice for my first graders after school the next day. It was a 
sunny, cold October afternoon. The sunlight made the yellow and brown falling 
leaves glitter like gold. Puffs of white cloud floated like soft cotton across the 
blue sky. 

Everything looked beautiful to me. Because Halloween was only one day 
away. 

I was staring up at the clouds when Marnie Rosen drop-kicked the soccer 
ball into my stomach. 

I grabbed my stomach and doubled over in pain. Duck Benton and two 
other kids jumped on my back and drove me facedown into the mud. 

I didn’t care. 

In fact, I laughed. 

Because I knew that I had only one day to wait. 

I tried to show them how to pass. As I ran along the sidelines, Andrew 
Foster stuck out his foot. I tripped and went sailing into the bike rack. A 
handlebar caught me under the chin as I fell, and I actually saw stars. 

But I didn’t care. 

I picked myself up with a grin on my face. 

Because I knew a secret. I knew an evil secret that the kids didn’t know. I 
knew that trick-or-treat night was going to be a special treat for me! 

At four o’clock, I called an end to practice. I was too weak to blow the 
whistle. My clothes were soaked with mud, I walked with a limp, and I had cuts 
and bruises in twenty different places. 

A typical practice with the Horrible Hogs. 

But did I care? 

You know the answer. 

I gathered them in a circle around me. They were shoving each other, and 
pulling hair, and calling each other horrible names. I told you—they’re total 
animals. 

I raised my hands to quiet them down. “Let’s have a special Hogs’ 
Halloween party tomorrow,” I suggested. 

“YAAAY!” they cheered. 



“We’ll meet in our costumes after practice,” I continued. “The whole team. 
And we’ll all go trick-or-treating together. I’ll take you.” 

“YAAY!” they cheered again. 

“So tell your parents to drop you off,” I told them. “This is going to be our 
special party. We’ll meet in front of the old Carpenter mansion.” 

Silence. This time they didn’t cheer. 

“Why do we have to meet there?” Andrew asked. 

“Isn’t that old house supposed to be haunted?” Marnie asked softly. 

“That place is too creepy,” Duck added. 

I narrowed my eyes at them, challenging them. “You guys aren’t scared — 
are you?” I demanded. 

Silence. They exchanged nervous glances. 

“Well? Are you all too wimpy to meet me there?” I asked. 

“No way!” Marnie insisted. 

“No way! We’re not scared of a stupid old house!” 

They all began to tell me how brave they were. They all said they would 
meet me there. 

“I saw a ghost once,” Johnny Myers bragged. “Behind my garage. I shouted 
‘Boo!’ and it floated away.” 

These kids are animals, but they have great imaginations. 

The other kids all started teasing Johnny. He stuck to his story. He insisted 
he saw a ghost. So they pushed him to the ground and got his jacket all muddy. 

“Hey, Steve—what are you going to be for Halloween?” Marnie asked. 

“Yeah. What’s your costume?” Andrew demanded. 

“He’s going to be a pile of toxic waste!” someone joked. 

“No. He’s going to be a ballerina!” someone else declared. 

They all hooted and jeered. 

Go ahead and laugh, guys, I thought. Have a good laugh now. Because 
when you see me on Halloween, I’ll be the only one laughing. 

“Uh... I’m going to be a hobo,” I told them. “You’ll recognize me. I’ll be 
wearing a tattered old suit. And my face will be all dirty. I’ll be dressed like a 
bum.” 

“You are a bum!” one of my loyal team members shouted. 

More wild laughing and hooting. More shoving and hair-pulling and 
wrestling on the ground. 

Luckily, their parents and baby-sitters showed up to take them home. I 



watched them go with a big smile on my face. A big, evil smile. 

Then I grabbed up my backpack and hurried home. I ran all the way. I was 
eager to take another look at my mask. 

Chuck stepped out as I jogged past his house. “Hey, Steve... what’s up?” he 
called. 

“Not much!” I called back. “Later, man!” 

I kept running. I didn’t want to hang out with Chuck. I needed to check out 
that mask. I needed to remind myself of how awesome it was. How totally 
terrifying. 

I burst through the front door. Then I ran straight up the stairs to my room, 
taking the stairs three at a time. 

I raced down the long hall. I turned into my room and tossed my backpack 
onto the bed. Then I hurried across the room to my dresser and eagerly jerked 
open my sock drawer. 

“Huh?” 

I peered inside. With a trembling hand, I shoved away several balled-up 
pairs of socks. 

The mask was gone. 



14 


“No!” 

I began pawing frantically through the drawer, tossing all the socks onto the 
floor. 

No mask. Gone. 

The balled-up socks bounced all over the room. My heart was bouncing too. 

Then I remembered that I had moved the mask. Before school that morning. 
I was worried that my mom might do laundry. And open my sock drawer. And 
see it there. 

So I had shoved it to the back of my closet, behind my rolled-up sleeping 

bag. 

Letting out a long whoosh of air, I dropped to my hands and knees. I 
quickly collected all the socks and stuffed them back into the drawer. Then I 
opened the closet door and pulled down the mask from the top shelf. 

Steve, you’ve got to calm down, man, I told myself. It’s just a Halloween 
mask, after all. You’ve got to stop scaring yourself like that. 

Sometimes it helps to scold yourself, to give yourself advice. 

I started to feel a little calmer. I smoothed back the stringy yellow hair and 
mbbed my hand over the craggy, scab-covered skin of the mask. 

The brown lips sneered at me. I poked my little finger through the 
disgusting wormhole in the tooth. I squeezed the spiders hiding inside the ears. 

“This is so cool! ” I declared out loud. 

I couldn’t wait a whole day till Halloween. I had to show it to someone. 

No. I had to scare someone with it. 

Chuck’s face popped instantly into my mind. My old friend Chuck was the 
perfect victim. I knew that he was home. I had seen him there a few minutes ago. 

Wow. Will he be shocked! I told myself. Chuck thought that I ran out of that 
store basement empty-handed. When I sneak into his house and creep up on him 
wearing this disgusting mask, he’ll faint! 

I glanced at the clock. I had an hour before dinnertime. Mom and Dad 
weren’t even home yet. 

Yes, I’ll do it! I decided. 

“Heh-heh-heh.” I practiced my old-man cackle. “Heh-heh-heh.” The 



scariest, most evil cackle I could do. 

Then I grasped the wrinkled neck of the mask in both hands. Stepping in 
front of the mirror, I raised the mask over my head. 

And tugged it down. 

It slid easily over my hair. It felt soft and warm as I pulled it over my face. 

Down over my ears. Over my cheeks. 

Down, down. 

Until I felt the top of the mask settle onto my hair. I twisted it until I could 
see out of the narrow eyeholes. 

Then I lowered my hands to my sides and stepped closer to the mirror to 
check myself out. 

So warm. 

I suddenly felt too warm. 

The rubbery mask pressed tightly against my cheeks and forehead. 

Warmer. 

“Hey—!” I cried out as my face began to burn. 

So hot... 

So hard to breathe. 

“Hey... what is happening to me?” 



15 


I could feel the skin of the mask tightening around my face. 

My cheeks burned. A sour odor swept over me, choked me. 

I gagged. I sucked in a deep breath through my mouth. But the mask was so 
tight, I could hardly breathe. 

I grabbed the ears with both hands. The outside of the mask felt normal. But 
inside, I was burning up! 

I tried to tug the mask off. But it wouldn’t slide up. The hot rubber stuck to 
my face. 

I groaned as the putrid odor washed over me again. 

I tugged harder. The mask didn’t budge. 

I gasped for breath. 

I grabbed the stringy hair—and pulled. I slid my hands under the chin—and 
pushed. 

“Ohhh.” A sick groan escaped my throat. My hands dropped limply to my 
sides. 

I suddenly felt so tired. So weak. 

So totally weak. 

Every breath was a struggle. I bent over. My body began to tremble. 

I felt so weak. And old. 

Old. 

Was this how an old man felt? 

Calm down, Steve, I scolded myself. It’s just a rubber mask. It fits a little 
too snug, that’s all. 

It’s stuck to your face. But you’ll pull it off, and you’ll be fine. 

Calm down. Count to ten. Then examine the mask in the mirror. Grab it 
from the bottom, and you’ll be able to pull it up. No problem. 

I counted to ten. Then I stepped up close to the mirror. 

I nearly cried out when I saw my reflection. The mask really was awesome! 
So real. So gross. 

With my eyes staring out of it, the face seemed to come alive. The brown 
lips sneered back at me. When I moved my lips, they appeared to move too. The 



green gobs of goo trembled inside the big nostrils. The spiders appeared to be 
crawling through the tangled, yellow hair. 

It’s only a mask. A really cool mask, I said to myself. 

I started to feel a little calmer. 

But then a cackle escaped my throat. “Heh-heh-heh.” 

Not my cackle! 

Not in my voice! An old man’s cackle. 

How did that happen? How did I utter such a strange sound? 

I clamped my lips shut. I didn’t want to make that sound again. 
“Heh-heh-heh.” 

Another frightening cackle! In a shrill, high-pitched voice. More like a dry 
croak than a laugh. 

I tightened my jaw. Clenched my teeth. Held my breath so I wouldn’t 
cackle again. 

“Heh-heh-heh.” 

I wasn’t doing it! 

Who was cackling like that? 

Where was the shrill, dry laugh coming from? 

I gaped at the old face in the mirror, suddenly frozen in fear. 

And then I felt a strong hand grab my leg. 



16 


With a choked gasp, I whirled around. 

And peered down through the tight eyeholes of the mask. 

I instantly saw that it wasn’t a hand on my leg. It was teeth. 

Dog teeth. 

“Sparky—it’s you!” I cried. But my voice came out in a dry whisper. 

Sparky backed away. 

I cleared my throat and tried again. “Don’t be afraid, Sparky. It’s only me.” 
My voice! It sounded more like a dry cough. 

It sounded like my grandpa! 

I had an old man’s face—and an old man’s voice. 

And I felt so tired. So totally weak and tired. 

As I reached to pet Sparky, my arms drooped as if they weighed a thousand 
pounds. Both of my knees cracked as I bent down. 

The dog gazed up at me and tilted his head. His short stub of a tail wagged 
furiously. 

“Don’t be scared, Sparky,” I croaked. “I was just trying out this mask. 
Pretty scary, huh?” 

I lowered my face and tried to pick Sparky up. 

But as I leaned forward, I could see the dog’s eyes go wide with terror. 
Sparky let out a shrill yip —jumped out of my hands, and went tearing across the 
room, barking at the top of his lungs. Barking in total fright. 

“Sparky—it’s me!” I cried. “I know I sound different. But it’s me—Steve!” 

I wanted to chase after him. But my legs felt so weak, and my knees refused 
to bend. 

It took me three tries to pull myself up to a standing position. My head 
ached. I was too out-of-breath to run after Sparky. 

Too late, anyway. I could hear him barking his head off, already downstairs. 
“Weird,” I muttered, rubbing my aching back. I hobbled back to the mirror. 
Sparky has seen masks before. He knew it was me. Why was he so scared? Was 
it my weird voice? 

How had the mask dried up my voice? And why did I suddenly feel one 



hundred and ten? 

At least, my face no longer felt on fire. But the skin of the mask still 
pressed so tightly against my face, I could barely move my lips. 

I have to get out of this thing, I decided. Chuck will have to wait until 
Halloween night to be scared out of his skull. 

I raised both hands to my neck and searched for the bottom of the mask. My 
neck felt craggy and wrinkled. The skin was dry. 

Where was the bottom of the mask? 

I leaned close to the mirror on my closet door and narrowed my eyes at my 
reflection. I stared hard at the neck of the mask. 

Wrinkled skin flecked with ugly brown patches. 

But where was the bottom? Where did the mask end and my neck begin? 

My hands began to tremble as they fumbled up and down my throat. I could 
feel my heart begin to race. 

I moved my hands slowly, carefully, up and down my neck. 

Again. And again. 

Finally, I let my hands drop to my side and uttered a weary, frightened sigh. 

There was no mask bottom. No line at all between the mask and my neck. 

The wrinkled, spotted mask skin had become my skin. 

“Nooooo! Nooooo!” I wailed in my old man’s voice. I had to get the thing 
off me! There had to be a way! 

I squeezed the cheeks of the mask and tugged with all my might. 

“Ow!” Sharp pain ran down my face. 

I pulled the hair. That sent a wave of pain shooting down my scalp. 
Frantically, I grabbed at the mask, slapped at it, pulled it, tore at it. 

I felt each move. Each slap and tug made my skin hurt. Every touch hurt me 
as if it were my own skin. 

“The eyeholes!” I croaked. 

I reached for the eyeholes. Maybe I could slip my fingers inside the 
eyeholes and lift the mask off. 

My hands fumbled around my eyes. My trembling fingers searched, poking 
and rubbing. 

No eyeholes. There were no eyeholes. 

The rutted, scab-covered skin had melted onto me. It had become my skin. 

The ugly, disgusting mask had become my face! 

I looked like a horrifying, spider-infested, decaying old man. And I felt as 



old and weird as I looked! 

My throat tightened in terror. I sank against the mirror, pressing my ugly, 
craggy forehead against the glass. 

I shut my eyes. What can I do? What can I do? The question repeated like 
an unhappy chant in my mind. 

And then I heard the front door slam. And I heard Mom’s voice at the 
bottom of the stairway. “Steve—are you home? Steve?” 

What can I do? What can I do? The question repeated and repeated. 

“Steve?” Mom called. “Come down here. I want to show you something.” 

No! I thought, swallowing hard, my dry throat making a sick clicking 
sound. No! I can’t come down! I can’t! I don’t want you to see me like this! 

“Oh, never mind!” Mom called. “I’m coming up there!” 



17 


I heard her footsteps on the stairs. 

A shock of panic made me lurch toward the door. I nearly fell over. My old 
legs were stiff, too stiff to move quickly. 

I hobbled to the door and closed it just as Mom reached the second floor. 
Then I leaned against the door, my hand on my throbbing chest, trying to catch 
my breath. 

Trying to think. Trying to decide what to say. 

I couldn’t let her see me like this. I couldn’t let her see the mask. She’d start 
asking questions. And I couldn’t let her see how the mask had changed me. 

A few seconds later, she knocked gently on the door. “Steve, are you in 
there? What are you doing?” 

“Uh... nothing, Mom.” 

“Well, may I come in? I brought you something.” 

“Not right now,” I croaked. 

Please don’t open the door! I begged silently. Please don’t come into my 
room! 

“Steve, why do you sound so strange?” Mom demanded. “What’s wrong 
with your voice?” 

“Uh...” Think fast, Steve. Think fast. 

“Uh... sore throat, Mom. A really bad sore throat.” 

“Let me take a look at you. Are you sick?” Glancing down, I saw the 
doorknob turn. 

“No!” I screamed, pressing my back against the door. 

“You’re not sick?” 

“I mean, yes,” I croaked in my shaky, old-man voice. “I’m not feeling well, 
Mom. I’m going to lie down for a while. I’ll come down later, okay?” 

I stared at the doorknob, listening to her breathing on the other side of the 
door. “Steve, I bought you those black-and-white cookies that you love. Your 
favorites. Do you want one? Maybe it’ll make you feel better.” 

My stomach growled. Those cookies are my favorites. Dripping with 
chocolate icing on one side and vanilla icing on the other. “Maybe later,” I 
moaned. 



“But I drove two miles out of my way to buy them for you,” Mom said. 

“Later. I’m really not feeling well.” I was telling the truth. My temples 
throbbed. My whole body ached. I felt so weak, I could barely stand up. 

“I’ll call you for dinner,” Mom said. I listened to her make her way back 
down the stairs. Then I hobbled over to the bed and slumped my old man’s body 
down onto the edge. 

“Now what?” I asked myself. I pressed my hands against my scabby 
cheeks. “How do I get out of this thing?” 

I shut my tired, burning eyes and tried to think. After a few minutes, Carly 
Beth’s face floated into my mind. 

“Yes!” I croaked. “Carly Beth is the one person in the world who can help 

me.” 

Carly Beth wore a mask from the same store last Halloween. Maybe the 
same thing happened to her. Maybe her mask stuck to her face and changed her. 

She got her mask off. She will know how I can get my mask off too. 

The phone stood across the room beside the computer on my desk. 
Normally, I’d be over there in three seconds. But it took me three minutes of 
gmnting and straining to get my old body to stand up. Then it took another five 
minutes to drag myself across the room. 

By the time I dropped into my desk chair, I was exhausted. It took all of my 
strength to raise my hand and punch in Carly Beth’s number on the phone. 

I can’t go on like this, I told myself. She’s got to help me. She’s got to know 
how to get this mask off. 

After the third ring, Carly Beth’s father answered. “Hello?” 

“Hi... uh... could I speak to Carly Beth?” I choked out. 

A silence. Then: “Who is this?” Mr. Caldwell sounded confused. 

“It’s me,” I answered. “Is Carly Beth there?” 

“Is this one of her teachers?” he demanded. 

“No. It’s Steve. I—” 

“I’m sorry, sir. I can’t hear you very well. Can you speak up? Why did you 
wish to speak to my daughter? Perhaps I can help you?” 

“No... I—” 

I heard Mr. Caldwell speak softly to someone else at his house. “It’s an old 
man, asking for Carly Beth. I can barely hear him. He won’t say who he is.” 

He came back on the phone. “Are you one of her teachers, sir? Where do 
you know my daughter from?” 



“She’s my friend,” I croaked. 

I heard him turn again to someone else in the room, probably Carly Beth’s 
mom. He muffled the phone with his hand, but I heard what he said: “I think it’s 
a nut. Some kind of crank call.” 

He returned to me. “Sorry, sir. My daughter can’t come to the phone.” He 
hung up. 

I sat there listening to the buzz in my spider-filled ear. 

Now what? I asked myself. 

Now what? 



18 


I must have fallen asleep in the desk chair. I don’t know how long I slept. 

I was awakened by Dad pounding on my bedroom door. “Steve— 
dinnertime!” he called in. 

I sat up with a start. My back ached from sleeping sitting up. I rubbed my 
wrinkled neck, trying to rub away the stiffness. 

“Steve—are you coming down to dinner?” Dad asked. 

“I—I’m not very hungry,” I croaked. “I’m going to take a nap, Dad. I think 
I’m getting sick.” 

“Hey, don’t get sick the night before Halloween,” he replied. “You don’t 
want to miss out on trick-or-treating.” 

“I—I’ll be okay,” I stammered in my hoarse voice. “If I get a good night’s 
sleep, I’ll be fine.” 

Yeah. Right. 

I’ll be one hundred and fifty. But I’ll be fine. 

I let out an unhappy sigh. 

“We’ll bring you up some soup or something later,” Dad called in. Then he 
disappeared downstairs. 

I stared at the phone. Should I try Carly Beth again? 

No, I decided. She won’t believe it’s me. She’ll hang up the way her father 
did. 

I scratched my ears. I could feel the spiders crackling around in them. I 
touched the bare spot on top of my head where the skin was ripped apart. The 
skin was soft and wet. I could feel the patch of hard skull that showed through. 

“Ohhhh.” Another long sigh. 

I’ve got to think, I told myself. I’ve got to think of a way out of this. 

But I felt so weary, so sleepy. 

I pulled myself up and slumped to the bed. A few seconds later, I fell sound 
asleep. 

I awoke to bright sunlight streaming through my bedroom window. 

I blinked several times, startled by the bright morning light. Morning. 
Halloween morning. 



It should have been a happy day. An exciting day. But instead... 

I reached up with both hands and touched the sides of my face. 

Smooth! 

My cheeks felt smooth. Soft and smooth. 

I rubbed my ears. Small ears. My ears. No spiders! 

I raised both hands to my hair. And touched my hair. Not the stringy, old 
man’s hair. 

Hesitantly, carefully, I touched the torn spot on top of my head where the 
skull showed through. 

Not there! 

“I’m me again!” I cried out loud. I let out a long whoop of joy. 

No old man’s mask. No old man’s voice. No old man’s body. 

It had all been a dream. A horrible nightmare. 

Still blinking in the light, I gazed happily around my room. 

“I dreamed it all!” I cried. 

Going down to that dark store basement. Pawing through the carton of 
masks. The man in the cape. The mask of the old man. Sneaking it home and 
trying it on. 

The mask sticking to my skin. Refusing to come off. 

All a dream! 

All a horrifying nightmare that was over now. 

I was so happy! This had to be the happiest moment of my life. 

I started to jump out of bed. I wanted to leap around my room, to dance for 

joy- 

But then my eyes blinked open. And I woke up for real... 



19 


...I woke up for real. 

And knew that I had only dreamed that it was all a dream! 

I grabbed my face—and felt the craggy wrinkles, the heavy scabs. I rubbed 
my nose and brushed the green gobs stuck in my nostrils. 

I had dreamed that the mask didn’t exist. 

I had dreamed that I had my own face back. My own voice and body. 

All a dream. A wonderful dream. 

But now I was really awake—and really in trouble. 

I pulled myself up and brushed the stringy, yellow hair out of my eyes. “I 
have to tell Mom and Dad,” I decided. “I can’t spend another day like this.” 

I had slept in my clothes. I staggered to my feet and dragged my old body 
to the door. I tugged open the door—and saw a note taped on the other side. 

Dear Steve, 

Hope you’re feeling better. Mom and I had to go visit your Aunt Helen this 
morning. We left early to beat the traffic. We’ll be home in time to help you with 
your hobo costume. Love, Dad 

My hobo costume? 

Not this year. Besides, since I was now at least one hundred and fifty, I was 
a little old to go trick-or-treating! 

Crinkling the note in my hand, I made the long trip down to the kitchen, 
holding on to the banister, taking one step at a time. I had a sudden craving for a 
steaming bowl of oatmeal and a cup of hot milk. 

“Oh, no!” I croaked. I was starting to think like an old man! 

I made myself a breakfast of orange juice and corn flakes. I carried it to the 
table and sat down to eat. The juice glass felt strange against my fat, brown lips. 
And it was almost impossible to chew the cornflakes with just one long, crooked 
tooth. 

“What am I going to do?” I moaned out loud. 

Then, suddenly, I had an answer. 

I decided to go ahead with my plan to terrify the first graders. Why 



shouldn’t I pay back those bratty kids for all the trouble they gave me day after 
day on the soccer field? 

Yes! I decided. When Mom and Dad get home, I’ll greet them and show off 
my old-man costume. They won’t know it isn’t a costume. They’ll think it’s 
really cool. 

Then, later, I’ll go to the spooky old Carpenter mansion to meet the kids. 
And I’ll scare the first graders out of their masks! 

And then what? 

Then I’ll find Carly Beth. It won’t be hard to find her. She’s having a 
Halloween party at her house after trick-or-treating. 

I’ll find Carly Beth and get her to tell me the secret. I’ll get her to show me 
how to remove this horrible mask. 

Then I will be a very happy guy. 

Sitting there alone in the kitchen, struggling to choke down my cornflakes, 
it seemed like a really good plan. 

Too bad it didn’t work out the way I hoped. 



20 


When Mom and Dad returned home that evening, I hobbled downstairs to greet 
them. They both gasped when they saw my ugly, scabby face. 

Mom dropped the bag she was carrying. Her mouth fell open to her knees. 

Dad’s eyes bulged. He stared at me for a long time. Then he burst out 
laughing. “Steve—that is the best costume!” he exclaimed. “Where did you get 
that?” 

“It’s disgusting,” Mom said. “Ohh. I can’t stand that open patch on top of 
the head. And that horrible hole in your tooth.” 

Dad walked in a circle around me, admiring my new look. 

I had put on the patched, black suit that I wore as my hobo costume. And I 
had found one of my grandpa’s old canes in the closet, which I leaned on now. 

“It’s great!” Dad declared, squeezing my shoulder. 

“I bought the mask at a party store,” I croaked. It was almost the truth. 

Mom and Dad exchanged glances. “The old man’s voice is very good,” 
Mom said. “Have you been practicing?” 

“Yes. All day,” I replied. 

“Do you feel better?” Dad asked. “We didn’t want to disturb you this 
morning since you weren’t feeling good. Your mom and I had to leave so 
early...” 

“I’m feeling much better,” I lied. Actually, my legs were trembling and my 
whole body was drenched in a cold sweat. 

Feeling weak, I leaned harder on the cane. 

“Yuck! What’s that in your hair?” Mom cried. 

“Spiders,” I told her. I shuddered. I could feel them crawling over my head 
and in my ears. 

“They’re so real-looking,” Mom declared, raising a hand to her cheek. She 
shook her head. “Are you sure you don’t want to be a hobo? That mask must be 
so hot and uncomfortable.” 

If she only knew how uncomfortable it was! 

“Leave him be,” Dad scolded her. “He looks great. He’s going to terrify 
everyone on the street tonight.” 

I hope so, I thought. I glanced at my watch. Time to get going. 



“Well, he’s terrifying me!” Mom exclaimed. She shut her eyes. “I can’t 
stand to look at you, Steve. Why did you buy something so... so ugly?” 

“I think it’s funny,” Dad told her. He poked a finger at my long tooth. 
“Great mask. Is it rubber?” 

“Yeah. I guess,” I muttered in my quivering, old voice. 

Mom made a disgusted face. “Are you trick-or-treating with Chuck?” 

I yawned. I suddenly felt sleepy. “I promised my soccer players I’d meet 
them,” I croaked. “Then I’m going over to Carly Beth’s house.” 

“Well, don’t stay out too late,” Mom said. “And if that heavy mask gets too 
hot, take it off for a while—okay?” 

I wish! I thought bitterly. 

“See you later,” I said. Leaning on the cane, I began dragging myself to the 
front door. 

Mom and Dad laughed at my funny walk. 

I wasn’t laughing. I wanted to cry. 

Only one thing kept me from breaking down and telling them the truth. 
Only one thing kept me from telling Mom and Dad that I was trapped inside this 
horrible mask, that it had turned me into a weak, ancient creature. 

Revenge. 

I could see the terrified expressions on the faces of my soccer team. And I 
could hear their howls of horror as they went running for their lives. 

That cheered me up and kept me going. 

I grabbed the doorknob and struggled to pull open the front door. 

“Steve—wait!” Dad cried. “My camera. Wait. I want to take a picture.” He 
disappeared in search of the camera. 

“Your trick-or-treat bag!” Mom cried. “You forgot your trick-or-treat bag.” 
She rummaged around in the front closet until she found the shopping bag with 
little pumpkins all over both sides. 

I knew I couldn’t manage the cane and the shopping bag. But I took it from 
her anyway. I’ll throw the bag away when I get outside, I decided. I didn’t plan 
to trick-or-treat. I knew it would take me half an hour just to walk up someone’s 
driveway! 

Dad burst back into the living room. “Say cheese!” he cried, raising his 
little camera. 

I tried to twist my wormy lips into a smile. 

Dad flashed the camera once. Then three more times. 



Blinded by flashbulb lights, I said good-bye and made my way out the door. 
The white circles followed me into the night. I nearly fell off the front stoop. 

I grabbed the railing and waited for my heart to stop pounding. Slowly the 
flashes of light faded from my eyes, and I began to pull myself down the 
driveway. 

It was a clear, cold night. No wind at all. The nearly bare trees stood as still 
as statues. 

I limped onto the sidewalk and started in the direction of the Carpenter 
mansion. There was no moon. But the street appeared brighter than usual. Most 
houses had all of their front lights on to welcome trick-or-treaters. 

I stuffed the shopping bag into a trash can at the foot of our neighbors’ 
driveway. Then I continued down the block, my cane tap-tapping on the 
sidewalk. 

My back began to ache. My old legs trembled. I leaned over the cane, 
breathing hard. 

After half a block, I had to take a rest against a lamppost. Luckily, the 
Carpenter mansion was on the next block. 

As I started on my way, two little girls came hurrying down the sidewalk, 
followed by their father. One girl wore colorful butterfly wings. The other wore 
lots of makeup, a gold crown, and a long fancy dress. 

“Ooh, he’s ugly,” the butterfly whispered to her friend as they came near. 

“Yuck!” I heard the princess reply. “Look at the green stuff in his nose.” 

I leaned close to them, opened my lips in a snarl, and rasped, “Get out of 
my way! ” 

The little girls both let out frightened squeals and took off down the 
sidewalk. Their father flashed me an angry stare and hurried after them. 

“Heh-heh-heh.” An evil cackle escaped my lips. 

Seeing their frightened faces gave me new energy. Leaning on my cane, I 
tap-tapped my way across the street. 

A few minutes later, the Carpenter mansion came into view. The huge old 
house stood dark and empty. Its stone turrets rose up to the purple night sky like 
castle towers. 

Huddled under a streetlamp at the bottom of the weed-choked front yard 
stood my soccer team. My Hogs. My first graders. 

My victims. 

They were all in costumes. I saw Power Rangers and Ninja Turtles. 



Mummies and monsters. Two ghosts, a Beauty, and a Beast. 

But I recognized them anyway. I recognized them because they were 
shoving each other, grabbing at trick-or-treat bags, shouting and fighting. 

I leaned against my cane, watching them from halfway down the block. My 
heart started to pound. My whole body trembled. 

This was it. My big moment. 

“Okay, guys,” I murmured softly to myself. “It’s show time! ” 



21 


I was trembling with excitement as I dragged myself up to them. I stepped into 
the light, my wormy lips twisted in a frightening sneer. 

I stared from one to another, giving them a chance to see my terrifying face. 
Giving them a chance to see the spiders crawling through my hair. The 
wormhole in my tooth. The patch of skull poking up through my rutted scalp. 
They grew quiet. I could feel their eyes on me. I could sense their instant 

fear. 

I opened my mouth to let out a frightening growl that would send them 
running for their mommies. 

But Marnie Rosen, wearing a white bride’s dress and veil, stepped up to me 
before I could get it out. “Can we help you, sir?” she asked. 

“Are you lost?” one of the Power Rangers asked. 

“Do you need directions?” 

“Can we help you get somewhere?” 

No. No! 

This wasn’t going right. This wasn’t going the way I’d planned—the way 
I’d dreamed! 

Marnie took my arm. “Which way were you headed, sir? We’ll walk with 
you. It’s kind of a scary night to be walking around a strange neighborhood.” 

The others pushed in closer, trying to be helpful. 

Trying to be helpful to an old man. An old man they weren’t the least bit 
scared of. 

“Nooooo!” I howled in protest. “I’m the ghost of the Carpenter mansion! 
I’ve come to pay you back for trespassing on my front yard!” 

I tried to shriek—but my voice came out in a weak whisper. I don’t think 
they heard a word I uttered. 

I’ve got to scare them, I told myself. I’ve got to! 

I raised both hands together in the air as if I planned to strangle them all. 

My cane flew out of my grasp. I lost my balance and tottered over 
backward. 

“Ohhhh!” I let out a groan as I hit the sidewalk sitting up. 

They all cried out. But not in fear. They cried out because they were 



worried about me. 

Helping hands reached down to pull me to my feet. 

“Are you okay? Here’s your cane.” I recognized Duck Benton’s scratchy 
voice. 

I heard murmurs of sympathy. “Poor old guy,” someone whispered. 

“Are you hurt?” 

“Can we get you some help?” 

No. No. No. No. No. 

They weren’t terrified. The weren’t the tiniest bit afraid. 

I sank onto the cane. I suddenly felt so weary. So totally exhausted I could 
barely keep my head up. 

Forget about scaring them, Steve, I told myself. You’ve got to get to Carly 
Beth’s house before you collapse. You’ve got to find out from Carly Beth how to 
get the mask off. How to get your old face—and strength—back. 

Marnie was still holding on to my trembling arm. “Where are you trying to 
go?” she asked, her freckled face filled with concern. 

“Uh... do you know where Carly Beth Caldwell’s house is?” I asked in a 
weak croak. 

“It’s on the next block. Across the street. I know her brother,” I heard 
Andrew Foster say. 

“We’ll take you there,” Marnie offered. 

She gripped my arm tighter. A mummy stepped up and took my other arm. 
They began to walk me slowly, gently down the sidewalk. 

I don’t believe this! I thought bitterly. They’re supposed to be scared out of 
their costumes! They should be shrieking and crying by now. 

But instead, they’re helping me walk. 

I sighed. The sad thing was, I felt so tired and weak, I couldn’t have made it 
to Carly Beth’s without their help. 

They led me halfway up her driveway. Then I thanked them and told them I 
could make it the rest of the way. 

I watched them scurry away to go trick-or-treating. “I guess Steve isn’t 
going to show up,” Duck said. 

“He was probably too big a wimp to go out on Halloween night!” Marnie 
joked. 

They all laughed. 

Leaning heavily on the cane, I turned toward Carly Beth’s house. The lights 



were all on. But I couldn’t see anyone in the windows. 

She probably isn’t back from trick-or-treating yet, I decided. 

I heard chattering voices. Footsteps on the gravel drive. 

I wheeled around to see Carly Beth and her friend Sabrina Mason hurrying 
across the lawn, heading toward the house. 

I recognized Carly Beth’s duck costume. She wore it every year. Except for 
last Halloween, when she wore that terrifying mask. 

Sabrina was some kind of superhero. She wore silvery tights and a long 
silvery cape. She had a silvery mask pulled over her face, but I recognized her 
long, black hair. 

“Carly Beth—!” I tried to shout. But her name came out in a choked 
whisper. 

She and Sabrina kept chattering excitedly as they hurried across the lawn. 

“Carly Beth—! Please!” I cried. 

Halfway to the house, they both turned. They saw me. 

Yes! 

“Carly Beth—” I cried. 

She pulled off her duck mask and took a few steps toward the driveway. 
She squinted hard at me. “Who are you?” 

“It’s me!” I cried weakly. “I—” 

“Are you the man who tried to call me earlier?” she demanded coldly. 

“Well... yes,” I croaked. “You see, I need—” 

“Well, leave me alone!” Carly Beth screamed. “Why are you following me? 
Leave me alone, or I’ll get my father!” 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered helplessly. 

The two girls spun away and began jogging to the house. 

Leaving me standing there in the driveway. 

Leaving me all alone. 

Leaving me doomed. 



22 


I let out a bitter wail. “Carly Beth—it’s me! It’s me! Steve!” I cried. “Steve 
Boswell!” 

Did she hear me? 

Yes. 

She and Sabrina had stepped onto the stone walk that led to the front porch. 
In the square of yellow light from the porch, I saw them both turn around. 

“It’s Steve! It’s Steve!” I repeated, my throat aching from my desperate 
cries. 

Slowly, cautiously, both girls made their way back to me. 

“Steve?” Carly Beth stared hard at me, her mouth falling open. 

“Is that a mask?” Sabrina demanded, keeping close to Carly Beth. 

“Yes, it’s a mask,” I croaked. 

“Yuck. It’s disgusting!” Sabrina declared. She pulled off her silver mask to 
see better. “Are those spiders? Yuck!” 

“I need help,” I confessed. “This mask—” 

“You went to the party store!” Carly Beth cried. The duck mask fell to the 
ground. She raised both hands to the sides of her face. “Oh, no! No! Steve, I 
warned you!” 

“Yes. That’s where I got it,” I said, pointing to my hideous face. “I didn’t 
listen to you. I didn’t know.” 

“Steve, I told you not to go there,” Carly Beth said, her expression still tight 
with horror. Hands still pressed against her cheeks. 

“Now the mask won’t come off,” I wailed. “It’s stuck to me. It’s part of me. 
And it’s—it’s turning me into an old, old man. A feeble old man.” 

Carly Beth shook her head sadly. She stared at my ugly face, but didn’t say 
a word. 

“You’ve got to help me,” I pleaded. “You’ve got to help me get this mask 

off.” 

Carly Beth let out a frightened sigh. “Steve—I don’t think I can.” 



23 


I grabbed her duck feathers and held on. “You’ve got to help me, Carly Beth,” I 
begged. “Why won’t you help me?” 

“I want to help you,” she explained. “But I’m not sure I can.” 

“But you had a mask from the same store last Halloween,” I protested. 
“You pulled the mask off. You escaped from it—right?” 

“It can’t be pulled off,” Carly Beth said. “There’s no way to pull it off.” 

Over her shoulder, I saw three kids in costumes at the next house. A woman 
appeared in the doorway. I saw her dropping candy bars into the three trick-or- 
treat bags. 

Some kids are having fun tonight, I thought bitterly. 

I am not having fun tonight. 

I may never have fun again. 

“Come into the house,” Carly Beth suggested. “It’s cold out here. I’ll try to 
explain.” 

I tried to follow them up the driveway. But my legs wobbled like rubber. 
Carly Beth and Sabrina practically had to carry me into her house. They dropped 
me down on the green leather couch in the living room. 

On a table across the room, a carved jack-o’-lantern grinned at me. The 
pumpkin had more teeth than I did! 

Carly Beth dropped down on the couch arm. Sabrina sat on the edge of the 
armchair beside it. She leaned over and sifted through her trick-or-treat bag. 
How could she think of candy at a time like this? 

I turned to Carly Beth. “How do I get the mask off?” I croaked. 

Carly Beth chewed her bottom lip. She raised her eyes to me, her 
expression grim. “It isn’t a mask,” she said softly. 

“Excuse me?” I cried. 

“It isn’t a mask,” she explained. “It’s a real face. A living face. Did you 
meet the man in the black cape?” 

I nodded. 

“He’s some kind of weird scientist, I think. He made the faces. In his lab.” 

“He—he made them?” I stammered. 

Carly Beth nodded solemnly. “They are real, living faces. The man in the 



cape tried to make them good-looking. But something went wrong. They all 
came out ugly. As ugly as the one you’re wearing.” 

“But, Carly Beth—” I started. 

She raised a hand to hush me. “The caped man calls the faces The Unloved. 
No one wants them because they turned out so ugly. They are The Unloved. 
They’re alive. And they attach themselves to anyone who comes near enough.” 

“But how do I get it off?” I cried impatiently. I raised my hands and tugged 
at my rutted, scabby cheeks. “I can’t spend the rest of my life like this. What can 
I do?” 

Carly Beth jumped up and began pacing back and forth in front of Sabrina 
and me. Sabrina unwrapped a Milky Way bar and began chewing it, watching 
Carly Beth pace. 

“The same thing happened to me last Halloween,” Carly Beth said. “I had 
chosen a really ugly mask. It was so scary. It attached itself to my head. And 
then it turned me evil.” 

“And what did you do?” I cried, leaning forward on my cane. 

“I went back to the party store. I found the man in the cape. He told me 
there was only one way to get rid of the mask. It could only be done with a 
symbol of love.” 

“Huh?” I gaped at her. I didn’t understand. 

“I had to find a symbol of love,” Carly Beth continued. “At first, I didn’t 
know what the man meant. I didn’t know what to do. But then I remembered 
something my mom had made for me.” 

“What?” I demanded eagerly. “What was it?” 

“It was that head,” Sabrina chimed in, her mouth bulging with chocolate. 

“My mom had sculpted a head of me,” Carly Beth said. “It looked just like 
me. You’ve seen it. Mom sculpted it because she loves me. It was a symbol of 
love.” 

Carly Beth dropped back down beside me. “I placed Mom’s sculpted head 
over The Unloved face. And The Unloved disappeared. The ugly face slipped 
right off.” 

“Great!” I cried happily. “Go get it. Hurry!” 

“Huh?” Carly Beth stared at me, confused. 

“Go get the sculpted head,” I begged. “I’ve got to get this thing off me!” 

Carly Beth shook her head. “You don’t get it, Steve. You can’t use my 
symbol of love. It will only work for me. You have to find your own symbol of 



love.” 

“But maybe it won’t work for Steve’s mask,” Sabrina interrupted. “Maybe 
each mask is different.” 

“Give me a break, Sabrina,” I muttered angrily. “It’s got to work! Don’t you 
understand? It’s got to!” 

“You have to find your own symbol of love,” Carly Beth repeated. “Can 
you think of one, Steve?” 

I stared back at her, thinking hard. I thought. And thought. Symbol of 
love... symbol of love... No. I couldn’t think of anything. Not a single thing. 
And then an idea popped into my mind. 



24 


I leaned on the cane and tried to pull myself up from the couch. But my feeble 
arms gave way, and I fell back into the cushion. 

“You’ve got to help me get home,” I told Carly Beth. “I thought of a 
symbol of love. It’s at my house.” 

“Okay. Let’s go!” she replied. 

“But what about the kids coming over here?” Sabrina asked, swallowing a 
chunk of Milky Way. “What about the party?” 

“You stay here and greet them,” Carly Beth told her. “If Steve really can 
find a symbol of love at his house—and if it works—we’ll be right back.” 

“It’ll work,” I said. “I know it will.” 

But I had my fingers crossed. Which made it even harder to climb up from 
the couch. 

Carly Beth saw me struggling. She took both my hands and pulled me to 
my feet. “Yuck! What are those things moving around in your ears?” she cried, 
making a disgusted face. 

“Spiders,” I said quietly. 

She swallowed hard. “I sure hope you find something that works.” 

“Me too,” I murmured as she guided me to the door. 

Carly Beth turned back into the living room. “Don’t eat all the chocolate 
while we’re gone,” she called to Sabrina. 

“It’s only my second piece!” Sabrina protested with her mouth full. 

We stepped into the darkness. Some kids in costumes were coming up the 
driveway, all carrying bulging trick-or-treat bags. “Hey, Carly Beth—where are 
you going?” a girl called. 

“I’m doing a good deed!” Carly Beth replied. “See you guys later!” She 
turned back to me. “I can’t believe you didn’t listen to me, Steve. You really 
look disgusting.” 

“I can’t even wipe the green gobs out of my nose!” I wailed. 

Holding me by the shoulder, she guided me toward my house. We crossed 
the street onto my block. I heard kids laughing and loud music inside the house 
on the corner. A Halloween party. 

As we passed the house, I stumbled over a moving shadow. Carly Beth 



caught me before I fell. “What was that?” I cried. 

Then I saw it scamper silently across the street. A black cat. 

I laughed. What else could I do? I had to laugh. 

Go ahead, cat, I thought bitterly. Go ahead and cross my path. I couldn’t 
have any worse luck—could I? 

My house came into view past a row of tall evergreen shrubs. Through the 
shrubs, I could see that nearly all the downstairs lights were on. 

“Are your parents home?” Carly Beth asked, helping me across the grass. 

I nodded. “Yeah. They’re home.” 

“Do they know about the... uh...” 

“No,” I replied. “They think it’s a costume.” 

As we stepped onto the front stoop, I could hear Sparky start to bark inside 
the house. I pushed open the door, and the little dog let out an excited yip and 
leaped up at me. 

His paws landed on my waist and pushed me back hard. I toppled against 
the wall. 

“Down, Sparky! Please! Get down!” I pleaded in my old man’s croak. 

I knew Sparky was glad to see me. But I was too feeble for his usual 
greeting. 

“Down, boy! Please!” 

Carly Beth finally managed to pull the dog off me so that I could stand up. 
Then she held onto Sparky until I regained my balance. 

“Steve—is that you?” I heard Mom call from the den. “You’re back so 
early!” 

Mom stepped into the living room. She had changed into the gray flannel 
housedress she usually relaxes in at night, and she had her blond hair in curlers. 

“Oh, hi, Carly Beth!” she cried in surprise. “I wasn’t expecting visitors. I 

“That’s okay, Mom,” I croaked. “We’re only staying a minute. We came 
back to get something.” 

“Don’t you love Steve’s costume?” Mom asked Carly Beth. “Isn’t that the 
most horrible mask you ever saw?” 

“You mean he’s wearing a mask?” Carly Beth joked. She and Mom enjoyed 
a good laugh. 

Sparky sniffed my shoes. 

“What did you come back here for?” Mom asked me. 



“Those black-and-white cookies,” I replied eagerly. “You know. The ones 
you bought me yesterday.” 

Those cookies were a symbol of love. 

Mom had told me how she drove two miles out of her way to buy them for 
me. She knew they were my favorite cookies in the whole world. And she drove 
out of her way to buy them because she loves me. 

So the cookies were the perfect symbol of love. 

I couldn’t wait to bite into one. One bite, I knew—and I’d be able to pull 
off this horrible mask. 

Mom’s face twisted in surprise. She narrowed her eyes, studying me. “You 
came back here for those cookies? Why? What about all your trick-or-treat 
candy?” 

“Uh... well...” I stammered. My brain stalled. I couldn’t think of a good 
reason. 

“He had a strong craving,” Carly Beth chimed in. “He told me he’s been 
thinking about those cookies all night.” 

“That’s right. I had a craving,” I repeated. “Candy bars can’t compare, 
Mom. Those cookies are the best.” 

“I love them, too,” Carly Beth added. “So I came back with Steve. We want 
to bring them to my Halloween party.” 

Mom tsk-tsked. “What a shame,” she said. 

“Huh?” I cried, feeling my heart skip a beat. “What do you mean? What’s 
wrong?” 

Mom shook her head. “The cookies are gone,” she replied softly. “The dog 
found the box this morning and broke into it. I’m sorry, guys. But Sparky ate 
them all.” 



25 


Mom’s words sent a cold shiver down my back. I let out a weak moan. And 
stared down at Sparky. 

The dog gazed up at me and began wagging his stubby tail. As if he were 
pleased with himself! 

“You’ve ruined my life, Sparky!” That’s what I felt like screaming. “You 
greedy pig! Couldn’t you save me just one cookie? Now I’m doomed. Doomed 
to live with this gross, frightening face forever.” 

And all because Sparky loved black-and-white cookies as much as I did. 

Still wagging his tail, Sparky ran over to me and brushed his furry, black 
body against my leg. He wanted to be petted. 

Forget it, I thought. No way I’m petting you—you traitor. 

I heard Dad calling Mom from the den. “Have fun, guys,” Mom said. She 
waved to Carly Beth and me and hurried off to see what Dad wanted. 

Have fun, guys? 

I’m never going to have fun again, I realized. 

Feeling weak and defeated, I turned to Carly Beth. “Now what do we do?” I 
whispered. 

“Quick—pick up Sparky,” she whispered back, motioning to the dog with 
both hands. 

“Huh? Do what? I’m never touching this dog again!” I croaked miserably. 

Panting hard, his tongue hanging to the floor, Sparky brushed my ankle 
again. 

“Pick him up!” Carly Beth insisted. 

“Why?” 

“Sparky is your symbol of love!” Carly Beth declared. “Look at him, Steve. 
Look how much that dog loves you.” 

“He loves me so much, he ate all my cookies!” I wailed. 

Carly Beth frowned at me. “Forget about the cookies. Pick up the dog. 
Sparky is your symbol of love. Pick him up and hold him against you. And I’ll 
bet the mask will come right off.” 

“I guess it’s worth a try,” I said softly. I started to pick up the little black 
terrier. My back creaked as I bent down. My aching knees cracked. 



Please work! I pleaded silently. Please let this work! 

I reached for Sparky—and he darted through my hands and ran across the 
carpet toward the den. 

“Sparky—come back! Sparky!” I cried, still bent over, still reaching out 
both hands. 

The dog stopped halfway across the living room and turned back. 

“Come back, Sparky!” I called in my old man’s quivering voice. “Come 
back, boy! Come back to Steve!” 

His stubby tail started wagging again. He stared at me, head tilted, and 
didn’t move. 

“He’s playing games with me,” I told Carly Beth. “He wants me to chase 
him.” 

I got down on my knees and motioned to Sparky with both hands. “Come, 
boy! Come! I’m too old to chase you! Come, Sparky!” 

To my surprise, the dog let out a yip, ran back across the room, and jumped 
into my arms. 

“Hug him tight, Steve,” Carly Beth urged. “Hug him tight. It’s going to 
work. I know it will!” 

The little dog felt so heavy in my weak, aching arms. But I held him against 
my chest. Held him tight. 

Held him as tight as I could. 

Held him for a long, long time. 

And nothing happened. 



26 


After about a minute, the dog got tired of being squeezed. He jumped out of my 
arms, bounced over the carpet, and disappeared into the den. 

I tugged at the mask with both hands. 

But I knew I was wasting my strength. It didn’t feel any different. Nothing 
had changed. The hideous face was still tightly attached to my head. 

Carly Beth put a hand gently on my shoulder. “Sorry,” she murmured. “I 
guess each mask is different.” 

“You mean I need something else to get it off,” I said, shaking my old, 
spider-infested head sadly. 

Carly Beth nodded. “Yes. Something else. But we don’t know what it is.” 

I uttered a helpless cry. “I’m doomed!” I wailed. “I can’t even climb up off 
my knees!” 

Carly Beth slid both of her hands under my shoulders and lifted me to my 
feet. I steadied myself, leaning on the cane. 

And then I had an idea. 

“The man in the cape,” I croaked. “He’ll know what I can do.” 

“You’re right!” Carly Beth’s face brightened. “Yes, you’re right, Steve. He 
helped me last Halloween. If we go back to the party store, I know he’ll help 
you!” 

She started to pull me to the front door. But I held back. “There’s just one 
little problem,” I told her. 

She turned back to me. “Problem?” 

“Yeah,” I replied. “I forgot to tell you. The party store is closed. It went out 
of business.” 

We walked there anyway. Well, I didn’t exactly walk. I limped and hobbled, 
feeling weaker and more feeble every second. Carly Beth practically had to carry 
me. 

The streets stood empty, glimmering dimly under the rows of streetlamps. 
Lights were going out in all the houses. It was pretty late. All of the trick-or- 
treaters had gone home. 

Two dogs followed us down the street. Big German shepherds. Maybe they 



thought we’d share our Halloween candy with them. Of course, I didn’t have any 
Halloween candy. 

“Go away,” I snarled at them. “I don’t like dogs anymore. Dogs are 
useless!” 

To my surprise, they seemed to understand. They turned and went loping 
across a dark front lawn, disappearing around the side of the house. 

A few minutes later, we passed the row of small shops and stepped up in 
front of the party store. Dark. Empty. 

“Out of business,” I murmured. 

Carly Beth pounded on the front door. I peered into the blue shadows 
beyond the dusty front window. Nothing moved. No one in there. 

“Open up! We need help!” Carly Beth shouted. She banged on the wooden 
door with both fists. 

Silence inside. No one stirred. 

A cold wind swept down the street. I shivered. I tried to bury my ugly head 
in my shoulders. “Let’s go,” I mumbled. Defeated. 

Doomed. 

Carly Beth refused to give up. She pounded the door with both fists. 

I turned away from the window—and gazed at the alley beside the store. 
“Whoa. Wait,” I called to her. “Come over here.” 

I dragged myself to the alley. Carly Beth followed. She rubbed her 
knuckles. I guess they were sore from pounding so hard on the door. 

I could see from the sidewalk that the trapdoor was shut. But I led Carly 
Beth into the alley. We stopped beside the trapdoor. 

“It leads into the basement of the party store,” I explained. “All the masks 
and other stuff are down there.” 

“If we can get down there,” Carly Beth whispered, “maybe we can find a 
way to help you.” 

“Maybe,” I whispered back. 

Carly Beth bent down and grabbed the wire handle to the trapdoor. She 
tugged it up hard. 

The door didn’t budge. 

“I think it’s locked,” she groaned. 

“Try again,” I urged. “It sticks. It’s very hard to open.” 

She bent down, grasped the handle in both hands, and pulled again. 

This time the door swung up, revealing the concrete stairs that led down to 



the basement. 

“Come on. Hurry, Steve.” Carly Beth tugged my arm. 
My last chance, I thought. My last chance. 

Trembling, I followed her down into the heavy darkness. 



27 


We huddled close together as we made our way across the basement floor. Pale 
light from a streetlamp floated in through the open trapdoor. 

Across the room, I heard the steady drip drip drip I’d heard before. The 
large cartons stood just where Chuck and I had left them. Three or four of them 
were still open. 

“Well. Here we are,” Carly Beth murmured. Her words sounded hollow, 
echoing softly against the stone basement walls. Her eyes darted around the 
room, then stopped on me. “Now what?” 

I shrugged. “Search through the cartons, maybe?” 

I stepped over to the nearest one and peered inside. “This one has all the 
masks,” I told her. I picked up a monster mask covered in bristly fur. 

“Yuck,” Carly Beth groaned. “Put it down. We don’t need another mask.” 

I dropped the mask back into the carton. It made a soft plop as it landed on 
the other masks. 

“I don’t know what we need,” I said. “But maybe we can find 
something...” 

“Look at these!” Carly Beth cried. She had pulled open another carton. She 
held up some kind of jumpsuit. It had a long, pointy tail on the back. 

“What’s that?” I demanded, stepping around two cartons to get to her. 

“A costume,” she replied. She leaned into the carton and pulled out another 
one. A pair of furry tights covered with leopard spots. “The box is filled with 
costumes.” 

“Big deal,” I grumbled. “That’s not going to help me.” 

I sighed. “Nothing is going to help me.” 

Carly Beth didn’t seem to hear me. She leaned over the edge of the box and 
pulled out another costume. She held it up in front of her. A shiny black suit. 
Very fancy. Like a tuxedo. 

As I stared at it, my face began to tingle. 

“Put it down,” I said glumly. “We need to find—” 

“Oh, yuck!” Carly Beth cried. “This suit—it’s crawling with spiders!” 

“Huh?” I gasped. My face tingled harder. I heard a loud buzzing in my ears. 
The tingle became an itch. 



“Hey, I’ll bet this is the costume that goes with your mask!” Carly Beth 
declared. She carried it over to me. “See? Spiders and more spiders!” 

I scratched my itching cheeks. The itch was quickly becoming painful. I 
scratched harder. 

“Get it away from me! It’s making me itch!” I cried. 

Carly Beth ignored my plea. She held the shiny black suit up in front of me, 
beneath my itching, burning face. 

“See? You have the head—and this is the body that goes with it,” she said, 
holding it against me. Admiring it. 

“Put it away!” I shrieked. “My face—it’s burning! Ow!” 

I slapped frantically at my cheeks. My forehead. My chin. 

“Owwwwww!” I howled. “I feel so weird! What is happening to me?” 



28 


“It’s burning hot!” I shrieked. “Owwwwww/ What is happening ?” 

I grabbed the sides of my face, trying to soothe away the burning pain. 

As I gripped my cheeks, the face began to slide under my hands. 

I felt it begin to rise. Up, up. 

I pulled my hands away—as the old man’s head slid over my head. Lifted 
off. Floated up. 

Cool air greeted my cheeks. I took a deep breath of the cold, fresh air. 

The craggy old head hovered above me for a moment. Then it floated 
toward the shiny black suit in Carly Beth’s hand. 

The head floated down onto the collar of the suit. 

Carly Beth let out a startled cry as the suit’s arms thrashed out. The trouser 
legs kicked. The suit twitched and squirmed as if trying to break free. 

Carly Beth let go of it and jumped back. 

A smile spread over the ugly old face. The suit legs lowered themselves to 
the floor. The old man performed a little dance, arms flapping, trouser legs 
hopping. 

And then he turned away from us. The head attached to the suit. The trouser 
legs bent at the knees, he shuffled toward the steps. 

Carly Beth and I both cried out in shock as the old man climbed up the 
steps and disappeared out the trapdoor. 

We stood there, eyes bulging, mouths wide-open. We stared at the opening 
at the top of the stairs. Stared in silence. Stared in amazement. 

And then we both began to laugh. 

We fell on each other, laughing, laughing till tears rolled down our cheeks. 

I laughed louder and harder than I had ever laughed. Because I was 
laughing in my voice. Laughing with my face. My real face. 

The old-man face found its body—and escaped. 

And now I was me again! 

This had to be the best Halloween ever! I had never been so happy in all my 
life just to have things normal. 

Carly Beth and I danced down the street as we made our way home. We 



sang at the top of our lungs. Sang and twirled each other around. 

And danced and strutted down the middle of the street. 

We were both so happy! 

We were half a block from my house—when the creature leaped out from 
behind a hedge. 

It opened its jaws in a broken-toothed roar. 

Carly Beth and I grabbed each other and uttered shrill cries of terror. 

The creature had bright purple skin that glowed in the light from the 
streetlamp. Fiery red eyes. A mouth full of broken, rotting teeth. And a fat, 
brown worm poking out from the middle of its cheek. 

“Huh?” I stared at the worm as it bobbed from the creature’s skin. Stared at 
the frightening purple face. 

And recognized it. 

“Chuck!” I cried. 

He let out a hoarse laugh from behind the mask. “I gotcha!” he bellowed. “I 
got both of you! You should have seen the looks on your faces!” 

“Chuck—” 

“I’ve been waiting here. Waiting to surprise you,” he rasped. The disgusting 
worm bobbed up and down in his cheek as he talked. 

“You didn’t see me grab this mask when I ran out of that store basement,” 
he growled. “I kept it a secret. I wanted to give you a good scare.” 

“You scared me to death!” Carly Beth admitted, giving him a playful shove. 
“Now take off the mask and let’s go to my house.” 

“Uh... I have a problem,” Chuck replied, lowering his voice. 

“Problem?” 

Chuck nodded. “I’m having a little trouble getting this mask off. Think you 
guys could help me?” 



THE HEADLESS GHOST 

Goosebumps - 37 
R.L. Stine 



1 


Stephanie Alpert and I haunt our neighborhood. 

We got the idea last Halloween. 

There are a lot of kids in our neighborhood, and we like to haunt them and 
give them a little scare. 

Sometimes we sneak out late at night in masks and stare into kids’ 
windows. Sometimes we leave rubber hands and rubber fingers on windowsills. 
Sometimes we hide disgusting things in mailboxes. 

Sometimes Stephanie and I duck down behind bushes or trees and make the 
most frightening sounds—animal howls and ghostly moans. Stephanie can do a 
terrifying werewolf howl. And I can toss back my head and shriek loud enough 
to shake the leaves on the trees. 

We keep almost all the kids on our block pretty frightened. 

In the mornings, we catch them peeking out their doors, seeing if it’s safe to 
come out. And at night, most of them are afraid to leave their houses alone. 

Stephanie and I are really proud of that. 

During the day we are just Stephanie Alpert and Duane Comack, two 
normal twelve-year-olds. But at night, we become the Twin Terrors of Wheeler 
Falls. 

No one knows. No one. 

Look at us, and you see two sixth graders at Wheeler Middle School. Both 
of us have brown eyes and brown hair. Both of us are tall and thin. Stephanie is a 
few inches taller because she has higher hair. 

Some people see us hanging out together and think we’re brother and sister. 
But we’re not. We don’t have any brothers and sisters, and we don’t mind one 
bit. 

We live across the street from one another. We walk to school together in 
the morning. We usually trade lunches, even though our parents both pack us 
peanut-butter-and-jelly sandwiches. 

We’re normal. Totally normal. 

Except for our secret late-night hobby. 

How did we become the Twin Terrors? Well, it’s sort of a long story.... 



Last Halloween was a cool, clear night. A full moon floated over the bare trees. 

I was standing outside Stephanie’s front window in my scary Grim Reaper 
costume. I stood up on tiptoes, trying to peek inside to check out her costume. 

“Hey—beat it, Duane! No looking!” she shouted through the closed 
window. Then she pulled down the shade. 

“I wasn’t looking. I was just stretching!” I shouted back. 

I was eager to see what Stephanie was going to be. Every Halloween, she 
comes up with something awesome. The year before, she came waddling out 
inside a huge ball of green toilet paper. You guessed it. She was an iceberg 
lettuce. 

But this year I thought maybe I had her beat. 

I’d worked really hard on my Grim Reaper costume. I wore high platform 
shoes—so high that I’d tower over Stephanie. My black, hooded cape swung 
along the ground. I hid my curly brown hair under a tight rubber skullcap. And I 
smeared my face with sick-looking makeup, the color you see on moldy bread. 

My dad didn’t want to look at me. He said I turned his stomach. 

A success! 

I couldn’t wait to make Stephanie sick! I banged my Grim Reaper sickle on 
Stephanie’s window. “Hey, Steph—hurry up!” I called. “I’m getting hungry. I 
want candy!” 

I waited and waited. I started pacing back and forth across her front lawn, 
my long cape sweeping over the grass and dead leaves. 

“Hey! Where are you?” I called again. 

No Stephanie. 

With an impatient groan, I turned back to the house. 

And a huge, hairy animal jumped me from behind and chewed off my head. 



2 


Well, it didn’t really chew off my head. 

But it tried to. 

It growled and tried to sink its gleaming fangs into my throat. 

I staggered back. The creature looked like an enormous black cat, covered 
in thick, black bristles. Gobs of yellow goo poured from its hairy ears and black 
nose. Its long, pointed fangs glowed in the dark. 

The creature snarled again and shot out a hairy paw. “Candy... give me all 
your candy!” 

“Stephanie—?” I choked out. It was Stephanie. Wasn’t it? 

The creature jabbed its claws into my stomach in reply. That’s when I 
recognized Stephanie’s Mickey Mouse watch on its hairy wrist. 

“Wow. Stephanie, you look awesome! You really—” I didn’t finish. 
Stephanie ducked behind the hedge and yanked me down beside her. 

My knees hit the sidewalk hard. “Ow! Are you crazy?” I shrieked. “What’s 
the big idea?” 

A group of little kids in costumes paraded by. Stephanie leapt out of the 
hedge. “Arrrggghhh!” she growled. 

The little kids totally freaked. They turned and started to run. Three of them 
dropped their trick-or-treat bags. Stephanie scooped up the bags. “Yummmm!” 

“Whoa! You really scared them,” I said, watching the little kids run up the 
street. “That was cool.” 

Stephanie started to laugh. She has a high, silly laugh that always starts me 
laughing, too. It sounds like a chicken being tickled. “That was kind of fun,” she 
replied. “More fun than trick-or-treating.” 

So we spent the rest of the night scaring kids. 

We didn’t get much candy. But we had a great time. 

“I wish we could do this every night!” I exclaimed as we walked home. 

“We can,” Stephanie said, grinning. “It doesn’t have to be Halloween to 
scare kids, Duane. Get my meaning?” 

I got her meaning. 

She tossed back her bristly head and let out her chicken laugh. And I 
laughed, too. 



And that’s how Stephanie and I started haunting our neighborhood. Late at 
night, the Twin Terrors strike, up and down our neighborhood. We’re 
everywhere! 

Well... almost everywhere. 

There’s one place in our neighborhood that even Stephanie and I are afraid 
of. 

It’s an old stone house on the next block. It’s called Hill House. I guess 
that’s because it sits up on a high hill on Hill Street. 

I know. I know. A lot of towns have a haunted house. 

But Hill House really is haunted. 

Stephanie and I know that for sure. 

Because that’s where we met the Headless Ghost. 



3 


Hill House is the biggest tourist attraction in Wheeler Falls. Actually, it’s the 
only one. 

Maybe you’ve heard of Hill House. It’s written up in a lot of books. 

Tour guides in creepy black uniforms give the Hill House tour every hour. 
The guides will act real scary and tell frightening stories about the house. Some 
of the ghost stories give me cold shivers. 

Stephanie and I love to take the tour—especially with Otto. Otto is our 
favorite guide. 

Otto is big and bald and scary-looking. He has tiny black eyes that seem to 
stare right through you. And he has a booming voice that comes from deep 
inside his huge chest. 

Sometimes when Otto leads us from room to room in the old house, he 
lowers his voice to a whisper. He talks so low, we can barely hear him. Then his 
tiny eyes will bulge. He’ll point—and scream: “There’s the ghost! There!” 

Stephanie and I always scream. 

Even Otto’s smile is scary. 

Stephanie and I have taken the Hill House tour so often, we could probably 
be tour guides. We know all the creepy old rooms. All the places where ghosts 
have been spotted. 

Real ghosts! 

It’s the kind of place we love. 

Do you want to know the story of Hill House? Well, here’s the story that 
Otto, Edna, and the other guides tell: 

Hill House is two hundred years old. And it’s been haunted practically from the 
day the stones were gathered to build it. 

A young sea captain built the house for his new bride. But the day the big 
house was finished, the captain was called out to sea. 

His young wife moved into the huge house all alone. It was cold and dark, 
and the rooms and hallways seemed to stretch on forever. 

For months and months, she stared out of their bedroom window. The 
window that faced the river. Waiting patiently for the captain’s return. 



Winter passed. Then spring, then summer. 

But he never came back. 

The captain was lost at sea. 

One year after the sea captain disappeared, a ghost appeared in the halls of 
Hill House. The ghost of the young sea captain. He had come back from the 
dead, back to find his wife. 

Every night he floated through the long, twisting halls. He carried a lantern 
and called out his wife’s name. “Annabel! Annabel!” 

But Annabel never answered. 

In her grief, she had fled from the old house. She never wanted to see it 
again. 

Another family had moved in. As the years passed, many people heard the 
ghost’s nightly calls. “Annabel! Annabel!” Through the twisting halls and cold 
rooms of the house. 

“Annabel! Annabel!” 

People heard the sad, frightening calls. But no one ever saw the ghost. 

Then, one hundred years ago, a family named Craw bought the house. The 
Craws had a thirteen-year-old boy named Andrew. 

Andrew was a nasty, mean-natured boy. He delighted in playing cruel tricks 
on the servants. He scared them out of their wits. 

He once threw a cat out of a window. He was disappointed when it 
survived. 

Even Andrew’s own parents couldn’t stand to spend time with the mean- 
tempered boy. He spent his days on his own, exploring the old mansion, looking 
for trouble he could get into. 

One day he discovered a room he had never explored before. He pushed 
open the heavy wooden door. It let out a loud creak. 

Then he stepped inside. 

A lantern glowed dimly on a small table. The boy saw no other furniture in 
the large room. No one at the table. 

“How strange,” he thought. “Why should I find a burning lantern in an 
empty room?” 

Andrew approached the lantern. As he leaned down to lower the wick, the 
ghost appeared. 

The sea captain! 

Over the years, the ghost had grown into an old and terrifying creature. He 



had long, white fingernails that curled in spirals. Cracked, black teeth poked out 
from between swollen, dry lips. And a scraggly white beard hid the ghost’s face 
from view. 

The boy stared in horror. “Who—who are you?” he stammered. 

The ghost didn’t utter a word. He floated in the yellow lantern light, glaring 
hard at the boy. 

“Who are you? What do you want? Why are you here?” the boy demanded. 

When the ghost still didn’t reply, Andrew turned—and tried to run. 

But before he moved two steps, he felt the ghost’s cold breath on his neck. 

Andrew grabbed for the door. But the old ghost swirled around him, swirled 
darkly, a swirl of black smoke in the dim yellow fight. 

“No! Stop!” the boy screamed. “Let me go!” 

The ghost’s mouth gaped open, revealing a bottomless black hole. Finally, it 
spoke—in a whisper that sounded like the scratch of dead leaves. “Now that you 
have seen me, you cannot leave.” 

“No!” The boy shrieked. “Let me go! Let me go!” 

The ghost ignored the boy’s cries. He repeated his dry, cold words: “Now 
that you have seen me, you cannot leave.” 

The old ghost raised his hands to the boy’s head. His icy fingers spread over 
Andrew’s face. The hands tightened. Tightened. 

Do you know what happened next? 



4 


The ghost pulled off the boy’s head—and hid it somewhere in the house! 

After hiding the head, hiding it away in the huge, dark mansion, the ghost 
of the sea captain let out a final howl that made the heavy stone walls tremble. 

The terrifying howl ended with the cry, “Annabel! Annabel!” 

Then the old ghost disappeared forever. 

But Hill House was not freed from ghosts. A new ghost now haunted the 
endless, twisting halls. 

From then on, Andrew haunted Hill House. Every night the ghost of the 
poor boy searched the halls and rooms, looking for his missing head. 

All through the house, say Otto and the other tour guides, you can hear the 
footsteps of the Headless Ghost, searching, always searching. 

And each room of the house now has a terrifying story of its own. 

Are the stories true? 

Well, Stephanie and I believe them. That’s why we take the tour so often. 

We must have explored the old place at least a hundred times. 

Hill House is such awesome fun. 

At least it was fun—until Stephanie had another one of her bright ideas. 

After Stephanie’s bright idea, Hill House wasn’t fun anymore. 

Hill House became a truly scary place. 



5 


The trouble started a few weeks ago when Stephanie suddenly got bored. 

It was about ten o’clock at night. We were out haunting the neighborhood. 
We did our terrifying wolf howl outside Geena Jeffers’ window. Then we went 
next door to Terri Abel’s house. We put some chicken bones in her mailbox— 
just because it’s creepy to reach in your mailbox and feel bones. 

Then we crept across the street to Ben Fuller’s house. 

Ben was our last stop for the night. Ben is a kid in our class, and we have a 
special scare for him. 

You see, he’s afraid of bugs, which makes him really easy to scare. 

Even though it’s pretty cold out, he sleeps with his bedroom window open. 
So Stephanie and I like to step up to his window and toss rubber spiders onto 
Ben as he sleeps. 

The rubber spiders tickle his face. He wakes up. And starts to scream. 

Every time. 

He always thinks the spiders are real. 

He screams and tries to scramble out of bed. He gets all tangled in his 
covers and thuds onto the floor. 

Then Stephanie and I congratulate each other on a job well done. And we 
go home to bed. 

But tonight, as we tossed the rubber spiders at Ben’s sleeping face, 
Stephanie turned to me and whispered, “I just had a great idea.” 

“Huh?” I started to reply. But Ben’s scream interrupted me. 

We listened to him scream, then thud to the floor. 

Stephanie and I slapped each other a high five. Then we took off, running 
across the dark backyards, our sneakers thumping the hard, nearly-frozen 
ground. 

We stopped in front of the split oak tree in my front yard. The tree trunk is 
completely split in two. But Dad doesn’t have the heart to have the tree taken 
away. 

“What is your great idea?” I asked Stephanie breathlessly. 

Her dark eyes flashed. “I’ve been thinking. Every time we go out to haunt 
the neighborhood, we scare the same old kids. It’s starting to get boring.” 



I wasn’t bored. But I knew that once Stephanie gets an idea, there’s no 
stopping her. “So, do you want to find some new kids to scare?” I asked. 

“No. Not new kids. Something else.” She began to walk around the tree. 
Circling it. “We need a new challenge.” 

“Like what?” I asked. 

“Our scares are all kid stuff,” she complained. “We make some spooky 
sounds, toss a few things inside an open window—and everyone is frightened to 
death. It’s too easy.” 

“Yeah,” I agreed. “But it’s funny.” 

She ignored me. She stuck her head through the split in the tree trunk. 
“Duane, what’s the scariest place in Wheeler Falls?” 

That was easy. “Hill House, of course,” I answered. 

“Right. And what makes it so scary?” 

“All the ghost stories. But especially the one about the boy searching for his 
head.” 

“Yes!” Stephanie cried. All I could see now was her head, poking through 
the split oak tree. “The Headless Ghost!” she cried in a deep voice, and let out a 
long, scary laugh. 

“What’s your problem?” I demanded. “Are you trying to haunt me now?” 

Her head seemed to float in the darkness. “We need to haunt Hill House,” 
she declared in a whisper. 



6 


“Excuse me?” I cried. “Stephanie, what are you talking about?” 

“We’ll take the Hill House tour and sneak off on our own,” Stephanie 
replied thoughtfully. 

I shook my head. “Give me a break. Why would we do that?” 

Stephanie’s face seemed to glow, floating by itself in the tree trunk. “We’ll 
sneak off on our own—to search for the ghost’s head.” 

I stared back at her. “You’re kidding, right?” 

I walked behind the tree and tugged her away from it. The floating head 
trick was starting to give me the creeps. 

“No, Duane, I’m not kidding,” she replied, shoving me away. “We need a 
challenge. We need something new. Prowling around the neighborhood, 
terrifying everyone we know—that’s just kid stuff. Bor-ring.” 

“But you don’t believe the story about the missing head—do you?” I 
protested. “It’s just a ghost story. We can search and search. But there is no head. 
It’s all a story they made up for the tourists.” 

Stephanie narrowed her eyes at me. “I think you’re scared, Duane.” 

“Huh? Me?” My voice got pretty shrill. 

A cloud rolled over the moon, making my front yard even darker. A chill 
ran down my back. I pulled my jacket around me tighter. 

“I’m not afraid to sneak off from the tour and search Hill House on our 
own,” I told Stephanie. “I just think it’s a big waste of time.” 

“Duane, you’re shivering,” she teased. “Shivering with fright.” 

“I am not!” I screamed. “Come on. Let’s go to Hill House. Right now. I’ll 
show you.” 

A grin spread over Stephanie’s face. She tossed back her head and let out a 
long howl. A victory howl. “This is going to be the coolest thing the Twin 
Terrors have ever done!” she cried, slapping me a high five that made my hand 
sting. 

She dragged me up Hill Street. The whole way there, I didn’t say one word. 
Was I afraid? 

Maybe a little. 

We climbed the steep, weed-choked hill and stood before the front steps of 



Hill House. The old house looked even bigger at night. Three stories tall. With 
turrets and balconies and dozens of windows, all dark and shuttered. 

All the houses in our neighborhood are brick or clapboard. Hill House is the 
only one made out of stone slabs. Dark gray slabs. 

I always have to hold my breath when I stand close to Hill House. The 
stone is covered with a blanket of thick green moss. Two hundred years of it. 
Putrid, moldy moss that doesn’t exactly smell like a flower garden. 

I peered up. Up at the round turret that stretched to the purple sky. A 
gargoyle, carved in stone, perched at the very top. It grinned down at us, as if 
challenging us to go inside. 

My knees suddenly felt weak. 

The house stood in total darkness, except for a single candle over the front 
doorway. But the tours were still going on. The last tour left at ten-thirty every 
night. The guides said the late tours were the best—the best time to see a ghost. 

I read the sign etched in stone beside the door. ENTER HILL HOUSE— 
AND YOUR LIFE WILL BE CHANGED. FOREVER. 

I’d read that sign a hundred times. I always thought it was funny—in a 
corny sort of way. 

But tonight it gave me the creeps. 

Tonight was going to be different. 

“Come on,” Stephanie said, pulling me by the hand. “We’re just in time for 
the next tour.” 

The candle flickered. The heavy wooden door swung open. By itself. I 
don’t know how, but it always does that. 

“Well, are you coming or not?” Stephanie demanded, stepping into the dark 
entryway. 

“Coming,” I gulped. 



7 


Otto met us as we stepped inside the door. Otto always reminds me of an 
enormous dolphin. He has a big, smooth bald head. And he’s sort of shaped like 
a dolphin. He must weigh about three hundred pounds! 

Otto was dressed entirely in black, as always. Black shirt. Black pants. 
Black socks. Black shoes. And gloves—you guessed it—black. It’s the uniform 
that all the tour guides wear. 

“Look who’s here!” he called. “Stephanie and Duane!” He broke out into a 
wide grin. His tiny eyes flashed in the candlelight. 

“Our favorite guide!” Stephanie greeted him. “Are we in time for the next 
tour?” 

We pushed through the turnstile without paying. We’re such regulars at Hill 
House that they don’t even charge us anymore. 

“About five minutes, guys,” Otto told us. “You two are out late tonight, 
huh?” 

“Yeah... well,” Stephanie hesitated. “It’s more fun to take the tour at night. 
Isn’t it, Duane?” She jabbed my side. 

“You can say that again,” I mumbled. 

We moved into the front hall with some others who were waiting for the 
tour to begin. Teenagers mostly, out on dates. 

The front hall is bigger than my living room and dining room put together. 
And except for the winding staircase in the center, it’s completely bare. No 
furniture at all. 

Shadows tossed across the floor. I gazed around the room. No electric 
lights. Small torches were hung from the peeling, cracked walls. The orange 
torchlight flickered and bent. 

In the dancing light, I counted the people around me. Nine of them. 
Stephanie and I were the only kids. 

Otto lighted a lantern and crossed to the front of the hall. He held it up high 
and cleared his throat. 

Stephanie and I grinned at each other. Otto always starts the tour the same 
way. He thinks the lantern adds atmosphere. 

“Ladies and gentlemen,” he boomed. “Welcome to Hill House. We hope 



you will survive your tour tonight.” Then he gave a low, evil laugh. 

Stephanie and I mouthed Otto’s next words along with him: 

“In 1795, a prosperous sea captain, William P. Bell, built himself a home on 
the highest hill in Wheeler Falls. It was the finest home ever built here at the 
time—three stories high, nine fireplaces, and over thirty rooms. 

“Captain Bell spared no expense. Why? Because he hoped to retire here and 
finish his days in splendor with his young and beautiful wife. But it was not to 
be.” 

Otto cackled, and so did Stephanie and I. We knew every move Otto had. 

Otto went on. “Captain Bell died at sea in a terrible shipwreck—before he 
ever had a chance to live in his beautiful house. His young bride, Annabel, fled 
the house in horror and sorrow.” 

Now Otto’s voice dropped. “But soon after Annabel left, strange things 
began to happen in Hill House.” 

This was Otto’s cue to start walking toward the winding stairs. The old, 
wooden staircase is narrow and creaky. When Otto starts to climb, the stairs 
groan and grumble beneath him as if in pain. 

Keeping silent, we followed Otto up the stairs to the first floor. Stephanie 
and I love this part, because Otto doesn’t say a word the whole time. He just 
huffs along in the darkness while everyone tries to keep up with him. 

He starts talking again when he reaches Captain Bell’s bedroom. A big, 
wood-paneled room with a fireplace and a view of the river. 

“Soon after Captain Bell’s widow ran away,” Otto reported, “people in 
Wheeler Falls began reporting strange sightings. Sightings of a man who 
resembled Captain Bell. He was always seen here, standing by his window, 
holding his lantern aloft.” 

Otto moved to the window and raised his lantern. “On a windless night, if 
you listened carefully, you could sometimes hear him calling out her name in a 
low, mournful voice.” 

Otto took a deep breath, then called softly: “Annabel. Annabel. Annabel...” 

Otto swung the lantern back and forth for effect. By now, he had everyone’s 
complete attention. 

“But of course, there’s more,” he whispered. 



8 


As we followed him through the upstairs rooms, Otto told us how Captain Bell 
haunted the house for about a hundred years. “People who moved into Hill 
House tried all kinds of ways to get rid of the ghost. But it was determined to 
stay.” 

Then Otto told everyone about the boy finding the ghost and getting his 
head pulled off. “The ghost of the sea captain vanished. The headless ghost of 
the boy continued to haunt the house. But that wasn’t the end of it.” 

Into the long, dark hallway now. Torches darting and flickering along the 
walls. “Tragedy continued to haunt Hill House,” Otto continued. “Shortly after 
young Andrew Craw’s death, his twelve-year-old sister Hannah went mad. Let’s 
go to her room next.” 

He led us down the hall to Hannah’s room. 

Stephanie loves Hannah’s room. Hannah collected porcelain dolls. And she 
had hundreds of them. All with the same long yellow hair, painted rosy cheeks, 
and blue-tinted eyelids. 

“After her brother was killed, Hannah went crazy,” Otto told us all in a 
hushed voice. “All day long, for eighty years, she sat in her rocking chair over 
there in the corner. And she played with her dolls. She never left her room. 
Ever.” 

He pointed to a worn rocking chair. “Hannah died there. An old lady 
surrounded by her dolls.” 

The floorboards creaked under him as Otto crossed the room. Setting the 
lantern down, he lowered his big body into the rocking chair. 

The chair made a cracking sound. I always think Otto is going to crush it! 
He started to rock. Slowly. The chair groaned with each move. We all watched 
him in silence. 

“Some people swear that poor Hannah is still here,” he said softly. “They 
say they’ve seen a young girl sitting in this chair, combing a doll’s hair.” 

He rocked slowly, letting the idea sink in. “And—then we come to the story 
of Hannah’s mother.” 

With a grunt, Otto pulled himself to his feet. He grabbed up the lantern and 
made his way to the top of the long, dark stairway at the end of the hall. 



“Soon after her son’s tragedy, the mother met her own terrible fate. She was 
on her way down these stairs one night when she tripped and fell to her death.” 

Otto gazed down the stairs and shook his head sadly. 

He does this every time. As I said, Stephanie and I know his every move. 

But we hadn’t come here tonight to watch Otto perform. I knew that sooner 
or later, Stephanie would want to get going. So I started glancing around. To see 
if it was a good time for us to sneak away from the others. 

And that’s when I saw the strange kid. Watching us. 

I didn’t see him when we first came in. In fact, I’m sure he wasn’t there 
when the tour started. I had counted nine people. No kids. 

The boy was about our age, with wavy blond hair and pale skin. Very pale 
skin. He was wearing black jeans and a black turtleneck that made his face look 
even whiter. 

I edged over to Stephanie. She was hanging back from the group. 

“You ready?” she whispered. 

Otto had started back down the stairs. If we were going to sneak away from 
the tour, now was the time. 

But I could see that weird kid still staring at us. 

Staring hard. 

He was giving me the creeps. 

“We can’t go. Someone’s watching us,” I whispered to Stephanie. 

“Who?” 

“That weird kid over there.” I motioned with my eyes. 

He was still staring at us. He didn’t even try to be polite and turn away 
when we caught him. 

Why was he watching us like that? What was his problem ? 

Something told me we should wait. Something told me not to hide from the 
others just yet. 

But Stephanie had other ideas. “Forget him,” she said. “He’s nobody.” She 
grabbed my arm—and tugged. “Let’s go!” 

We pressed against the cold wall of the hallway and watched the others 
follow Otto down the stairs. 

I held my breath until I heard the last footsteps leave the stairway. We were 
alone now. Alone in the long, dark hall. 

I turned to Stephanie. I could barely see her face. “Now what?” I asked. 



9 


“Now we do some exploring on our own!” Stephanie declared, rubbing her 
hands together. “This is so exciting!” 

I gazed down the long hallway. I didn’t feel real excited. I felt kind of 
scared. 

I heard a low groan from a room across the hall. The ceiling creaked above 
our heads. The wind rattled the windows in the room we had just come from. 

“Steph—are you sure—?” I started. 

But she was already hurrying down the hall, walking on tiptoes to keep the 
floors from squeaking. “Come on, Duane. Let’s search for the ghost’s head,” she 
whispered back to me, her dark hair flying behind her. “Who knows? We might 
find it.” 

“Yeah. Sure.” I rolled my eyes. 

I didn’t think the chances were too good. How do you find a hundred-year- 
old head? And what if you do find it? 

Yuck! 

What would it look like? Just a skull? 

I followed Stephanie down the hall. But I really didn’t want to be there. I 
like haunting the neighborhood and scaring other people. 

I don’t like scaring myself! 

Stephanie led the way into a bedroom we had seen on other tours. It was 
called the Green Room. Because the wallpaper was decorated with green vines. 
Tangle after tangle of green vines. Up and down the walls and across the ceiling, 
too. 

How could anyone sleep in here? I wondered. It was like being trapped in a 
thick jungle. 

We both stopped inside the doorway and stared at the tangles of vines on all 
sides of us. Stephanie and I call the Green Room by another name. The 
Scratching Room. 

Otto once told us that something terrible happened here sixty years ago. 
The two guests who stayed in the room woke up with a disgusting purple rash. 

The rash started on their hands and arms. It spread to their faces. Then it 
spread over their entire bodies. 



Big purple sores that itched like crazy. 

Doctors from all around the world were called to study the rash. They 
couldn’t figure out what it was. And they couldn’t figure out how to cure it. 

Something in the Green Room caused the rash. 

But no one ever figured out what it was. 

That’s the story Otto and the other guides tell. It might be true. All the 
weird, scary stories Otto tells might be true. Who knows? 

“Come on, Duane!” Stephanie prodded. “Let’s look for the head. We don’t 
have much time before Otto sees that we’re missing.” 

She trotted across the room and dove under the bed. 

“Steph—please!” I started. I stepped carefully over to the low, wooden 
dresser in the corner. 

“We’re not going to find a ghost’s head in here. Let’s go,” I pleaded. 

She couldn’t hear me. She had climbed under the bed. 

“Steph—?” 

After a few seconds, she backed out. As she turned toward me, I saw that 
her face was bright red. 

“Duane!” she cried. “I... I...” 

Her dark eyes bulged. Her mouth dropped open in horror. She grabbed the 
sides of her face. 

“What is it? What’s wrong?” I cried, stumbling across the room toward her. 

“Ohhh, it itches! It itches so badly!” Stephanie wailed. 

I started to cry out. But my voice got caught in my throat. 

Stephanie began to rub her face. She frantically rubbed her cheeks, her 
forehead, her chin. 

“Owwww. It itches! It really itches!” She started to scratch her scalp with 
both hands. 

I grabbed her arm and tried to pull her up from the floor. “The rash! Let’s 
get you home!” I cried. “Come on! Your parents will get the doctor! And... 
and...” 

I stopped when I saw that she was laughing. 

I dropped her arm and stepped back. 

She stood up, straightening her hair. “Duane, you jerk,” she muttered. “Are 
you going to fall for every dumb joke tonight?” 

“No way!” I replied angrily. “I just thought—” 

She gave me a shove. “You’re too easy to scare. How could you fall for 



such a stupid joke?” 

I shoved her back. “Just don’t pull any more dumb jokes, okay?” I snarled. 
“I mean it, Stephanie. I don’t think it’s funny. I really don’t. I’m not going to fall 
for any more stupid jokes. So don’t even try.” 

She wasn’t listening to me. She was staring over my shoulder. Staring in 
open-mouthed shock. 

“Oh, I d-don’t believe it!” she stammered. “There it is! There’s the head!” 



10 


I fell for it again. 

I couldn’t help myself. 

I let out a shrill scream. 

I spun around so hard, I nearly knocked myself over. I followed Stephanie’s 
finger. I squinted hard in the direction she pointed. 

She was pointing to a gray clump of dust. 

“Sucker! Sucker!” She slapped me on the back and started to giggle. 

I uttered a low growl and balled my hands into tight fists. But I didn’t say 
anything. I could feel my face burning. I knew that I was blushing. 

“You’re too easy to scare, Duane,” Stephanie teased again. “Admit it.” 

“Let’s just get back to the tour,” I grumbled. 

“No way, Duane. This is fun. Let’s try the next room. Come on.” 

When she saw that I wasn’t following her, she said, “I won’t scare you like 
that anymore. Promise.” 

I saw that her fingers were crossed. But I followed her anyway. 

What choice did I have? 

We crept through the narrow hall that connected us to the next room. And 
found ourselves in Andrew’s room. Poor, headless Andrew. 

It still had all his old stuff in it. Games and toys from a hundred years ago. 
An old-fashioned wooden bicycle leaning against one wall. 

Everything just the way it was. Before Andrew met up with the sea 
captain’s ghost. 

A lantern on the dresser cast blue shadows on the walls. I didn’t know if I 
believed the ghost story or not. But something told me that if Andrew’s head 
were anywhere, we’d find it here. In his room. 

Under his old-fashioned-looking canopy bed. Or hidden under his dusty, 
faded toys. 

Stephanie tiptoed over to the toys. She bent down and started to move 
things aside. Little wooden bowling pins. An old-fashioned board game, the 
colors all faded to brown. A set of metal toy soldiers. 

“Check around the bed, Duane,” she whispered. 



I started across the room. “Steph, we shouldn’t be touching this stuff. You 
know the tour guides never let us touch anything.” 

Stephanie set down an old wooden top. “Do you want to find the head or 
not?” 

“You really think there’s a ghost’s head hidden in this house?” 

“Duane, that’s what we’re here to find out—right?” 

I sighed and stepped over to the bed. I could see there was no use arguing 
with Stephanie tonight. 

I ducked my head under the purple canopy and studied the bed. A boy 
actually slept in this bed, I told myself. 

Andrew actually slept under this quilt. A hundred years ago. 

The thought gave me a chill. 

I tried to picture a boy about my age sleeping in this heavy, old bed. 

“Go ahead. Check out the bed,” Stephanie instructed from across the room. 

I leaned over and patted the gray and brown patchwork quilt. It felt cold 
and smooth. 

I punched the pillows. They felt soft and feathery. Nothing hidden inside 
the pillow cases. 

I was about to test the mattress when the quilt began to move. 

It rustled over the sheets. A soft, scratchy sound. 

Then, as I stared in horror, the gray and brown quilt began to slide down the 

bed. 

There was no one in the bed. No one! 

But someone was pushing the quilt down, down to the bottom of the bed. 



11 


I swallowed a scream. 

“You’ve got to move faster, Duane,” Stephanie said. 

I turned and saw her standing at the end of the bed. Holding the bottom of 
the quilt in both hands. 

“We don’t have all night!” she declared. She pulled the quilt down farther. 
“Nothing in the bed. Come on. Let’s move on.” 

A sigh escaped my lips. Stephanie had tugged down the quilt and scared me 
again. 

No ghost in the bed. No ghost pushing down the covers to climb out and 
grab me. 

Only Stephanie. 

At least this time she hadn’t seen how frightened I was. 

We worked together to pull the quilt back into place. She smiled at me. 
“This is kind of fun,” she said. 

“For sure,” I agreed. I hoped she couldn’t see that I was still shaking. “It’s a 
lot more fun than tossing rubber spiders into Ben Fuller’s bedroom window.” 

“I like being in this house so late at night. I like sneaking off from the 
group. I can feel a ghost lurking nearby,” Stephanie whispered. 

“You c-can?” I stammered, glancing quickly around the room. 

My eyes stopped at the bottom of the door to the hallway. 

There it sat. On the floor. Wedged between the door and the wall. Half- 
hidden in deep shadow. 

The head. 

This time, I saw the head. 

Not a joke. Not a cruel trick. 

Through the gray-black shadows, I saw the round skull. And I saw the two 
black eye sockets. Empty eye sockets. Two dark holes in the skull. 

Staring up at me. 

Staring. 

I grabbed Stephanie’s arm. I started to point. 

But there was no need. 



Stephanie saw it, too. 



12 


I was the first to move. I took a step toward the door. Then another. 

I heard sharp gasps. Someone breathing hard. Close behind me. 

It took me a few seconds to realize it was Stephanie. 

Keeping my eyes on the head, I made my way into the dark corner. My 
heart started to pound as I bent down and reached for it with both hands. 

The black eye sockets stared up at me. Round, sad eyes. 

My hands trembled. 

I started to scoop it up. 

But it slipped out of my hands. And started to roll away. 

Stephanie let out a cry as the head rolled over the floor toward her. 

In the orange light from the lantern, I saw her frightened expression. I saw 
that she was frozen there. 

The head rolled over the floor and bumped against her sneaker. It came to a 
stop inches in front of her. 

The empty black eye sockets stared up at her. 

“Duane—” she called, staring down at it, hands pressed against her cheeks. 
“I didn’t think—I didn’t really think we’d find it. I—I—” 

I hurried back across the room. It’s my turn to be the brave one, I decided. 
My turn to show Stephanie that I’m not a wimp who’s afraid of every shadow. 
My turn to show Stephanie. 

I scooped up the ghost’s head in both hands. I raised it in front of Stephanie. 
Then I moved toward the lantern on the dressertop. 

The head felt hard. Smoother than I thought. 

The eye sockets were deep. 

Stephanie stayed close by my side. Together we made our way into the 
orange lantern light. 

I let out a groan when I realized I wasn’t carrying a ghost’s head. 

Stephanie groaned too when she saw what I held in my hands. 



13 


A bowling ball. 

I was carrying an old wooden bowling ball, the pale wood cracked and 
chipped. 

“I don’t believe it,” Stephanie murmured, slapping her forehead. 

My eyes went to the wooden bowling pins, lying among Andrew’s old toys. 
“This must be the ball that went with those pins,” I said softly. 

Stephanie grabbed it from me and turned it between her hands. “But it only 
has two holes.” 

I nodded. “Yeah. In those days, bowling balls only had two holes. My dad 
told me about it one day when we went bowling. Dad never could figure out 
what they did with their thumb.” 

Stephanie stuck her fingers into the two holes. The “eye sockets”. She 
shook her head. I could see she was really disappointed. 

We could hear Otto’s voice, booming from somewhere downstairs. 

Stephanie sighed. “Maybe we should go down and rejoin the tour,” she 
suggested. She rolled the ball back to the pile of toys. 

“No way!” I exclaimed. 

I liked being the brave one for a change. I didn’t want to quit while I was 
ahead. 

“It’s getting kind of late,” Stephanie said. “And we’re not going to find any 
ghost head up here.” 

“That’s because we’ve already explored these rooms a hundred times,” I 
told her. “I think we should find a room we’ve never explored before.” 

She scrunched up her face, thinking hard. “Duane, do you mean—?” 

“I mean, the ghost head is probably hidden in a room the tour doesn’t go 
through. Maybe upstairs. You know. On the top floor.” 

Stephanie’s eyes grew wide. “You want to sneak up to the top floor?” 

I nodded. “Why not? That’s probably where all the ghosts hang out— 
right?” 

She studied me, her eyes searching mine. I knew she was surprised by my 
brave idea. 

Of course, I didn’t feel very brave at all. I just wanted to impress her. I just 



wanted to be the brave one for a change. 

I was hoping that she’d say no. I was hoping she’d say, “Let’s go back 
downstairs, Duane.” 

But instead, an excited grin spread over her face. And she said, “Okay. Let’s 
do it!” 



14 


So I was stuck being the brave one. 

We both had to be brave now. The Twin Terrors, on their way up the dark, 
creaking stairway that led to the third floor. 

A sign beside the stairs read: NO VISITORS. 

We stepped right past it and began climbing the narrow staircase. Side by 

side. 

I couldn’t hear Otto’s voice anymore. Now I could only hear the creak and 
squeak of the steps beneath our sneakers. And the steady thud thud thud of my 
heart. 

The air grew hot and damp as we reached the top. I squinted down a long, 
dark hallway. There were no lanterns. No candles. 

The only light came from the window at the end of the hall. Pale light from 
outside that cast everything in an eerie, ghostly blue. 

“Let’s start in the first room,” Stephanie suggested, whispering. She 
brushed her dark hair off her face. 

It was so hot up here, I had sweat running down my forehead. I mopped it 
up with my jacket sleeve and followed Stephanie to the first room on the right. 

The heavy wooden door was half open. We slid in through the opening. 
Pale blue light washed in through the dust-caked windows. 

I waited for my eyes to adjust. Then I squinted around the large room. 

Empty. Completely empty. No furniture. No sign of life. 

Or ghosts. 

“Steph—look.” I pointed to a narrow door against the far wall. “Let’s check 
it out.” 

We crept across the bare floor. Through the dusty window, I glimpsed the 
full moon, high over the bare trees now. 

The doorway led to another room. Smaller and even warmer. A steam 
radiator clanked against one wall. Two old-fashioned-looking couches stood 
facing each other in the center of the room. No other furniture. 

“Let’s keep moving,” Stephanie whispered. 

Another narrow door led to another dark room. “The rooms up here are all 
connected,” I murmured. I sneezed. Sneezed again. 



“Ssshhh. Quiet, Duane,” Stephanie scolded. “The ghosts will hear us 
coming.” 

“I can’t help it,” I protested. “It’s so dusty up here.” 

We were in some kind of sewing room. An old sewing machine stood on a 
table in front of the window. A carton at my feet was filled with balls of black 
yarn. 

I bent down and pawed quickly through the balls of yarn. No head hidden 
in there. 

We stepped into the next room before we realized it was completely dark. 

The window was partly shuttered. Only a tiny square of gray light crept 
through from outside. 

“I-I can’t see anything,” Stephanie declared. I felt her hand grasp my arm. 
“It’s too dark. Let’s get out of here, Duane.” 

I started to reply. But a loud thump made my breath catch in my throat. 

Stephanie’s hand squeezed my hand. “Duane, did you make that thump?” 

Another thump. Closer to us. 

“No. Not m-me,” I stammered. 

Another thump on the floor. 

“We’re not alone in here,” Stephanie whispered. 

I took a deep breath. “Who is it?” I called. “Who’s there?” 



15 


“Who’s there?” I choked out. 

Stephanie squeezed my arm so hard, it hurt. But I made no attempt to move 
away from her. 

I heard soft footsteps. Ghostly footsteps. 

A cold chill froze the back of my neck. I clamped my jaw shut to keep my 
teeth from chattering. 

And then yellow eyes floated toward us through the thick darkness. 

Four yellow eyes. 

The creature had four eyes! 

A gurgling sound escaped my throat. I couldn’t breathe. I couldn’t move. 

I stared straight ahead. Listening. 

Watching. 

The eyes floated apart in pairs. Two eyes moved to the right, two to the left. 

“Noooo!” I cried out when I saw more eyes. 

Yellow eyes in the corners of the room. Evil eyes glinting at us from against 
the wall. 

Yellow eyes all along the floor. 

Yellow eyes all around us. 

Catlike yellow eyes glaring in silence at Stephanie and me as we huddled 
together in the center of the room. 

Catlike eyes. 

Cat’s eyes. 

Because the room was filled with cats. 

A shrill yowl gave them away. A long meeeeyoww from the windowsill 
made Stephanie and me both sigh in relief. 

A cat brushed against my leg. Startled, I jumped aside, bumping into 
Stephanie. 

She bumped me back. 

More cats meowed. Another cat brushed the back of my jeans leg. 

“I-I think these cats are lonely,” Stephanie stammered. “Do you think 
anyone ever comes up here?” 



“I don’t care,” I snapped. “All these yellow eyes floating around. I 
thought... I thought... well... I don’t know what I thought! It’s creepy. Let’s get 
out of here.” 

For once, Stephanie didn’t argue. 

She led the way to the door at the back of the room. All around us, cats 
were howling and yowling. 

Another one brushed my leg. 

Stephanie tripped over a cat. In the darkness, I saw her fall. She landed on 
her knees with a hard thud. 

The cats all began to screech. 

“Are you okay?” I cried, hurrying to help pull her up. 

The cats were howling so loud, I couldn’t hear her reply. 

We jogged to the door, pulled it open, and escaped. 

I closed the door behind us. Silence now. “Where are we?” I whispered. 

“I-I don’t know,” Stephanie stammered, keeping close to the wall. 

I moved to a tall, narrow window and peered through the dusty glass. The 
window led out to a small balcony. The balcony jutted out from the gray 
shingled roof. 

Pale white moonlight washed in through the window. 

I turned back to Stephanie. “We’re in some kind of back hallway,” I 
guessed. The long, narrow hallway seemed to stretch on forever. “Maybe these 
rooms are used by the workers. You know. Manny, the night watchman. The 
house cleaners. And the tour guides.” 

Stephanie sighed. She stared down the long hallway. “Let’s go downstairs 
and find Otto and the tour group. I think we’ve done enough exploring for 
tonight.” 

I agreed. “There must be stairs at the end of this hall. Let’s go.” 

I took four or five steps. Then I felt the ghostly hands. 

They brushed over my face. My neck. My body. 

Sticky, dry, invisible hands. 

The hands pushed me back as they clung to my skin. 

“Ohhhh, help!” Stephanie moaned. 

The ghosts had her in their grasp, too. 



16 


The ghost’s filmy hands brushed over me. I could feel the soft fingers—dry and 
soft as air—tighten around my skin. 

Stephanie’s hands thrashed wildly. Beside me in the dark hall, she struggled 
to free herself. 

“It-it’s like a net!” she choked out. 

I swiped at my face. My hair. 

I spun away. But the dry fingers clung to me. Tightening. Tightening. 

And I realized we hadn’t walked into a ghost’s grasp. 

Tugging and tearing frantically with both hands, I realized we had walked 
into cobwebs. 

A thick curtain of cobwebs. 

The blanket of sticky threads had fallen over us like a fisherman’s net. The 
more we struggled, the tighter it wrapped itself around us. 

“Stephanie—it’s cobwebs !” I cried. I tugged a thick, stringy wad of them 
off my face. 

“Of course it’s cobwebs!” she shot back, squirming and thrashing. “What 
did you think it was?” 

“Uh... a ghost,” I muttered. 

Stephanie snickered. “Duane, I know you have a good imagination. But if 
you start seeing ghosts everywhere, we’ll never get out of here.” 

“I... I... I...” I didn’t know what to say. 

Stephanie thought the same thing I did. She thought she’d been grabbed by 
a ghost. But now she was pretending she knew all along. 

We stood there in the darkness, tearing the sticky threads off our faces and 
arms and bodies. I let out an angry groan. I couldn’t brush the stuff from my 
hair! 

“I’m going to itch forever !” I wailed. 

“I’ve got more bad news for you,” Stephanie murmured. 

I pulled a thick wad off my ear. “Huh?” 

“Who do you think made these cobwebs?” 

I didn’t have to think about it. “Spiders?” 



My arms and legs started to tingle. My back began to itch. I felt a light 
tingling on the back of my neck. 

Were there spiders crawling up and down my body? Hundreds and 
hundreds of them? 

Forgetting the wispy strings of cobweb, I started to run. Stephanie had the 
same idea. We both ran down the long hall, scratching and slapping at ourselves. 

“Steph—the next time you have a great idea, don’t have a great idea!” I 
warned her. 

“Let’s just get out of here!” she groaned. 

We reached the end of the hall, still scratching as we ran. 

No stairway. 

How do we get back downstairs? 

Another hall twisted to the left. Low candles over the doorways flickered 
and danced. Shadows darted over the worn carpet like slithering animals. 

“Come on.” I pulled Stephanie’s arm. We had no choice. We had to follow 
this hallway, too. 

We jogged side by side. The rooms were ah dark and silent. 

The candle flames dipped as we ran past. Our long shadows ran ahead of 
us, as if eager to get downstairs first. 

I stopped when I heard someone laughing. 

“Whoa,” Stephanie murmured, breathing hard. Her dark eyes grew wide. 

We both listened hard. 

I heard voices. Inside the room at the end of the hall. 

The door was closed. I couldn’t make out the words. I heard a man say 
something. A woman laughed. Other people laughed. 

“We caught up to the tour,” I whispered. 

Stephanie scrunched up her face. “But the tour never comes up here to the 
top floor,” she protested. 

We stepped up close to the door and listened again. 

More laughter on the other side. A lot of people talking cheerfully, all at the 
same time. It sounded like a party. 

I pressed my ear against the door. “I think the tour ended, and everyone is 
just chatting,” I whispered. 

Stephanie scratched the back of her neck. She pulled a stringy gob of 
cobweb from her hair. “Well, hurry, Duane. Open the door. Let’s join them,” she 
urged. 



“I hope Otto doesn’t ask us where we’ve been,” I replied. 
I grabbed the doorknob and pushed open the door. 
Stephanie and I took a step inside. 

And gasped in shock at what we saw. 



17 


The room stood empty. 

Empty, silent, and dark. 

“What happened? Where is everyone?” Stephanie cried. 

We took another step into the dark room. The floor creaked beneath us. The 
only sound. 

“I don’t get it,” Stephanie whispered. “Didn’t we just hear voices in here?” 
“Lots,” I said. “They were laughing and talking. It really sounded like a 
party.” 

“A big party,” Stephanie added, her eyes darting around the empty room. 
“Tons of people.” 

A cold chill ran down the back of my neck. “I don’t think we heard people,” 
I whispered. 

Stephanie turned to me. “Huh?” 

“They weren’t people,” I croaked. “They were ghosts.” 

Her mouth dropped open. “And they all disappeared when we opened the 
door?” 

I nodded. “I—I think I can still feel them in here. I can feel their presence.” 
Stephanie let out a frightened squeak. “Feel them? What do you mean?” 

At that moment, a cold wind came whooshing through the room. It rushed 
over me, cold and dry. And it chilled me down to my toes. 

Stephanie must have felt it, too. She wrapped her arms around her chest. 
“Brrr! Do you feel that breeze? Is the window open? How come it got so cold in 
here all of a sudden?” she asked. 

She shivered again. Her voice became tiny. “We’re not alone in here, are 

we?” 

“I don’t think so,” I whispered. “I think we just crashed someone’s party.” 
Stephanie and I stood there, feeling the cold of the room. I didn’t dare 
move. Maybe a ghost stood right beside me. Maybe the ghosts we heard were all 
around us, staring at us, preparing to swoop over us. 

“Stephanie,” I whispered. “What if we really have crashed their party? 
What if we’ve invaded the ghosts’ quarters?” 

Stephanie swallowed hard. She didn’t reply. 



Hadn’t Andrew, the ghost boy, lost his head when he stumbled into the 
ghost’s living quarters? Were we standing in the same living quarters? The same 
room where Andrew found the ghost of the old sea captain? 

“Stephanie, I think we should get out of here,” I said softly. “Now.” 

I wanted to run. I wanted to fly down the stairs. Fly out of Hill House. Fly 
to my safe, warm home where there were no ghosts. 

No ghosts. 

We spun around and bolted for the door. 

Were the ghosts going to try to stop us? 

No. We made it back into the flickering orange light of the hallway. I pulled 
the door shut behind us. 

“The stairs. Where are the stairs?” Stephanie cried. 

We stood at the end of the hall. Facing a solid wall. The flowers on the 
wallpaper appeared to open and close, moving in the darting candlelight. 

I banged both fists against the wall. “How do we get out of here? How?” 

Stephanie had already pulled open a door across the hall. I followed her 
inside. 

“Oh, no!” Ghostly figures filled the room. It took me a few seconds to 
realize that I was staring at sheets pulled over furniture. Chairs and couches 
covered with sheets. 

“M-maybe this is the ghosts’ living room,” I stammered. 

Stephanie didn’t hear me. She had already burst through the open door 
against the far wall. 

I followed her into another room, cluttered with large crates. The crates 
were piled nearly to the ceiling. 

Another room. Then another. 

My heart began to pound. My throat ached. 

I felt so discouraged. Were we ever going to find our way to the stairs? 

Another door. Another dark, empty room. 

“Hey, Steph—” I whispered. “I think we’re going in circles.” 

Out into a long, twisting hallway. More candles. More flowers flickering 
darkly on the wallpaper. 

We ran side by side down the hall. Until we came to a door I hadn’t seen 
before. A door with a horseshoe nailed onto it. 

Maybe it meant that our luck was about to change. I sure hoped so! 

I grabbed the knob with a trembling hand. I pulled open the door. 



A staircase! 

“Yes!” I cried. 

“Finally!” Stephanie gasped. 

“This must be the servants’ staircase,” I guessed. “Maybe we’ve been in the 
servants’ quarters all this time.” 

The stairway was blanketed in darkness. The stairs looked steep. 

I took a step down, holding onto the wall. Then another step. 

Stephanie had one hand on my shoulder. When I stepped down, she stepped 
down, too. 

Another step. Another. The soft thuds of our sneakers echoed in the deep 
stairwell. 

We had taken about ten steps when I heard footsteps. 

Someone coming up the stairs. 



18 


Stephanie bumped me hard. I shot out both hands. Grabbed the wall to keep 
from falling down the stairs. 

No time to turn and run. 

The footsteps grew louder. And heavier. Light from a flashlight swept over 
Stephanie, then me. 

Squinting against the light, I saw a dark figure climbing up to us. “So there 
you are!” his voice boomed, echoing in the stairwell. 

A familiar voice. 

“Otto!” Stephanie and I both cried. 

He bounced up in front of us, moving the flashlight from her face to mine. 
“What are you two doing up here?” he demanded breathlessly. 

“Uh... we got lost,” I answered quickly. 

“We got separated from the tour,” Stephanie added. “We tried to find you.” 

“Yes. We tried,” I chimed in. “We were searching everywhere. But we 
couldn’t catch up to the group.” 

Otto lowered the flashlight. I could see his tiny dark eyes narrowing at us. I 
don’t think he believed our story. 

“I thought you two knew my tour by heart,” he said, rubbing his chin. 

“We do,” Stephanie insisted. “We just got turned around. We got lost. And 
we—” 

“But how did you get up here on the top floor?” Otto demanded. 

“Well...” I started. But I couldn’t think of a good answer. I turned back to 
Stephanie on the step above me. 

“We heard voices up here. We thought it was you,” she told Otto. 

It wasn’t exactly a lie. We did hear voices. 

Otto lowered the beam of light to the stairs. “Well, let’s get back 
downstairs. No one is allowed on this floor. It’s private.” 

“Sorry,” Stephanie and I murmured. 

“Watch your step, kids,” Otto warned. “These back stairs are very steep and 
rickety. I’ll lead you back to the group. Edna took over for me while I went to 
find you.” 



Edna was our second-favorite tour guide. She was old and white-haired. 
Very pale and frail-looking, especially in her black tour-guide outfit. 

But she was a great storyteller. With her quivering, old voice, she really 
made you believe every frightening story she told. 

Stephanie and I eagerly clumped down the stairs, following Otto. His 
flashlight swept in front of us as he led us out onto the second floor. We followed 
a long hallway. A hallway I knew very well. 

We stopped outside Joseph Craw’s study. Joseph was Andrew’s father. I 
peeked inside. A bright fire blazed in the fireplace. 

Edna stood beside the fireplace, telling the tragic story of Joseph Craw to 
the tour group. 

Stephanie and I had heard the sad story a hundred times. A year after 
Andrew had his head cut off, Joseph came home late one winter night. He took 
off his coat, then moved to the fireplace to warm himself. 

No one knows how Joseph was burned up. At least, that’s how Otto, Edna, 
and the other guides tell the story. Was he pushed into the fireplace? Did he fall 
in? 

One guess is as good as another. 

But when the maid came into the study the next morning, she found a 
horrifying sight. 

She found two charred, blackened hands gripping the mantel. 

Two hands, holding on tightly to the marble mantelpiece. 

All that was left of Joseph Craw. 

It’s a yucky story—isn’t it? 

It gives me a chill every time I hear it. 

As Otto led us to the study, Edna was just getting to the sickening part. The 
ending. “Do you want to rejoin the group?” Otto whispered. 

“It’s pretty late. I think we’d better get home,” Stephanie told him. 

I quickly agreed. “Thanks for rescuing us. We’ll catch the tour again soon.” 

“Good night,” Otto said, clicking off his flashlight. “You know the way 
out.” He hurried into the study. 

I started to leave. But stopped when I saw the boy again, the pale boy with 
the wavy blond hair. The boy in the black jeans and black turtleneck. 

He stood away from the tour group. Close to the door. And he was staring 
at Stephanie and me again. Staring hard at us, a cold expression on his face. 

“Come on,” I whispered, grabbing Stephanie’s arm. I tugged her away from 



the study door. 

We quickly found the front stairway. A few seconds later, we pushed open 
the front door and stepped outside. A cold wind greeted us as we started down 
the hill. Wisps of black cloud floated like snakes over the moon. 

“Well, that was fun!” Stephanie declared. She zipped her coat to her chin. 

“Fun?” I wasn’t so sure. “It was kind of scary.” 

Stephanie grinned at me. “But we weren’t afraid—right?” 

I shivered. “Right.” 

“I’d like to go back and explore some more,” she said. “You know. Maybe 
go back to that room with all the voices. Find some real ghosts.” 

“Yeah. Great,” I agreed. I didn’t feel like arguing with her. I felt pretty tired. 

She pulled a wool muffler from her coat pocket. As she swung it around her 
neck, one end caught in a low pine bush. 

“Hey—!” she cried out. 

I moved to the bush and started to pull the muffler free. 

And that’s when I heard the voice. 

Just a whisper. A whisper from the other side of the bush. 

But I heard it very clearly. 

“Did you find my head ? ” 

That’s what I heard. 

“Did you find my head? Did you find it for me?” 



19 


I uttered a startled gasp and stared into the bush. “Stephanie—did you hear 
that?” I choked out. 

No reply. 

“Stephanie? Steph?” 

I spun around. She was staring at me, her mouth open in surprise. 

“Did you hear that whisper?” I asked again. 

Then I realized she wasn’t staring at me. She was staring past me. 

I turned—and saw the strange, blond boy standing there beside the pine 
bush. “Hey—did you just whisper to us?” I demanded sharply. 

He narrowed his pale gray eyes at me. “Huh? Me?” 

“Yeah. You,” I snapped. “Were you trying to scare us?” 

He shook his head. “No way.” 

“You didn’t whisper from behind this bush?” I asked again. 

“I just got out here,” the boy insisted. 

We saw him in Joseph Craw’s study less than a minute ago, I told myself. 
How did he get out here so fast? 

“Why did you follow us?” Stephanie demanded, shoving her muffler 
around her coat collar. 

The boy shrugged. 

“Why were you staring at us?” I asked, stepping up close to Stephanie. 

The wind howled over the hilltop. The row of pine bushes shook in the 
gusty wind, as if shivering. Thin black clouds continued to snake their way over 
the pale moon. 

The boy wore no coat. Only the black turtleneck and black jeans. The wind 
fluttered his long, wavy hair. 

“We saw you staring at us,” Stephanie repeated. “How come?” 

He shrugged again. He kept his strange, gray eyes down at the ground. “I 
saw you sneak away,” he said. “I wondered if... if you saw anything 
interesting.” 

“We got lost,” I told him, glancing at Stephanie. “We didn’t see much.” 

“What’s your name?” Stephanie asked. 



“Seth,” he replied. 

We told him our names. 

“Do you live in Wheeler Falls?” Stephanie asked. 

He shook his head. He kept his eyes down at his shoes. “No. I’m just 
visiting.” 

Why wouldn’t he look us in the eye? Was he just shy? 

“Are you sure you didn’t whisper something from behind that bush?” I 
asked again. 

He shook his head. “No way. Maybe someone was playing a joke on you.” 

“Maybe,” I said. I stepped closer and kicked the bush. I don’t know what I 
expected. 

But nothing happened. 

“You and Stephanie went exploring on your own?” Seth asked. 

“Yeah. A little,” I confessed. “We’re kind of into ghosts.” 

When I said that, he jerked his head up. He raised his gray eyes and gazed 
hard at Stephanie, then at me. 

His face had been a blank. No life to it. No expression at all. 

But now I could see that he was really excited. 

“Do you want to see some real ghosts?” he asked us, staring hard. “Do 


you?” 



20 


Seth stared at us as if challenging us. “Do you two want to see some real 
ghosts?” 

“Yeah. Sure,” Stephanie replied, returning his stare. 

“What do you mean, Seth?” I demanded. “Have you ever seen a ghost?” 

He nodded. “Yeah. In there.” He pointed with his head, back to the big 
stone house. 

“Huh?” I cried. “You saw a real ghost in Hill House? When?” 

“Duane and I have taken the tour a hundred times,” Stephanie told him. 
“We’ve never seen any ghost in there.” 

He snickered. “Of course not. Do you think the ghosts come out when the 
tour groups are in there? They wait till the house closes. They wait until all the 
tourists go home.” 

“How do you know?” I asked. 

“I sneaked in,” Seth replied. “Late one night.” 

“You what?” I cried. “How?” 

“I found a door around back. It was unlocked. I guess everyone forgot about 
it,” Seth explained. “I sneaked in after the house was closed. And I—” 

He stopped suddenly. His eyes were on the house. 

I turned and saw the front door open. People stepped out, fastening their 
coats. The last tour had ended. People were heading for home. 

“Over here!” Seth whispered. 

We followed him behind the pine bushes and ducked down low. The people 
walked past us. They were laughing and talking about the house and all the ghost 
stories. 

When they were down the hill, we stood up again. Seth brushed his long 
hair off his forehead. But the wind blew it right back. 

“I sneaked in late at night, when the house was dark,” he repeated. 

“Your parents let you go out so late at night?” I asked. 

A strange smile crossed his lips. “They didn’t know,” he said softly. The 
smile faded. “Your parents let you two out?” 

Stephanie laughed. “Our parents don’t know, either.” 



“Good,” Seth replied. 

“And you really saw a ghost?” I asked. 

He nodded. Brushed his hair back again. “I crept past Manny, the night 
watchman. He was sound asleep. Snoring away. I made my way to the front of 
the house. I was standing at the bottom of the big staircase—when I heard a 
laugh.” 

I gulped. “A laugh?” 

“From the top of the stairs. I backed up against the wall. And I saw the 
ghost. A very old lady. In a long dress and a black bonnet. She wore a heavy 
black veil over the front of her face. But I could see her eyes through the veil. I 
could see them because they glowed bright red—like fire!” 

“Wow!” Stephanie cried. “What did she do?” 

Seth turned to the house. The front door had closed. The lantern over the 
door had been put out. The house stood in total darkness. 

“The old ghost came sliding down the banister,” he reported. “She tossed 
back her head—and screamed all the way down. And as she slid, her red eyes 
left a bright trail, like the tail of a comet.” 

“Weren’t you scared?” I asked Seth. “Didn’t you try to run away?” 

“There was no time,” he replied. “She came sliding down the banister, right 
toward me. Eyes blazing. Screaming like some kind of crazed animal. I was 
pressed against the wall. I couldn’t move. And when she reached the bottom, I 
thought she’d grab me. But she vanished. Disappeared into the darkness. And all 
that was left was the faint red glow, floating in the air. The glow of her eyes.” 

“Oh, wow!” Stephanie cried. 

“That’s awesomel” I agreed. 

“I want to sneak back in again,” Seth declared, watching the house. “I’ll bet 
there are more ghosts in there. I really want to see them.” 

“Me, too!” Stephanie cried eagerly. 

Seth smiled at her. “So you’ll come with me? Tomorrow night? I don’t want 
to go back alone. It’ll be so much more fun if you come, too.” 

The wind swirled sharply. The black clouds rolled over the moon, covering 
it, shutting out its light. The old house appeared to grow darker on its hilltop 
perch. 

“So you’ll come with me tomorrow night?” Seth asked again. 

“Yeah. Great!” Stephanie told him. “I can’t wait. How about you, Duane?” 
She turned to me. “You’ll come, too—won’t you, Duane? Won’t you?” 



21 


I said yes. 

I said I couldn’t wait to see a real ghost. 

I said I was shivering because of the cold wind. Not because I was scared. 

We made a plan to meet at midnight tomorrow at the back of Hill House. 
Then Seth hurried away. And Stephanie and I walked home. 

The street was dark and empty. Most of the house lights were out. Far in the 
distance, a dog howled. 

Stephanie and I walked quickly, leaning into the wind. We usually didn’t 
stay out this late. 

Tomorrow night, we’d be even later. 

“I don’t trust that guy,” I told Stephanie as we reached her front yard. “He’s 
too weird.” 

I expected her to agree. But she said, “You’re just jealous, Duane.” 

“Huh? Me? Jealous?” I couldn’t believe she said that. “Why would I be 
jealous?” 

“Because Seth is so brave. Because he saw a ghost and we didn’t.” 

I shook my head. “Do you believe that crazy story about a ghost sliding 
down the banister? I think he made it up.” 

“Well,” Stephanie replied thoughtfully, “we’ll find out tomorrow night— 
won’t we!” 

Tomorrow night came too quickly. 

I had a math test in the afternoon. I don’t think I did too well on it. I 
couldn’t stop thinking about Seth, and Hill House, and ghosts. 

After dinner, Mom cornered me in the living room. She brushed back my 
hair and studied my face. “Why do you look so tired?” she asked. “You have 
dark circles around your eyes.” 

“Maybe I’m part raccoon,” I replied. That’s what I always say when she 
tells me I have circles around my eyes. 

“I think you should go to bed early tonight,” Dad chimed in. Dad always 
thinks that everyone should go to bed early. 

So I went to my room at nine-thirty. But of course I didn’t go to sleep. 



I read a book and listened to a tape on my Walkman. And waited for Mom 
and Dad to go to bed. And watched the clock. 

Mom and Dad are very heavy sleepers. You can pound and pound on their 
bedroom door, and they don’t wake up. They once slept through a hurricane. 
That’s the truth. They didn’t hear the tree that fell onto our house! 

Stephanie’s parents are heavy sleepers, too. That’s why it’s so easy for the 
two of us to sneak out of our bedroom windows. That’s why it’s so easy for us to 
haunt our neighborhood at night. 

As the clock neared midnight, I wished we were going out on one of our 
usual haunting trips. I wished we were going to hide under Chrissy Jacob’s 
window and howl like wolves. And then toss rubber spiders into Ben Fuller’s 
bed. 

But Stephanie had decided that was too boring. 

We needed excitement. We needed to go ghost hunting. With a strange kid 
we’d never seen before. 

At ten to twelve, I pulled on my down coat and crept out of my bedroom 
window. Another cold, windy night. I felt sprinkles of frozen rain on my 
forehead. Sol pulled up my hood. 

Stephanie was waiting for me at the bottom of her driveway. She had pulled 
her brown hair back in a ponytail. Her coat was open. She wore a heavy ski 
sweater underneath, pulled down over her jeans. 

She raised her head and let out a ghostly howl. “Owooooooo!” 

I clapped my hand over her open mouth. “You’ll wake up the whole block!” 

She laughed and backed away from me. “I’m a little excited. Aren’t you?” 
She opened her mouth in another howl. 

The frozen rain pattered the ground. We hurried toward Hill House. The 
swirling wind scattered twigs and dead leaves as we walked. Most of the house 
lights had been turned off. 

A car rolled by slowly as we turned onto Hill Street. Stephanie and I ducked 
behind a hedge. The driver might wonder why two kids were wandering around 
Wheeler Falls at midnight. 

I wondered, too. 

We waited for the car to disappear. Then we continued our journey. 

Our sneakers crunched over the hard ground as we climbed the hill that led 
to the old haunted house. Hill House rose above us, like a silent monster waiting 
to swallow us up. 



The last tour had ended. The lights were all off. Otto and Edna and the other 
tour guides were probably all home by now. 

“Come on, Duane. Hurry,” Stephanie urged. She started to run around the 
side of the house. “Seth is probably waiting.” 

“Wait up!” I cried. We followed a narrow dirt path around to the back. 

Squinting into the darkness, I searched for Seth. No sign of him. 

The backyard was cluttered with equipment of all kinds. A row of rusted 
metal trashcans formed a fence along one wall. A long wooden ladder lay on its 
side in the tall weeds. Wooden cartons and barrels and cardboard boxes were 
strewn everywhere. A hand lawnmower tilted against the house. 

“It—it’s so much darker back here,” Stephanie stammered. “Do you see 
Seth?” 

“I can’t see anything ,” I replied in a whisper. “Maybe he changed his mind. 
Maybe he isn’t coming.” 

Stephanie started to reply. But a choked cry from the side of the house made 
us both jump. 

I turned to see Seth stagger into view. 

His blond hair was wild, flying around his face. His eyes bulged. His hands 
gripped his throat. 

“The ghost!” he cried, stumbling clumsily. “The ghost—he—he got me!” 

Then Seth collapsed at our feet and didn’t move. 



22 


“Nice try, Seth,” I said calmly. 

“Nice fall,” Stephanie added. 

He raised his head slowly, staring up at us. “I didn’t fool you?” 

“No way,” I replied. 

Stephanie rolled her eyes. “That’s Joke Number One,” she told Seth. 
“Duane and I have pulled that one a thousand times.” 

Seth climbed to his feet and brushed off the front of his black turtleneck. He 
scowled, disappointed. “Just trying to give you a little scare.” 

“You’ll have to do better than that,” I told him. 

“Duane and I are experts at giving scares,” Stephanie added. “It’s sort of 
our hobby.” 

Seth straightened his hair with both hands. “You two are weird,” he 
murmured. 

I brushed cold raindrops off my eyebrows. “Can we get inside?” I asked 
impatiently. 

Seth led the way to the narrow door at the far side of the house. “Did you 
two have any trouble sneaking out?” he asked, whispering. 

“No. No trouble,” Stephanie told him. 

“Neither did I,” he replied. He stepped up to the door and lifted the wooden 
latch. “I took the tour again tonight,” he whispered. “Otto showed me some new 
things. Some new rooms we can explore.” 

“Great!” Stephanie exclaimed. “Do you promise we’ll see a real ghost?” 
Seth turned back to her. A strange smile spread over his face. “Promise,” he 

said. 



23 


Seth gave the door a tug, and it creaked open. 

We slipped inside. Into total blackness. Too dark to see where we were. 

I took a few steps into the room—and bumped into Seth. 

“Ssshhh,” he warned. “Manny the night watchman is posted in the front 
room. He’s probably asleep already. But we’d better stay in back.” 

“Where are we?” I whispered. 

“In one of the back rooms,” Seth whispered. “Wait a few seconds. Our eyes 
will adjust.” 

“Can’t we turn on a light?” I asked. 

“Ghosts won’t come out in the light,” Seth replied. 

We had closed the door behind us. But a cold wind still blew at my back. 

I shivered. 

A soft rattling sound made my breath catch in my throat. 

Was I starting to hear things? 

I pulled off my hood to hear better. 

Silence now. 

“I think I know where I can find some candles,” Seth whispered. “You two 
wait here. Don’t move.” 

“D-don’t worry,” I stammered. I didn’t plan to go anywhere until I could 

see! 

I heard Seth move away, making soft, scraping footsteps over the floor, 
keeping as quiet as he could. His footsteps faded into silence. 

Then I felt another rush of cold wind against the back of my neck. 

“Oh!” I cried out when I heard the rattling again. 

A gentle rattling. Like the rattling of bones. 

Another cold gust of wind swept over me. A ghost’s cold breath, I thought. 
My whole body shook as a chill ran down my back. 

I heard the rattling bones again. Louder. A clattering sound. So close. 

I reached out in the thick blackness. Tried to grab onto a wall. Or a table. Or 
anything. 

But my hands grabbed only air. 



I swallowed hard. Calm down, Duane, I ordered myself. Seth will be back 
in a moment with some candles. Then you’ll see that everything is okay. 

But another jangle and clatter of bones made me gasp. 

“Steph—did you hear that?” I whispered. 

No reply. 

A cold wind tingled my neck. 

The bones rattled again. 

“Steph? Do you hear that noise, too? Steph?” 

No reply. 

“Stephanie? Steph?” I called. 

She was gone. 



24 


Panic time. 

My breaths came short and fast. My heart clattered louder than the skeleton 
bones. My whole body began to shake. 

“Stephanie? Steph? Where are you?” I choked out weakly. 

Then I saw the two yellow eyes moving toward me. Two glowing eyes, 
floating silently, gleaming with evil. Coming nearer. Nearer. 

I froze. 

I couldn’t move. I couldn’t see anything but those two gleaming, yellow 

eyes. 

“Ohh!” I uttered a moan as they floated closer. And I could see them more 
clearly. See that they were candle flames. 

Two candle flames, moving side by side. 

In the soft yellow light, I saw Seth’s face. And Stephanie’s. They each 
carried a lighted candle in front of them. 

“Stephanie—where were you?” I cried in a choked whisper. “I—I thought 

55 

“I went with Seth,” she replied calmly. 

The orange glow from her candle washed over me. I guess Stephanie could 
see how panicked I was. “I’m sorry, Duane,” she said softly. “I said I was going 
with Seth. I thought you heard me.” 

“S-something is rattling,” I stammered. “Bones, I think. I keep feeling a 
cold wind, and I keep hearing—” 

Seth handed me a candle. “Light it,” he instructed. “We’ll look around. See 
what’s rattling.” 

I took the candle and raised it to his. But my hand was shaking so badly, it 
took me five tries to light the wick. Finally, the candle flamed to life. 

I gazed around in the flickering orange light. 

“Hey—we’re in the kitchen,” Stephanie whispered. 

A gust of cold wind blew past me. “Did you feel that?” I cried. 

Seth pointed his candle flame toward the kitchen window. “Look, Duane— 
that window-pane. It’s missing. The cold air is blowing in through the hole.” 

“Oh. Right.” 



Another blast of air. And then the rattling. 

“Did you hear it?” I demanded. 

Stephanie giggled. She pointed to the kitchen wall. In the dim light, I saw 
big pots and pans hanging on the wall. “The wind is making them rattle,” 
Stephanie explained. 

“Ha-ha.” I uttered a feeble laugh. “I knew that. I was just trying to scare 
you,” I lied. “You know. Give you a thrill.” 

I felt like a total jerk. But why should I admit that a bunch of pots on the 
wall nearly had me scared out of my skin? 

“Okay. No more jokes,” Stephanie insisted, turning to Seth. “We want to 
see a real ghost.” 

“Follow me. HI show you something that Otto told me about,” Seth 
whispered. 

Holding his candle in front of him, he led the way across the kitchen to the 
wall beside the stove. He lowered his candle in front of a cabinet door. Then he 
pulled open the cabinet door and moved the candle closer so we could see inside. 

“Why are you showing us a kitchen cabinet?” I demanded. “What’s scary 
about that?” 

“It’s not a cabinet,” Seth replied. “It’s a dumbwaiter. Watch.” He reached 
inside and pulled a rope beside the cabinet shelf. The shelf began to slide up. 

He raised the shelf, then lowered it. “See? This dumbwaiter is like a little 
elevator. It was used to send food from the kitchen to the master bedroom 
upstairs.” 

“You mean for midnight snacks?” I joked. 

Seth nodded. “The cook would put the food on the shelf. Then he would 
pull the rope, and the shelf would carry it upstairs.” 

“Thrills and chills,” I said sarcastically. 

“Yeah. Why are you showing it to us?” Stephanie demanded. 

Seth brought the candle up close to his face. “Otto told me that this 
dumbwaiter is haunted. A hundred and twenty years ago, things suddenly started 
to go wrong with it.” 

Stephanie and I moved closer. I lowered my candle and examined the 
dumbwaiter cabinet. “What went wrong?” I asked. 

“Well,” Seth began softly, “the cook would put food on the shelf and send it 
upstairs. But when the shelf reached the bedroom up there, the food was gone.” 

Stephanie narrowed her eyes at Seth. “It disappeared between the first and 



second floor?” 

Seth nodded solemnly. His gray eyes glowed in the soft candlelight. “This 
happened several times. When the shelf reached the second floor, it was empty. 
The food had vanished.” 

“Wow,” I murmured. 

“The cook became very frightened,” Seth continued. “He was afraid that 
the dumbwaiter had become haunted. He decided to stop using it. And he 
ordered everyone on his staff never to use the dumbwaiter again.” 

“And that’s the end of the story?” I asked. 

Seth shook his head. “And then something horrible happened.” 

Stephanie’s mouth dropped open. “What? What happened?” 

“Some kids were visiting the house. One of them was a boy named Jeremy. 
Jeremy was a real show-off, and very athletic. When he saw the dumbwaiter, he 
decided it would be fun to ride it to the second floor.” 

“Oh, wow,” Stephanie murmured. 

I felt a chill. I thought I could guess what was coming. 

“So Jeremy squeezed onto the shelf. And one of the other kids pulled the 
rope. Suddenly the rope caught. The kid couldn’t get it to move up or down. 
Jeremy was stuck somewhere between the floors. 

“The other kids called up to him, ‘Are you okay?’ But Jeremy didn’t reply. 
They started to get very worried. They tugged and tugged, but they couldn’t 
move the rope. 

“Then suddenly, the shelf came crashing back down.” 

“And was Jeremy on it?” I asked eagerly. 

Seth shook his head. “There were three covered bowls on the shelf. The 
kids lifted the lid off the first bowl. Inside was Jeremy’s heart, still beating. 

“They opened the second bowl. Inside were Jeremy’s eyes, still staring in 
horror. And they opened the third bowl. And saw Jeremy’s teeth, still 
chattering.” 

The three of us stood silent in the orange glow of candlelight. We stared at 
the dumbwaiter shelf. 

I shivered. The pots rattled against the wall. But I was no longer frightened 
by them. I raised my eyes to Seth. “Do you think that story is true?” 

Stephanie laughed. Nervous laughter. “It can’t be true,” she said. 

Seth’s face remained solemn. “Do you believe any of Otto’s stories?” he 
asked me quietly. 



“Well. Yes. No. Some.” I couldn’t decide. 

“Otto swears the story is true,” Seth insisted. “But of course, he may just be 
doing his job. His job is to make this house as scary as possible.” 

“Otto is a great storyteller,” Stephanie murmured. “But enough stories. I 
want to see a real ghost.” 

“Follow me,” Seth replied. His candle flame dipped low as he spun around. 
He led us back through the kitchen, into a long, narrow room at the back. 
“This is the old butler’s pantry,” he announced. “All of the food for the house 
was stored in here.” 

Stephanie and I stepped past him, raising our candles to see the room better. 
When I turned around, Seth was closing the pantry door behind us. 

Then I saw him turn the lock. 

“Hey—what are you doing?” I cried. 

“Why are you locking us in here?” Stephanie demanded. 



25 


I dropped my candle. It bounced on the hard floor, and the flame went out. The 
candle rolled under a shelf. 

When I glanced back up, Stephanie was storming toward Seth. “Seth—what 
are you doing?” she demanded angrily. “Unlock that door. This isn’t funny!” 

I gazed around the long, narrow room. Shelves from floor to ceiling on 
three walls. No windows. No other door to escape through. 

With a sharp cry, Stephanie grabbed for the door handle. But Seth moved 
quickly to block her way. 

“Hey—!” I cried, my heart pounding. I stepped up beside Stephanie. 
“What’s the big idea, Seth?” 

His silvery eyes glowed with excitement behind his candle flame. He stared 
back at us without speaking. The same cold stare I had seen on his face the night 
before. 

Stephanie and I took a step back, huddling close together. 

“Sorry, guys. But I played a little trick on you,” he said finally. 

“Excuse me?” Stephanie cried, more angry than frightened. 

“What kind of trick?” I asked. 

He pushed back his long, blond hair with his free hand. The flickering 
candle sent shadows dancing across his face. “My name isn’t Seth,” he said 
softly, so softly I could barely hear him. 

“But—but—” I stammered. 

“My name is Andrew,” he said. 

Stephanie and I both cried out in surprise. 

“But Andrew is the name of the ghost,” Stephanie protested. “The ghost 
who lost his head.” 

“I am the ghost,” he said softly. A dry laugh escaped his lips. More like a 
cough than a laugh. “I promised you a real ghost tonight. Well... here I am.” 

He blew out the candle. He appeared to vanish with the light. 

“But, Seth—” Stephanie started. 

“Andrew,” he corrected her. “My name is Andrew. My name has been 
Andrew for more than a hundred years.” 

“Let us out of here,” I pleaded. “We won’t tell anyone we saw you. We 



won’t—” 

“I can’t let you go,” he replied in a whisper. 

I remembered the story of the sea captain’s ghost. When Andrew stumbled 
into the sea captain’s room and saw the old ghost, the sea captain had said the 
same thing to him. “Now that you have seen me, I can never let you go. ” 

“You—you lost your head!” I blurted out. 

“So you can’t be Andrew!” Stephanie cried. “You have a head!” 

In the dim light from Stephanie’s candle, I could see the sneer spread over 
Andrew’s face. “No,” he said softly. “No, no, no. I do not have my head. This is 
one that I borrowed.” 

He raised both hands to the sides of his face. “Here. Let me show you,” he 

said. 

Then he pressed his hands against his cheeks and started to tug the head up 
from the black turtleneck. 



26 


“No! Stop!” Stephanie screeched. 

I shut my eyes. I didn’t really want to see him pull off his head. 

When I opened my eyes, Andrew had lowered his hands. 

I gazed once again around the narrow pantry. How could we escape? How 
could we get out of there? The ghost was blocking the only exit. 

“Why did you trick us?” Stephanie asked Andrew. “Why did you bring us 
here? Why did you lie to us?” 

Andrew sighed. “I told you. I borrowed this head.” He ran one hand 
through the hair, then down over the cheek, as if petting it. “I borrowed it. But I 
have to return it.” 

Stephanie and I stared back at him in silence, waiting for him to continue. 
Waiting for him to explain. 

“I saw you last night in the tour group,” he said finally, his eyes locked on 
me. “The others couldn’t see me. But I made myself visible to you.” 

“Why?” I asked in a trembling voice. 

“Because of your head,” he replied. “I liked your head.” 

“Huh?” A frightened gasp escaped my throat. 

He gripped the blond hair again. “I have to return this head, Duane,” he said 
calmly, coldly. “So I’m going to take yours.” 



27 


A frightened giggle escaped my throat. 

Why do people suddenly start laughing when they’re terrified? I guess it’s 
because if you don’t laugh, you’ll scream. Or explode or something. 

Trapped in that small, dark room with a hundred-year-old ghost that wanted 
my head, I felt like laughing, screaming, and exploding all at once! 

I stared hard at Andrew, squinting in the dim light. “You’re kidding, right?” 

He shook his head. His silvery eyes narrowed, hard and cold. “I need your 
head, Duane,” he said softly. He shrugged, as if apologizing. “I’ll pull it off 
quickly. It won’t hurt a bit.” 

“But—but I need it, too!” I sputtered. 

“I’m only going to borrow it,” Andrew said. He took a step toward us. “I’ll 
return it when I find my own head. Promise.” 

“You’re not cheering me up,” I replied. 

He took another step toward us. 

Stephanie and I backed up a step. 

He took a step. We backed up a step. 

We didn’t have much more room to back up. We were nearly to the back 
wall of pantry shelves. 

Suddenly Stephanie spoke up. “Andrew, we’ll find your head!” she offered. 
Her voice shook. 

I turned to her. I’d never seen her scared before. Knowing that Stephanie 
was scared made me even more scared! 

“For sure!” I croaked. “We’ll find your real head. We’ll search all night. We 
know this house really well. I’m sure we can find it if you give us a chance.” 

He stared back at us without replying. 

I wanted to get down on my knees and beg him to give us a chance. 

But I was afraid that if I got down on my knees, he’d pull off my head. 

“We’ll find it, Andrew. I know we will,” Stephanie insisted. 

He shook his head. His borrowed head. “There’s no way,” he murmured 
sadly. “How long have I been searching this house? For more than a hundred 
years. For more than a hundred years, I’ve searched every hallway, every room, 
every closet.” 



He took another step closer. His eyes were locked on my head. I knew he 
was studying it, thinking about how it would look on his shoulders. 

“In all these years, I haven’t found my head,” Andrew continued. “So what 
makes you think you can find it tonight?” 

“Well... uh...” Stephanie turned to me. 

“Uh... maybe we’ll get lucky!” I declared. 

Lame. How lame can you get? 

“Sorry,” Andrew murmured. “I need your head, Duane. We’re wasting 
time.” 

“Give us a chance!” I cried. 

He took a step closer. He was studying my hair now. Probably deciding if 
he should let it grow longer. 

“Andrew—please!” I begged. 

It was no use. His eyes were glassy now. He reached out both hands and 
took another step. 

Stephanie and I backed up. 

“Give me your head, Duane,” the ghost whispered. 

My back bumped a shelf on the wall behind me. 

“I need your head, Duane.” 

Stephanie and I huddled close and pressed our backs against the shelves. 

The ghost floated closer, hands outstretched. 

We pressed ourselves tighter against the shelves. My elbow bumped 
something hard. I heard some heavy objects fall from the shelf. 

“I need your head, Duane.” 

He clenched and unclenched his hands. Two more steps and he’d be close 
enough to grab me. 

“Your head. Give me your head.” 

I jammed my back against the shelves. 

I heard a creaking sound—and the shelf started to slide. 

I stumbled back. And realized that the whole wall was sliding. 

“Wh-what’s happening?” I stammered. 

The ghost reached for my head. “Gotcha!” 



28 


The ghost leaped at me, hands outstretched. 

I ducked—and stumbled back as the wall slid away. 

The wall made a loud grinding sound as it slowly spun around. 

Stephanie fell to the hard floor. 

I pulled her up quickly as Andrew made another wild grab for my head. 

“A tunnel!” I shouted over the grinding of the wall. 

As the wall spun away, it revealed a dark opening. Just big enough to 
squeeze through. 

I pulled Stephanie to the opening—and we squeezed inside. 

We found ourselves in a long, low passageway. Some kind of tunnel. 
Hidden behind the sliding wall. 

I’d always heard about old houses that had secret halls and hidden rooms 
built in them. I never thought I’d be so glad to find one! 

Stephanie and I started to run. Our footsteps echoed loudly on the concrete 

floor. 

We ran past bare, concrete walls, cracked and pitted by time. We had to 
stoop as we ran. The ceiling wasn’t as tall as we were! 

Stephanie slowed down to glance back. “Is he following us?” 

“Just keep running!” I cried. “This tunnel has got to lead out of here! Out of 
this house! It’s got to!” 

“I can’t see where it leads!” she replied breathlessly. 

The low tunnel stretched out in a straight line. I could see only darkness at 
the end. 

Did it stretch on forever? 

If it did, I’d keep running forever. I didn’t plan to stop running until I was 
safely outside. 

And once I was outside, I planned never to visit Hill House again. And I 
planned to stay away from ghosts and to keep my head on my shoulders where it 
belonged. 

Big plans. 

But plans don’t always work out. 



“Ohh!” Stephanie and I both cried out as we nearly crashed into a solid 
concrete wall. 

The tunnel ended. It just ended. 

“It—it doesn’t go anywhere !” I gasped. Breathing hard, I pounded both fists 
against the wall. “Who would build a secret tunnel that leads nowhere?” 

“Push on the wall,” Stephanie cried. “Let’s both push. Maybe this wall will 
slide open, too.” 

We turned and leaned our shoulders into the wall. And pushed. Groaning 
and gasping, I pushed with all my strength. 

I was still pushing when I heard the scraping footsteps moving toward us 
down the tunnel. 

Andrew! 

“Push!” Stephanie cried. 

We shoved ourselves against the wall. 

“Come on—slide! Slide!” I ordered it. 

I glanced back and saw Andrew, jogging slowly, steadily toward us. 

“We’re trapped,” Stephanie moaned. She collapsed against the wall with a 

sigh. 

Andrew came trotting closer. 

“Duane—I want your head!” he called, his voice echoing against the 
concrete walls. 

“Trapped,” Stephanie murmured. 

“Maybe not,” I choked out. I pointed into the dark corner. “Look. A ladder.” 

“Huh?” Stephanie leaped to her feet. She squinted at the ladder. A metal 
ladder, the rungs blanketed with dust. It led straight up the wall, through a small, 
square opening in the low ceiling. 

To where? 

“Give me your head!” the ghost called. 

I grabbed the sides of the metal ladder. I raised a foot onto the first rung and 
peered straight up. 

Into thick blackness. I couldn’t see a thing up there. 

“Duane—” Stephanie whispered. “We don’t know where it leads!” 

“It doesn’t matter,” I replied, starting to climb. “We don’t have a choice— 
do we?” 



29 


“Where are you going, Duane? I need your head!” 

I ignored the ghost’s shout and scrambled up the ladder. Stephanie kept 
bumping me from behind. 

My sneakers slipped on the thick dust. My hands slid over the cold, metal 
railings. 

“Duane—you can’t get away!” Andrew called from down below. 

Straight up. Straight up the ladder. Stephanie and I, breathing hard, 
climbing frantically, as fast as we could climb. 

Straight up. 

Until the ladder started to tilt. 

“Noooo!” I uttered a scream as it spilled forward. 

A crumbling, cracking noise drowned out my scream. 

It took me a few seconds to realize that the wall was breaking apart. 
Crumbling into powdery chunks. 

And we were falling. 

I heard Stephanie scream. 

I grabbed the metal railings with both hands—and held on tight. 

But the ladder was sailing down now. Tumbling over the cracking, 
crumbling old wall. 

“Oww!” I landed hard. Bounced once. Twice. 

My hands flew up and I was tossed off the ladder. I rolled onto my stomach, 
rolled in the chunks of dirt and concrete of the broken wall. 

Stephanie landed on her knees. She shook her head, dazed. 

Chunks of wall spilled all around us. Stephanie’s hair was covered in dust. 

I shielded my eyes and waited for the wall to stop crumbling down. 

When I opened my eyes, Andrew stood above me. His hands were balled 
into fists. His mouth hung open. And he was staring... staring past me. 

I struggled to my feet. Turned to see what he was staring at. 

“A hidden room!” Stephanie cried, moving beside me. “A room behind the 
old wall.” 

Slipping over the chunks of broken concrete, I took a few steps closer to the 



room. 

And saw what Andrew was staring at. 

A head. 

A boy’s head lying on the floor of the hidden room. 

“I don’t believe it!” Stephanie gasped. “We found it! We actually found it!” 

I swallowed hard. And took a careful step forward. 

The head was pale, shimmering white, even in the dim light. 

I could see clearly that it was a boy’s head. But the long, wavy hair had 
turned to white. The round eyes glowed green, sparkling like emeralds in the 
shimmering, pale face. 

“The ghost head,” I murmured. 

I turned back to Andrew. “Your head—we found it for you.” 

I expected to see a smile on his face. I expected him to shout or jump for 

joy- 

For a hundred years, he had waited for this happy moment. And now his 
long search was over. 

But to my shock, Andrew’s face was twisted in horror. 

He wasn’t even looking at his long lost head. He stared above it. And as he 
stared, his entire body began to quiver. Frightened cries escaped his lips. 
“Andrew—what is your problem?” I demanded. 

But I don’t think he even heard me. 

He stared up at the ceiling, trembling. Hands balled into tight fists at his 
sides. Then, slowly, he raised one hand and pointed. “Nooooo,” he moaned. 
“Ohhhh, nooooooo.” 

I turned to see what had frightened him. 

Turned in time to see a filmy figure float down from the ceiling. 

At first I thought it was a thin window curtain, falling from above. 

But as it curled slowly, softly to the floor, I saw that it had arms. And legs. 

I could see right through it! 

The air around us suddenly grew cold. 

“It—it’s a ghost\” Stephanie cried, grabbing my arm. 



30 


The ghost landed softly, silently on the floor of the hidden room, raising its arms 
like bird wings. 

Stephanie and I both gasped as it raised its arms and stood upright. 

It was short and very thin. It wore baggy, old-fashioned-looking pants and a 
long-sleeved shirt with a high collar. 

A high collar. 

A collar. 

And no head. 

The ghost had no head! 

I felt a burst of cold air as it bent down, shimmering, bending, as if made of 
soft gauze. It reached down. Lifted the head off the floor. 

Lifted the head to the stiff, tall collar. 

Gently pressed the head into place. 

And as the head touched the ghostly, gauzy neck, the green eyes flashed. 

The cheeks twitched. The pale white eyebrows arched up and down. 

And then the mouth moved. 

The ghost turned to us—to Stephanie and me. And the lips moved in a 
silent “Thank you.” 

And then the arms rose into the air. Its green eyes still on us, the ghost 
floated up into the air. Lighter than air, it floated silently up. 

I watched in amazement, my heart pounding, until the ghostly figure 
vanished in the darkness. 

And then Stephanie and I both turned to Andrew at the same time. We had 
just seen the headless ghost. We had just seen Andrew, the boy from a hundred 
years ago. We had just watched him collect his head. 

But the boy who claimed to be Andrew was still there. He stood behind us, 
still trembling, his eyes wide, staring into the hidden room, making soft 
swallowing sounds. 

I narrowed my eyes at him. “If you aren’t Andrew,” I started—“if you 
aren’t the headless ghost—then who are you?” 



31 


Stephanie turned on the boy, too. “Yeah. Who are you?” she asked angrily. 

“If you’re not the headless ghost, why did you chase us?” I demanded. 

“Well. I... uh...” The boy raised both hands as if surrendering. Then he 
started to back away. 

He had only gone three or four steps when we heard footsteps coming down 
the long tunnel. 

I turned to Stephanie. Another ghost? 

“Who’s in here?” a deep voice boomed. 

I saw a circle of light from a flashlight sweeping over the tunnel floor. 

“Who is here?” the voice repeated. 

I recognized the deep voice. Otto! 

“Uh... back here,” the boy called softly. 

“Seth—is that you?” The circle of light floated closer. Otto appeared behind 
it, squinting at us. “What’s going on? What are you doing back here? This part 
of the house is dangerous. It’s all falling apart.” 

“Well... we were exploring,” Seth started. “And we got lost. It really wasn’t 
our fault.” 

Otto gazed at Seth sternly. Then his face filled with surprise as his flashlight 
washed over Stephanie and me. “You two! How did you get in? What are you 
doing here?” 

“He... well... he let us in,” I answered. I pointed at Seth. 

Otto turned back to Seth and shook his head unhappily. “More of your 
tricks? Were you scaring these kids?” 

“Not really, Uncle Otto,” Seth replied, keeping his eyes on the ground. 

Uncle Otto? So Seth was Otto’s nephew! 

No wonder he knew so much about Hill House. 

“Tell the truth, Seth,” Otto insisted. “Were you pretending to be a ghost 
again? Haven’t you played that trick on enough kids? Haven’t you scared 
enough kids to death?” 

Seth stood silent. 

Otto rubbed a hand back over his smooth, bald head. Then he let out a 



weary sigh. “We have a business to run here,” he told Seth. “Do you want to 
scare my customers away? Do you want to get the whole neighborhood upset?” 

Seth lowered his head and still didn’t reply. 

I could see that he was in major trouble. So I decided to jump in. “It’s okay, 
Otto,” I said. “He didn’t scare us.” 

“That’s right,” Stephanie chimed in. “We didn’t believe he was a ghost. Did 
we, Duane?” 

“Of course not,” I replied. “He didn’t fool us for a minute.” 

“Especially when we saw the real ghost,” Stephanie added. 

Otto turned to her, studying her in the light from the flashlight. “The what?” 

“The real ghost!” Stephanie insisted. 

“We saw the real ghost, Uncle Otto!” Seth exclaimed. “It was awesomel” 

Otto rolled his eyes. “Save the jokes, Seth. It’s too late at night. You’re just 
trying to get out of trouble.” 

“No. Really!” I insisted. 

“Really!” Seth and Stephanie cried. 

“We saw the headless ghost, Uncle Otto. You’ve got to believe us!” Seth 
pleaded. 

“Sure, sure,” Otto muttered. He turned and motioned with his flashlight. 
“Come on. Everyone out.” 



32 


After our scary night at Hill House, Stephanie and I gave up haunting the 
neighborhood. 

It just wasn’t that exciting anymore. Especially since we’d seen a real 
ghost. 

We stopped sneaking out at night. We stopped peeking into kids’ windows 
in scary masks. We stopped hiding behind bushes and howling like werewolves 
in the middle of the night. 

We gave up all the scary stuff. And we never even talked about ghosts. 

Stephanie and I found other things to be interested in. I tried out for the 
basketball team at school, and I became a starting forward. 

Stephanie joined the Theater Arts Club. This spring, she’s going to be 
Dorothy in The Wizard of Oz. Either Dorothy or a Munchkin. 

We had a good winter. Lots of snow. Lots of unscary fun. 

Then late one evening we were heading home from a birthday party. It was 
the first warm night of spring. Tulips were blooming in some of the front yards 
we passed. The air smelled fresh and sweet. 

I stopped in front of Hill House and gazed up at the old mansion. Stephanie 
stopped beside me. She read my mind. “You want to go in, don’t you, Duane?” 

I nodded. “How about taking the tour? We haven’t been in there since...” 
My voice trailed off. 

“Hey, why not?” Stephanie replied. 

We climbed the steep hill. Tall weeds brushed the legs of my jeans as I 
made my way to the front door. The huge old house stood as dark and as creepy 
as ever. 

As Stephanie and I climbed onto the front stoop, the door creaked open. As 
it always had. 

We stepped into the small front entryway. A few seconds later, Otto 
bounced into view. Dressed all in black. A friendly smile on his round, bald 
head. 

“You two!” he exclaimed happily. “Welcome back.” He called into the front 
room. “Edna, come see who is here.” 

Edna came tottering into the room. “Oh, my!” she cried, pressing a hand 



against her pale, wrinkled face. “We were wondering if we would see you two 
again.” 

I gazed into the front room. No other customers. 

“Could you take us on the tour?” I asked Otto. 

He smiled his toothy smile. “Of course. Wait. I’ll get my lantern.” 

Otto took us around Hill House. He gave us the complete tour. 

It was great to see the house again. But it no longer held any secrets for 
Stephanie and me. 

After the tour, we thanked Otto and said good night. 

We were halfway down the hill when a police car pulled up to the curb. A 
dark-uniformed officer stuck his head out of the passenger window. “What were 
you kids doing up there?” he called. 

Stephanie and I made our way down to the police car. The two officers eyed 
us suspiciously. 

“We just took the tour,” I explained, pointing up to Hill House. 

“Tour? What tour?” the officer demanded gruffly. 

“You know. The haunted house tour,” Stephanie replied impatiently. 

The police officer stuck his head farther out the window. He had blue eyes, 
and freckles all over his face. “What were you really doing up there?” he asked 
softly. 

“We told you,” I said shrilly. “Taking the tour. That’s all.” 

Behind the wheel, the other policeman chuckled. “Maybe a ghost gave 
them the tour,” he told his partner. 

“There are no tours,” the freckle-faced officer said, frowning. “There 
haven’t been any tours in that house for months.” 

Stephanie and I both uttered cries of surprise. 

“The house is empty,” the police officer continued. “Shut down. There 
hasn’t been anyone in there all winter. Hill House went out of business three 
months ago.” 

“Huh?” Stephanie and I exchanged startled glances. Then we both turned to 
gaze up at the house. 

The gray stone turrets rose up into the purple-black sky. Nothing but 
darkness all around. 

And then I saw a trail of soft light across the front window. Lantern light. 
Orange and soft as smoke. 

In the soft light, I saw Otto and Edna. They floated in front of the window. I 



could see right through them, as if they were made of gauze. 

They’re ghosts, too, I realized, staring into the soft, smoky light. 
I blinked. And the light faded out. 






Search

 UPLOADbrett_devan_wieler BRETT_DEVAN_WIELER
 
BOOKS
 
VIDEO
 
AUDIO
 
SOFTWARE
 
IMAGES
Upload files
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
ABOUT BLOG PROJECTS HELP DONATE  CONTACT JOBS VOLUNTEER PEOPLE
Full text of "Goosebumps [All Books]"
See other formats







THE ABOMINABLE 
SNOWMAN OF PASADENA 

Goosebumps - 38 
R.L. Stine 





1 


All my life, I’ve wanted to see snow. 

My name is Jordan Blake. My life has been twelve years of sun, sand, and 
chlorine. I’d never felt cold, ever —unless you count air-conditioned 
supermarkets. And I don’t. It doesn’t snow in the supermarket. 

I’d never felt cold, that is, until the adventure. 

Some people think I’m a lucky guy to live in Pasadena, California, where 
it’s always sunny and warm. It’s okay, I guess. But if you’ve never seen snow, it 
seems like something out of a science-fiction movie. 

Fluffy white frozen water that falls out of the sky? It piles up on the ground, 
and you can make forts and snowmen and snowballs out of it? You have to admit 
it sounds weird. 

One day, my wish came true. I got to see snow at last. And it turned out to 
be weirder than I thought. 

Way weirder. 

“Pay attention, kids. This is going to be cool.” 

Dad’s face glowed under the red darkroom light. My sister, Nicole, and I 
watched him developing film. With a pair of tongs, he dipped a sheet of special 
paper in a chemical bath. 

I’ve watched Dad develop film all my life. He’s a professional 
photographer. But I’d never seen him so excited about photos before—and that’s 
saying a lot. 

Dad takes nature photos. Well, actually, he takes pictures of everything! 

He never stops taking pictures. My mom says that once when I was a baby I 
saw Dad and screamed. I didn’t recognize him without a camera in front of his 
face. I used to think he had a zoom lens for a nose! 

Our house is filled with embarrassing pictures of me—me as a baby in 
baggy diapers, me with food all over my face, me crying after scraping my knee, 
me hitting my sister... 

Anyway, Dad had just returned from a trip to the Grand Tetons. That’s a 
mountain range in Wyoming—part of the Rocky Mountains. He was all worked 
up about the pictures he took there. 

“I wish you kids had seen those bears,” Dad said. “A whole family of them. 



The cubs reminded me of you two—always teasing each other.” 

Teasing. Ha. Dad thinks Nicole and I tease each other. That’s putting it 
mildly. Nicole—Miss Know-it-all—drives me crazy. 

Sometimes I wish she’d never been born. I’ve made it my mission to make 
her feel the same way. I mean, I try to make her wish she’d never been born. 

“You should have taken us with you to the Grand Tetons, Dad,” I 
complained. 

“It’s very cold in Wyoming this time of year,” Nicole said. 

“How do you know, Brainiac?” I jabbed her in the ribs. “You’ve never been 
to Wyoming.” 

“I read up on it while Dad was away,” she explained. Of course. “There’s a 
picture book about it in the library if you want to know more, Jordan. It’s just 
right for you—it’s for first graders.” 

I couldn’t think of anything to say back. That’s my problem. I’m too slow 
with the comebacks. So I jabbed her again. 

“Hey, hey,” Dad murmured. “No jabbing. I’m working here.” 

Dumb Nicole. Not that she’s dumb—she’s really smart. But in a dumb way 
—that’s my opinion. She’s so smart she skipped fifth grade—and landed in my 
class. She’s a year younger than I am and she’s in my class —and she gets 
straight A’s. 

Dad’s pictures floated in the chemical bath, slowly becoming clear. “Did it 
snow in the mountains while you were there, Dad?” I asked. 

“Sure, it snowed,” Dad replied. He was concentrating on his work. 

“Did you go skiing?” I asked. 

Dad shook his head. “I was too busy working.” 

“How about ice-skating?” Nicole asked. 

Nicole acts as if she knows everything. But like me, she’d never seen snow, 
either. We’d never left Southern California—and you could tell by looking at us. 

We’re both tan all year round. Nicole’s hair is greenish-blond from the 
chlorine in the community pool, and mine is brown with blond streaks. We’re on 
the school swim team. 

“I’ll bet it’s snowing at Mom’s house right now,” Nicole said. 

“Could be,” Dad replied. 

Mom and Dad are divorced. Mom just moved to Pennsylvania. We’re going 
to spend the summer with her. But we stayed in California with Dad to finish out 
the school year. 



Mom sent us some pictures of her new house. It was covered with snow. I 
stared at the pictures, trying to imagine the cold. 

“I wish we stayed at Mom’s house while you were gone,” I said. 

“Jordan, we’ve been over this.” Dad sounded a little impatient. “You can 
visit your mother when she’s settled. She hasn’t even bought furniture yet. 
Where would you sleep?” 

“I’d rather sleep on a bare floor than listen to Mrs. Witchens snoring on the 
couch,” I grumbled. 

Mrs. Witchens stayed with Nicole and me while Dad was away. She was a 
nightmare. Every morning we had to clean our rooms—she actually inspected 
them for dust. Every single night she served us liver, brussels sprouts, and fish- 
head soup with a tall glass of soy milk. 

“Her name’s not Witchens ,” Nicole corrected me. “It’s Hitchens .” 

“I know that, Sicole,” I retorted. 

Under the red light in the darkroom, the photos grew clearer. I heard 
excitement in Dad’s voice. 

“If these shots come out well, I can publish them in a book,” he said. “I will 
call it The Brown Bears of Wyoming, by Garrison Blake. Yes, that has a nice ring 
to it.” 

He stopped to pull a photo out of the liquid. It dripped as he stared at it. 

“That’s weird,” he murmured. 

“What’s weird?” Nicole asked. 

He set the picture down without saying anything. Nicole and I glanced at it. 

“Dad—” Nicole said. “I hate to break it to you, but that looks like a teddy 
bear.” 

It was a picture of a teddy bear. A stuffed brown toy bear with a lopsided 
grin, sitting in the grass. Not the kind of creature you usually find in the Grand 
Tetons. 

“There must be some mistake,” Dad said. “Wait until the rest of the photos 
develop. You’ll see. They’re amazing.” 

He pulled up another picture. He studied it. “Huh?” 

I grabbed the photo. Another teddy bear. 

Dad picked up a third picture. Then a fourth. He moved faster and faster. 

“More teddy bears!” he cried. He was frantic. Even in the darkroom, I could 
see the panic on his face. 

“What’s going on?” he shouted. “Where are the photos I took?” 



2 


“Dad—” Nicole began. “Are you sure those bears you saw were real?” 

“Of course I’m sure!” Dad boomed at her. “I know the difference between a 
brown bear and a teddy bear!” 

He began to pace back and forth across the darkroom floor. “Did I lose the 
film somehow?” he murmured, clutching his head with one hand. “Could 
someone have switched it?” 

“The weird part is that you were taking pictures of bears,” Nicole noted. 
“And you ended up with teddy bears. That’s just so strange.” 

Dad furiously tapped his hands on the developing table. He muttered to 
himself. He was starting to lose it. 

“Did I lose the film on the plane somehow? Switch carry-on bags with 
someone else, maybe?” 

I turned my back to Dad, my shoulders shaking. 

“Jordan? What’s the matter?” Dad grabbed my shoulders. “Are you all 
right?” 

He spun me around. “Jordan!” Dad cried. “You’re—laughing!” 

Nicole crossed her arms. She narrowed her eyes at me. “What did you do to 
Dad’s pictures?” 

Dad frowned. His voice was calmer now. “All right, Jordan. What’s the big 
joke?” 

I gasped for breath, trying to stop laughing. “Don’t worry, Dad. Your 
pictures are okay.” 

He shoved one of the teddy bear shots in my face. “Okay! You call this 
okay?!” 

“I borrowed your camera before you left for Wyoming,” I explained. “I 
took a bunch of shots of my old teddy bear, for a joke. The rest of the film 
should have your real bears on it.” 

I can’t resist a good practical joke. 

Nicole said, “I had nothing to do with it, Dad. I swear.” 

Little Miss Goody-Goody. 

Dad shook his head. “A joke?” He turned back to the photos and developed 
a few more. The next shot showed a real bear cub fishing in a stream. Dad 



laughed. 

“You know,” he said, putting the picture of the real bear next to one of the 
teddy bear shots, “they don’t look as different as you’d think.” 

I knew Dad wouldn’t stay angry. He never does. That’s one reason I like to 
play tricks on him. He likes to play practical jokes, too. 

“Did I ever tell you about the trick I pulled on Joe Morrison?” he asked. Joe 
Morrison is a photographer friend of Dad’s. 

“Joe had just gotten back from Africa, where he had spent months 
photographing gorillas. He was all excited about these fabulous gorilla shots 
he’d taken. I saw the pictures, and they were really spectacular. 

“Joe had a big meeting set up with the editor of a nature magazine. He was 
going to go in and show the editor these photos. He was sure the magazine 
would snap them up in a second. 

“Joe didn’t know that the editor and I had gone to college together. So I 
called her up and asked her to help me play a little joke on Joe. 

“When Joe went to see her, he showed her the pictures. She looked at them 
without saying a word. 

“Finally he couldn’t stand the suspense any longer. He blurted out, ‘Well? 
Do you like them or not?’ He’s an impatient guy, Joe.” 

“What did she say?” I asked. 

“She frowned and said, ‘You’re a good photographer, Mr. Morrison. But 
I’m afraid you’ve been tricked. The creatures you photographed aren’t gorillas at 
all.’ 

“Joe’s jaw practically fell off his face. He said, ‘What do you mean, they’re 
not gorillas?’ 

“She said, with a perfectly straight face, ‘They’re people in gorilla suits. 
Can’t you tell the difference between a real gorilla and a man in a gorilla suit, 
Mr. Morrison?”’ 

I chuckled. Nicole asked, “Then what happened?” 

“Joe practically had a nervous breakdown. He snatched up the photos and 
stared at them. He shouted, ‘I don’t get it! How could that happen? I spent six 
months of my life studying people in gorilla suits?’ 

“Finally the editor burst out laughing and told him it was a joke. She loved 
the photos and wanted to publish them. Joe wouldn’t believe her at first—it took 
her fifteen minutes to get him to calm down.” 

Dad and I both laughed. 



“I think that’s really mean, Dad,” Nicole scolded. 

I get my joker streak from Dad. Nicole takes after Mom. She’s more 
practical. 

“Joe thought it was funny once he got over the shock,” Dad assured her. 
“He’s played his share of tricks on me, believe me.” 

Dad swished another photo through the chemical bath. Then he held it up 
with his tongs. It showed two bear cubs wrestling. He smiled with satisfaction. 

“This roll came out great,” he said. “But I’ve got a lot more work to do in 
here, kids. Go on outside for a while, okay?” 

He turned the red light off and flipped on the normal light. Nicole opened 
the door. 

“Don’t get all messed up and dirty, though,” Dad added. “We’re all going 
out to dinner tonight. I want to celebrate my luck with the brown bears.” 

“We’ll be careful,” Nicole promised. 

“Speak for yourself,” I said. 

“I mean it, Jordan,” Dad warned. 

“Just kidding, Dad.” 

A wave of heat blasted us when we opened the darkroom door. Nicole and I 
stepped out into the backyard, blinking in the afternoon sun. It always takes my 
eyes a long time to adjust after I’ve been in the darkroom. 

“What do you want to do?” Nicole asked. 

“I don’t know,” I replied. “It’s so hot. It’s too hot to do much of anything.” 

Nicole closed her eyes and zoned out for a minute. 

“Nicole?” I nudged her. “Nicole? What are you doing?” 

“I’m thinking about the snow in Dad’s pictures of the Grand Tetons. I 
thought it would make me feel cooler.” 

She stood perfectly still with her eyes closed. A bead of sweat dripped 
down her forehead. 

“Well?” I asked. “Is it working?” 

She opened her eyes and shook her head. “No. How can I imagine snow if 
I’ve never felt it?” 

“Good point.” I sighed and gazed around me. 

We live in a subdivision in the suburbs of Pasadena. There are only three 
different kinds of houses in our neighborhood. The same three house styles are 
repeated for miles around. 

It’s so boring to look at, it makes me feel even hotter, somehow. Each block 



has a couple of palm trees, not enough to give much shade. There’s a vacant lot 
across the street from us, next door to the Millers’. The most exciting feature of 
our backyard—maybe the whole block—is Dad’s disgusting compost heap. 

I squinted and stared some more. Everything appeared bleached in the 
sunlight. Even the grass looked almost white. 

“I’m so bored I could scream,” I complained. 

“Let’s ride our bikes,” Nicole suggested. “Maybe the breeze will cool us 

off.” 

“Maybe Lauren will want to go with us,” I added. 

Lauren Sax lives next door to us. She’s in our class at school. I see her so 
often, she might as well be my sister. 

We rolled out our bikes from the garage and walked them over to Lauren’s. 
We left our bikes at the side of her house. Then we went around back. 

We found Lauren sitting on a towel under a palm tree in her backyard. 
Nicole sat beside Lauren on the towel. I leaned against the tree. 

“It’s so hot!” Lauren whined. She tugged on her yellow shorts. She’s tall 
and muscular, with long brown hair and bangs. 

She has a nasal voice, good for complaining. “This is supposed to be winter. 
It’s winter everywhere else. A normal winter has snow and ice and sleet and 
freezing rain and cold, cold air. What do we get? Nothing but sun! Why do we 
have to be so hot?” 

Suddenly I felt a pain in my back. 

“Ow!” I jerked forward. Something stabbed me. Something stinging sharp 
—and ice cold! My face twisted in pain. 

“Jordan!” Nicole gasped. “What’s wrong? What’s wrong?” 



3 


I clutched the icy spot on my back. “What is it?” I cried. “It’s so cold!” 

Nicole jumped to her feet and examined my back. “Jordan, you’ve been 
stabbed!” she announced. “With a purple Popsicle!” 

As I turned around I heard mean laughter. The Miller twins jumped out 
from behind the tree. 

I should’ve known. The Miller twins—Kyle and Kara. The twin pug noses, 
the beady little eyes, the matching short-cropped red hair. Yuck. They carried 
twin Super Soakers, red ones. 

The Miller twins love practical jokes. They’re worse than I am. And much 
meaner. 

Everyone in the neighborhood is afraid of them. They pounce on little kids 
waiting at the bus stop and rob them of their lunch money. Once they blew up 
the Saxes’ mailbox with a stink bomb. Last year, Kyle sucker-punched me 
during a basketball game. He thought it was funny to watch me turn purple. 

The Millers like to pick on me more than anyone, for some reason. 

Kara is just as scary as her brother Kyle. I hate to admit it, but Kara can 
take me out with one punch. I know that for a fact. She gave me a black eye last 
summer. 

“‘Oh, it’s so hot. It’s so hot!”’ Kara sneered, making fun of Lauren’s whiny 
voice. 

Kyle flipped his Super Soaker from one hand to the other behind his back. 
He tried to make it look like a really complicated move. 

“Arnold taught me how to do that,” he bragged. 

Kyle wanted me to think he was talking about Arnold Schwarzenegger. He 
claims he knows Arnold. I have my doubts. 

Nicole tugged on the back of my shirt. “Dad’s going to kill you, Jordan,” 
she said. 

“Why?” 

I craned my neck backwards. The back of my white polo shirt was stained 
dark purple. 

“Oh, great,” I muttered. 

“Dad said not to get messed up,” Nicole reminded me. As if I needed to be 



reminded. 

“Don’t worry, Jordan,” Kyle said. “We’ll clean it off for you.” 

“Uh—that’s okay,” I murmured, backing away. Whatever Kyle meant by 
“clean it off”, I knew I wouldn’t like it. 

I was right. 

He and Kara raised their Super Soakers and squirted me, Nicole, and 
Lauren. 

“Stop it!” Lauren screamed. “You’re getting us all wet!” 

Kyle and Kara laughed their maniac laughs. “You said you were hot!” 

They drenched us. My shirt was so wet I could wring a glass of water out of 
it. I glared at them. 

Kyle shrugged. “We were only trying to help.” 

Yeah. Sure they were. 

I should’ve been grateful that all they did was soak us. We got off easy. 

I can’t stand the Miller twins. Neither can Nicole and Lauren. They think 
they’re so hot. Just because they’re thirteen and they have a swimming pool in 
their backyard. 

Their father works at a movie studio. They’re always bragging about how 
they go to sneak previews and hang out with movie stars. 

I haven’t seen a movie star show up at their house yet. Not once. 

“Aw, you’re all wet,” Kara said, sneering. “Why don’t you take a bike ride 
to dry off?” 

Nicole and I exchanged glances. When we’re alone, we don’t get along so 
well. But when the Millers are around, we have to stick together. 

We knew the Millers too well. They wouldn’t mention our bikes without a 
reason. A bad reason. 

“What did you do to our bikes?” Nicole demanded. 

The Millers faked wide-eyed innocence. “Who—us? We didn’t do anything 
to your precious bikes. Go see for yourself.” 

Nicole and I glanced around the side of Lauren’s house, where we’d left our 
bikes. 

“They look okay from here,” Nicole whispered. 

“There’s something wrong with them,” I said. “They look weird.” 

We approached our bikes. They looked weird all right. The handlebars had 
been unscrewed and twisted backwards. 

“Hope you have reverse gear,” Kyle snickered. 



Normally, I’m not the kind of guy who goes around getting into fights. But 
something in me snapped. This time Kyle and Kara had gone too far. 

I jumped on Kyle. We tumbled to the ground. We wrestled. I tried to pin 
him with my knee, but he pushed me over onto my side. 

“Stop it!” Nicole screamed. “Stop it!” 

Kyle rolled me onto my back. “You thought you could jump me, Jordan? 
You’re too big a wimp!” 

I kicked him. He pinned my shoulder to the ground with one knee. 

Nicole shouted hysterically, “Jordan! Look out!” 

I glanced up. Kara stood over me, clutching a rock the size of her head. A 
mean grin spread across her face. 

“Drop it, Kara!” Kyle ordered. 

I tried to roll out of the way, but I couldn’t move. Kyle had me pinned. 

Kara heaved the rock. Then she let it drop—right onto my head. 



4 


I squeezed my eyes shut. 

The rock landed on my forehead—and bounced off. 

I opened my eyes. Kara laughed like a hyena. She picked up the rock and 
dropped it on my face again. It bounced off, just like the first time. 

Lauren grabbed it. “It’s made of sponge,” she announced. She squeezed it 
in her hand. “It’s a fake.” 

Kyle laughed. “It’s a movie prop, moron.” 

“You should’ve seen your face,” Kara added. “What a chicken!” 

I kicked Kyle off me and pounced on him again. This time I was so mad I 
had the strength of two Kyles. I wrestled him to the ground. I had him pinned! 

“What’s going on, guys?” 

Uh-oh. Dad. 

I leaped to my feet. “Hi, Dad. We were just kidding around.” 

Kyle sat up, rubbing his elbow. 

Dad didn’t even seem to notice that we’d been fighting. He was excited 
about something. 

“Listen, kids—I have great news. Wilderness magazine just called. They 
want to fly me to Alaska!” 

“Great, Dad,” I said sarcastically. “You get to go on another exciting trip 
while we stay here and die of boredom.” 

“And heat,” Nicole added. 

Dad laughed. “I called Mrs. Hitchens to see if she could come stay with you 
again—” he began. 

“Not Mrs. Hitchens again!” I cried. “Dad, she’s horrible! I can’t stand her 
cooking. I’ll starve to death if she stays with us!” 

“You will not, Jordan,” Nicole said. “Even if you ate only bread and water, 
you could survive a week easily.” 

“Nicole? Jordan? Hello?” Dad said, knocking lightly on our heads. “Will 
you please listen to me? I haven’t finished yet.” 

“Sorry, Dad.” 

“Anyway, Mrs. Hitchens can’t come. So, I guess you two will just have to 



come along with me.” 

“To Alaska?” I cried. I was too excited to believe it. 

“Hurray!” Nicole yelled. We jumped up and down. 

“You guys are so lucky!” Lauren said. Kara and Kyle stood by. Saying 
nothing. 

“We’re going to Alaska!” I shouted. “We’ll get to see snow! Tons of snow! 
Alaskan snow!” 

I was thrilled. And Dad hadn’t even told us the interesting part yet. 

“It’s a strange project,” Dad continued. “They want me to track down some 
kind of snow creature—an Abominable Snowman.” 

“Wow!” I gasped. 

Kyle and Kara snorted. 

Nicole shook her head. “An Abominable Snowman? Has anybody really 
seen him?” 

Dad nodded. “Some kind of snow creature has been spotted. Who knows 
what it really is. Whatever it is, the magazine wants me to shoot photos of it. I’m 
sure it’s a wild-goose chase. There’s no such thing as an Abominable 
Snowman.” 

“So why are you going?” Nicole asked. 

I poked her in the ribs. “Who cares? We’re going to Alaska!” 

“The magazine is paying a big fee,” Dad explained. “And even if we don’t 
find a snow creature, I’ll still get some great shots of the tundra.” 

Lauren asked, “What’s a tundra?” 

Dad began to reply, but Nicole stepped forward. “I’ll handle this one, Dad,” 
she interrupted. I felt like screaming. She does that in school all the time, too. 

“A tundra is a huge frozen plain. It exists in the Arctic, in Alaska, and in 
Russia. The word tundra comes from the Russian, meaning—” 

I clapped my hand over her big mouth. “Any other questions, Lauren?” 

Lauren shook her head. “That’s all I needed to know.” 

“Egghead here goes on forever if you don’t stop her.” I let go of Nicole’s 
mouth. She stuck her tongue out at me. 

“This trip is going to be great,” I cried happily. “We’ll see ice and snow for 
real! We’re going hunting for an Abominable Snowman! Awesome!” 

An hour earlier we’d been bored out of our minds. Now suddenly 
everything had changed. 

Dad smiled. “I’ve got to go back to the darkroom for a while. Don’t forget 



—we’re going out to dinner tonight.” He wandered back across the lawn and 
into the house. 

As soon as Dad was gone, Kara started laughing. “An Abominable 
Snowman! What a joke!” 

Typical Kara—she was too chicken to say a word while Dad was around. 

Kyle made fun of me, jumping up and down and squealing, “Alaska! 
Alaska! I’ll get to see snow!” 

“You both will probably turn blue and freeze,” Kara sneered. 

“We’ll be fine,” Nicole said. “It’s your turn to freeze!” She grabbed Kara’s 
Super Soaker and sent a spray of water into Kara’s face. 

“Stop it!” Kyle shouted. He dove at Nicole. Nicole laughed and ran away, 
turning around to soak them every few feet. 

“Give that back!” Kara yelled. 

The Millers chased Nicole. Kyle raised his Super Soaker and let Nicole 
have it in the back. 

Lauren and I ran after them. Nicole raced into our backyard. She turned 
around and squirted the Millers again. 

“You can’t catch me!” she cried, shooting and walking backward. 

She was backing right into Dad’s compost heap. 

Should I warn her? I thought. 

No way. 

“Take that!” she shouted, blasting the Millers with water. 

Then she slipped and fell backward—into the compost heap. 

“Yuck,” Lauren groaned. 

Nicole stood up slowly. Greenish-brown slime oozed in her hair and 
dripped down her back, her arms, and her legs. “Ugh!” she screamed, frantically 
wiping the glop off her hands. “Uggghhh!” 

We all stood and stared. She looked like some kind of Abominable 
Snowman herself. All covered in glop. 

We were still staring when Dad popped his head out the back door. “You 
kids ready to go to dinner?” he called. 



5 


“There it is!” Dad shouted over the roar of the small plane’s engine. “Iknek. 
That’s the airstrip.” 

I stared out the window at the tiny brown patch where we’d be landing. For 
the last half hour I’d seen nothing but miles and miles of snow. Wow. It was so 
white ! 

It was cool the way the snow sparkled in the sunlight. It made me think of 
Christmas carols. I couldn’t get “Winter Wonderland” out of my head—and it 
was driving me crazy! 

I watched for giant footprints as we flew. How big would an Abominable 
Snowman’s footsteps be? Big enough to see from a low-flying plane? 

“I hope there’s a restaurant down there,” Nicole said. “I’m starving.” 

Dad patted her shoulder. “We’ll have a big, hot meal before we set out. But 
after that, it’s camping food.” 

“How are we going to build a fire in the snow?” Nicole asked. 

“We’ll be staying in a little cabin,” Dad replied. “It’s a long way out in the 
tundra, but it’s better than sleeping in tents. There should be a stove in the cabin. 
I hope so, anyway.” 

“Can we build an igloo and sleep in that?” I asked. “Or dig out an ice 
cave?” 

“You can’t build an igloo just like that, Jordan,” Nicole snapped. “It’s not 
like a snow fort or something. Right, Dad?” 

Dad took the lens cap off his camera and started taking pictures through the 
plane window. “Sure,” he said absently. “Uh-huh.” 

Nicole turned to the window, too. I mimicked her behind her back. You 
can’t build an igloo just like that, I mouthed. She acts like she’s my teacher or 
something. It’s really embarrassing when she does it in front of everybody at 
school. 

“How are we going to find the cabin?” Nicole asked. “Everything looks the 
same in all this snow.” 

Dad turned and snapped a picture of her. “Did you say something, Nicole?” 

“I was wondering how we’re going to find the cabin,” Nicole repeated. “Do 
you know how to use a compass, Dad?” 



“A compass? No, but that doesn’t matter. A man named Arthur Maxwell is 
supposed to meet us at the airport. He’ll be our guide through the tundra.” 

“I know Arthur,” the pilot shouted back to us. “He’s an old musher from 
way back. Knows everything about dogs and sleds. He knows this part of Alaska 
better than anybody, I guess.” 

“Maybe he’s seen the Abominable Snowman,” I suggested. 

“How do you know there is such a thing?” Nicole taunted. “We haven’t 
seen any sign of him yet.” 

“Nicole, people have seen him with their own eyes,” I replied. “And if 
there’s no such thing, what are we doing here?” 

“Some people say they’ve seen him,” Nicole said. “Or maybe they think 
they’ve seen one. I won’t believe it until I get more facts.” 

The plane circled the small town. I played with the zipper on my new 
Arctic jacket. I’d been hungry a few minutes earlier, but now I was too excited to 
think about food. 

There really is an Abominable Snowman down there, I thought. I know 
there is. I felt a chill, despite a blast of hot air from the plane’s heater. 

What if we find him? What will happen then? 

What will happen if the Abominable Snowman doesn’t like to be 
photographed? 

The plane flew very low now, getting ready to land. We touched down with 
a bump and taxied along the runway. The plane lurched as the pilot put on the 
brakes. 

Something big loomed at the end of the runway. Something huge, white, 
and monstrous. 

“Dad, look!” I cried. “I see him! The Abominable Snowman!” 



6 


The plane squealed to a stop right in front of the big monster. 

Dad, Nicole, and the pilot all laughed—at me. 

I hate that. But I couldn’t blame them. The big white monster was a polar 

bear. 

A statue of a polar bear. 

“The polar bear is the symbol of the town,” the pilot explained. 

“Oh,” I murmured. I knew I was blushing. I turned away. 

“Jordan knew that,” Dad said. “He was just playing one of his practical 
jokes.” 

“Uh—yeah.” I went along with it. “I knew it was a statue all along.” 

“You did not, Jordan,” Nicole said. “You were really scared!” 

I punched Nicole in the arm. “I was not! It was a joke.” 

Dad put an arm around each of us. “Isn’t it great the way these two kid each 
other?” he said to the pilot. 

“If you say so,” the pilot replied. 

We hopped out of the plane. The pilot opened the cargo hold. Nicole and I 
grabbed our backpacks. 

Dad had brought a huge, airtight trunk for film, cameras, food, sleeping 
bags, and other supplies. The pilot helped him carry it off the airstrip. 

The trunk was so big, Dad could fit inside it. It reminded me of a red plastic 
coffin. 

Iknek Airport was like a tiny wooden house, just two rooms. Two pilots in 
leather jackets sat at a table playing cards. 

A tall, brawny man with dark hair, a thick beard, and leathery skin stood up 
and crossed the room to greet us. His gray parka hung open over a flannel shirt 
and deerskin pants. 

This must be our guide, I realized. 

“Mr. Blake?” the man said to Dad. His voice was low and hoarse. “I’m 
Arthur Maxwell. Need some help there?” He grabbed one end of the trunk from 
the pilot. 

“This is an awfully big trunk you brought,” Arthur added. “Do you really 
need all this stuff?” 



Dad reddened. “I’ve got a lot of cameras, tripods and things.... Well, maybe 
I overpacked.” 

Arthur frowned at me and Nicole. “I’d say so.” 

“Call me Garry,” Dad said. “These are my kids, Jordan and Nicole.” He 
nodded toward us. 

Nicole said “Hi,” and I added, “Nice to meet you.” I can be polite when I 
have to be. 

Arthur stared at us. Then he grunted. 

“You didn’t mention kids,” he mumbled to Dad after a minute. 

“I’m sure I did,” Dad protested. 

“I don’t remember it,” Arthur replied, frowning. 

Everyone was silent. We pushed through the airport door and started down 
the muddy road. 

“I’m hungry,” I said. “Let’s go into town and get some food.” 

“How far is it to town, Arthur?” Dad asked. 

“How far?” Arthur echoed. “You’re looking at it.” 

I stared around in surprise. There was only one road. It began at the airport 
and ended in a pile of snow about two blocks away. A few wooden buildings 
were sprinkled along it. 

“This is it?” I cried. 

“It’s not Pasadena,” Arthur grumbled. “But we call it home.” 

He led us down the muddy road to a diner called Betty’s. 

“I guess you’re hungry,” he grumbled. “Might as well eat a hot meal before 
we set out.” 

We settled into a booth by a window. Nicole and I ordered hamburgers, 
french fries, and Cokes. Dad and Arthur ordered coffee and beef stew. 

“I’ve got a sled and four dogs ready to go,” Arthur announced. “The dogs 
can pull this trunk of yours and the other supplies. We’ll walk beside the sled.” 

“That sounds fine,” Dad said. 

“Whoa!!” I protested. “We’re walking? How far?” 

“Ten miles or so,” Arthur replied. 

“Ten miles!” I’d never walked that far before. “Why do we have to walk? 
Why can’t we take a helicopter or something?” 

“Because I want to take photos along the way, Jordan,” Dad explained. 
“The landscape is fascinating. You never know what we’ll come across.” 

Maybe we’ll come across the Abominable Snowman, I thought. That would 



be cool. 

Our food arrived. We all ate in silence. Arthur wouldn’t look me in the eye. 
He wouldn’t look any of us in the eye. He stared out the window while he ate. 
Outside on the street, a Jeep drove by. 

“Have you ever seen this snow creature we’re looking for?” Dad asked 
Arthur. 

Arthur speared a piece of meat with his fork and popped it into his mouth. 
He chewed. He chewed some more. Dad, Nicole, and I all watched him, waiting 
for his answer. 

Finally he swallowed. “Never seen it,” he said. “Heard about it, though. 
Lots of stories.” 

I waited to hear one of the stories. But Arthur kept on eating. 

I couldn’t stand waiting any longer. “What kind of stories?” 

He swabbed at some gravy with his bread. He stuffed it into his mouth. 
Chewed. Swallowed. 

“A couple of people in town,” he said. “They’ve seen the monster.” 
“Where?” Dad asked. 

“Out by the big snow ridge,” Arthur said. “Beyond the musher’s cabin. 
Where we’re staying.” 

“What does he look like?” I asked. 

“They say he’s big,” Arthur said. “Big and covered with brown fur. You 
might think he’s a bear. But he’s not. He walks on two feet like a man.” 

I shuddered. The Abominable Snowman sounded a lot like a vicious cave 
monster I saw in a horror movie once. 

Arthur shook his head. “Personally, I hope we never find him.” 

Dad’s jaw dropped. “But that’s what we’re here for. It’s my job to find him 
—if he exists.” 

“He exists all right,” Arthur declared. “Friend of mine—another musher— 
he was out in a blizzard one day. Ran smack into the snow monster.” 

“What happened?” I asked. 

“You don’t want to know.” Arthur stuffed more bread into his mouth. 

“We certainly do want to know,” Dad persisted. 

Arthur stroked his beard. “The monster picked up one of the dogs and made 
off with him. My friend chased after him, trying to get the dog back. Never 
found him. But he could hear the dog whining. Pitiful howls. Whatever 
happened to that dog—it sounded pretty bad.” 



“He’s probably a carnivore,” Nicole said. “A meat-eater. Most animals 
around here are. There’s so little vegetation—” 

I jabbed Nicole. “I want to hear about the snowman—not your stupid nature 
facts.” 

Arthur flashed Nicole an annoyed glance. I figured he was thinking, What 
planet is she from? That’s what I’m usually thinking, anyway. 

He cleared his throat and continued. “My friend came back to town. He and 
another guy went out to try and capture the snow monster. Darn foolish, if you 
ask me.” 

“What happened to them?” I asked. 

“Don’t know,” Arthur said. “They never came back.” 

“Huh?” I gaped at the big guide. I swallowed hard. “Excuse me? Did you 
say they never came back?” 

Arthur nodded solemnly. “They never came back.” 



7 


“Maybe they got lost in the tundra,” Dad suggested. 

“Doubt it,” Arthur said. “Those two knew what they were doing. The 
monster killed them. That’s what happened.” 

He paused to butter another slice of bread. 

“Close your mouth, Jordan,” Nicole said. “I don’t want to look at your 
chewed-up french fries.” 

I guess my mouth had been hanging open. I shut it and swallowed. 

Arthur seems like a weird guy, I thought. But he’s not lying to us. He 
definitely believes in the Abominable Snowman. 

Nicole asked him, “Has anyone else seen the snow monster?” 

“Yep. A couple of TV people from New York. They heard about what 
happened to my friend and came to town to investigate. They set out into the 
tundra. Never came back, either. We found one of them, frozen to death in a 
block of ice. Who knows what became of the other. 

“Then Mrs. Carter—she lives at the end of Main Street—she saw the snow 
monster a few days later,” Arthur continued in a low voice. “She was looking 
through her telescope and spied him out in the tundra. He was chewing on bones, 
she said. Don’t believe me, go ask her yourself.” 

Dad made a noise. I glanced at him. He was trying to keep from laughing. 

I didn’t see what was so funny. This snow monster sounded pretty scary to 
me. 

Arthur glared at Dad. “You don’t have to believe me if you don’t want to, 
Mr. Blake,” he said. 

“Call me Garry,” Dad repeated. 

“I’ll call you what I please, Mr. Blake,” Arthur said sharply. “What I’m 
telling you is true. That monster is real—and he’s a killer! You’re taking a big 
risk, chasing after him. No one has ever caught him. Anyone who goes out after 
him... doesn’t return.” 

“We’ll take our chances,” Dad said. “I’ve heard stories like this before, in 
other parts of the world. Stories about monsters in the jungle or weird creatures 
in the ocean. So far the stories have never turned out to be true. I have a feeling 
the Abominable Snowman will be no different.” 



Part of me really wanted to see the snow creature. But part of me hoped 
Dad was right. I don’t deserve to die, I thought—just because I want to see 
snow! 

“Well,” Dad said, wiping his mouth. “Let’s get going. Everybody ready?” 

“I’m ready,” Nicole piped up. 

“Me too,” I said. I couldn’t wait to get out in the snow. 

Arthur said nothing. Dad paid the lunch check. 

We waited for change. “Dad,” I asked, “what if the Abominable Snowman 
is real? What if we run into him? What will we do?” 

He pulled something small and black out of his coat pocket. 

“This is a radio transmitter,” he explained. “If we get into any kind of 
trouble out in the wilderness, I can radio the ranger station in town. They’ll send 
a helicopter to rescue us.” 

“What kind of trouble, Dad?” Nicole asked. 

“I’m sure there won’t be any trouble,” Dad assured us. “But it’s good to be 
prepared for emergencies. Right, Arthur?” 

Arthur smacked his lips and cleared his throat. But he didn’t reply. I figured 
he was angry because Dad didn’t believe his stories about the snow monster. 

Dad returned the radio transmitter to his coat pocket. He left a tip for the 
waitress. Then we spilled outside into the cold Alaskan air, ready to head out for 
the frozen tundra. 

Was an Abominable Snowman waiting for us somewhere out there? 

We would soon find out. 



8 


Smack! 

Bulls-eye. I hit Nicole in the middle of her backpack with a snowball. 

“Dad!” Nicole cried. “Jordan hit me with a snowball!” 

Dad had his camera in front of his face, clicking away, as usual. “Good for 
you, Nicole,” he said absently. Nicole rolled her eyes. 

Then she ripped off my ski cap. She stuffed it with snow and smushed it on 
top of my head. 

Snow trickled down my face. The cold burned my skin. 

At first I thought snow was cool. I could mush it up in my hand to make 
snowballs. Fall down in it without getting hurt. Put it on my tongue and let it 
melt into water. 

But I was beginning to feel the cold. My toes and fingers were getting 
numb. We had already walked two miles out of town. When I looked back, I 
couldn’t see it. I could only see snow and sky. 

Only eight more miles to the cabin, I thought, wiggling my fingers inside 
my mittens. Eight more miles! It was going to take forever. And all around us, 
nothing but snow—miles and miles of it. 

Dad and Arthur trudged beside the dogsled. Arthur had brought along four 
Alaskan huskies—Binko, Rocky, Tin-tin, and Nicole’s favorite, Lars. They 
pulled Dad’s big trunk and the other supplies in a long, narrow sled. 

Nicole and I each carried a backpack filled with emergency food and other 
supplies. Just in case, Dad said. 

In case of what? I wondered. In case we get lost? In case the dogs run away 
with the sled? In case the Abominable Snowman captures us? 

Dad snapped pictures of the dogs, of us, of Arthur, of the snow. 

Nicole threw herself backwards into a snowdrift. “Look—an angel!” she 
cried, waving her arms up and down. 

She jumped up and we checked out the snow angel. “Cool,” I admitted. I 
lay on my back to make one, too. When Nicole came closer to inspect it, I 
whopped her with a snowball. 

“Hey!” she cried. “I’m going to get you for that!” 

I leaped up and darted away. The deep snow crunched under my shoes. 



Nicole ran after me. We raced ahead of the dogsled. 

“Be careful, kids!” Dad called after us. “Stay out of trouble!” 

I stumbled in the snow. Nicole pounced on me. I wriggled free and bolted 
away. 

What kind of trouble could we get into? I thought as my feet crunched 
along. There’s nothing but snow for miles around. We couldn’t even get lost out 
here! 

I turned around and ran backwards, waving at Nicole. “Try and catch me, 
Miss Factoid!” I teased. 

“Name-calling is so immature!” she yelled, chasing after me. 

Then she stopped and pointed behind me. “Jordan! Look out!” 

“Hey—I’m not falling for that old trick,” I called back. I skipped backwards 
through the snow. I didn’t want to take my eyes off her, in case she planned to 
pelt me with snowballs. 

“Jordan, I mean it!” she screamed. “Stop!” 



9 


Thud! 

I landed hard on my back in a pile of snow. “Unh!” I grunted, stunned. 

I struggled to catch my breath. Then I stared around me. 

I had fallen down some kind of deep crevasse. I sat shivering in the pile of 
snow, surrounded by narrow cliffs of bluish ice and rock. 

I stood and looked up. The opening of the crevasse was at least twenty feet 
above me. Frantically, I clutched at the icy walls. I grabbed onto a jutting rock 
and fumbled for a foothold, hoping to climb out. 

I hoisted myself up a couple of feet. Then my hand slipped and I slid back 
to the bottom. I tried again. The ice was too slick. 

How would I ever get out of here? 

Where were Dad and Nicole? I tried to warm my cheeks with my mittens. 
Why don’t they come to get me? I’m going to freeze down here! 

Nicole’s face appeared at the top of the crevasse. I’d never been so happy to 
see her in my life. 

“Jordan? Are you all right?” 

“Get me out of here!” I shouted. 

“Don’t worry,” Nicole assured me. “Dad’s coming.” 

I leaned against the pit wall. The sunlight didn’t reach the bottom. My toes 
felt ready to break off. They were so cold! I jumped up and down to keep warm. 

A few minutes later, I heard Dad’s voice. “Jordan? Are you hurt?” 

“No, Dad!” I called up to him. He, Nicole, and Arthur all stared down at me 
from above. 

“Arthur is going to lower a rope down to you,” Dad instructed. “Hold on to 
it, and we’ll hoist you out of there.” 

I stepped aside as Arthur tossed one end of a knotted rope into the crevasse. 
I clutched the rope with my mittened hands. 

Arthur shouted, “Heave! ” 

Dad and Arthur tugged on the rope. I planted my feet in footholds in the 
ice, bracing myself against the side of the crevasse. The rope slipped out of my 
hands. I clutched it tighter. 

“Hold on, Jordan!” Dad called. 



They pulled again. My arms felt as if they were going to be yanked out of 
their sockets. “Ow!” I cried. “Careful!” 

Slowly they hoisted me to the top of the crevasse. I wasn’t much help—my 
feet kept slipping on the icy walls. Dad and Arthur each took one of my hands 
and dragged me out of the pit. 

I lay on the snow, trying to catch my breath. 

Dad tested my arms and legs for sprains and breaks. “You sure you’re all 
right?” he asked. 

I nodded. 

“It was a mistake to haul kids along,” Arthur grumbled. “The snow is not as 
solid as it looks, you know. If we hadn’t seen you fall, we never would have 
found you.” 

“We’ve got to be more careful,” Dad agreed. “I want you both to stick close 
to the sled.” He leaned over the side of the crevasse and snapped a picture. 

I stood up and brushed the snow from the seat of my pants. “I’ll be careful 
from now on,” I promised. 

“Good,” Dad said. 

“We’d better push on,” Arthur said. 

We started walking again across the snow. I gave Nicole a shove once in a 
while, and she shoved me back. But we were quieter now. Neither of us wanted 
to end up frozen to death at the bottom of a snow hole. 

Dad snapped away as we walked. “How much farther to the cabin?” he 
asked Arthur. 

“Another couple of miles,” Arthur replied. He pointed to a steep mountain 
of snow in the distance. “See that snow rise, about ten miles off? That’s where 
the monster was last spotted.” 

The Abominable Snowman had been seen by that snow rise, I thought. 
Where was he now? 

Could he see us coming? Was he hiding somewhere, watching us? 

I kept my eyes on the snow rise as we walked. It seemed to grow bigger as we 
came closer to it. The snow rise was dotted with pine trees and boulders. 

After about an hour, a tiny brown speck appeared a mile or so away. 

“That’s the abandoned musher’s cabin where we’ll stop for the night,” Dad 
explained. He rubbed his gloves together and added, “It sure will be nice to sit 
by a roaring fire.” 



I clapped my mittens together to keep the blood flowing through my hands. 
“I can’t wait,” I agreed. “It must be minus two thousand degrees out here!” 

“Actually, it’s about minus ten,” Nicole stated. “At least, that’s the average 
temperature for this area at this time of year.” 

“Thank you, Weather Girl,” I joked. “And now for sports. Arthur?” 

Arthur frowned into his beard. I guess he didn’t get the joke. 

He fell behind us a little to check the back of the sled. Dad turned around to 
snap Arthur’s picture. 

“When we get to the musher’s cabin I’ll take a few more scenery photos,” 
Dad said, as he changed his film. “Maybe I’ll photograph the cabin, too. Then 
we’ll all turn in. We have a big day tomorrow.” 

By the time we reached the cabin it was almost eight o’clock at night. 

“Took us too long to get here,” Arthur grumbled. “We left town after lunch. 
It should’ve taken us about five hours. The kids having accidents and all is 
slowing us down.” 

Dad stood a few feet away from him, shooting a portrait of Arthur while he 
talked. 

“Mr. Blake, did you hear me?” Arthur growled. “Stop taking my picture!” 

“What?” Dad said, letting his camera drop to his chest. “Oh, yeah—the 
kids. Bet they’re hungry.” 

I explored the musher’s cabin. It didn’t take long. The tiny wooden shack 
was empty except for an old wood-burning stove and a couple of broken-down 
cots. 

“Why is the cabin so empty?” Nicole asked. 

“Mushers don’t stop here anymore,” Arthur explained. “They’re afraid of 
the monster.” 

I didn’t like the sound of that. I glanced at Nicole. She rolled her eyes. 

Arthur bedded the dogs in a lean-to outside the cabin. The lean-to was a 
shed built against the back cabin wall. It was filled with straw for the dogs to 
sleep on. I spotted a rusty old dogsled propped in a corner. 

Then Arthur lit a fire and began to fix some supper. 

“Tomorrow we’ll search for this so-called monster,” Dad announced. 
“Everybody get a good night’s sleep.” 

After supper we crawled into our sleeping bags. I lay awake for a long time, 
listening to the howling wind outside. Listening for the thudding footsteps of an 
Abominable Snowman. 



“Nicole, get off me!” She rolled over in her sleeping bag and jabbed her elbow 
into my ribs. I knocked her arm away and snuggled deeper inside my own toasty 
warm sleeping bag. 

Nicole opened her eyes. Bright morning sunshine streamed into the cabin. 

“I’ll be back in a minute to fix breakfast, kids,” Dad said. He sat in a chair, 
lacing up his snow boots. “First I’m going out to check on the dogs. Arthur went 
out to feed them a few minutes ago.” 

He bundled up and stepped outside. I rubbed my nose—it was cold. The 
fire in the stove had gone out during the night. No one had relit it yet. 

I forced myself to climb out of my sleeping bag and start pulling on clothes. 
Nicole began dressing, too. 

“Do you think there’s a hot shower in this dump?” I wondered aloud. 

Nicole smirked at me. “You know perfectly well there’s no hot shower, 
Jordan.” 

“Oh, wow! This is incredible!” I heard Dad’s shout from outside. 

I jammed my feet into my boots and raced out the door. Nicole pushed right 
behind me. 

Dad stood at the side of the musher’s cabin, pointing in shock at the ground. 

I gazed down—and saw deep footprints in the snow. Huge footprints. 
Enormous footprints. 

So big that only a monster could have made them. 



10 


“Unbelievable,” Dad murmured, staring at the snow. 

Arthur hurried over from the lean-to. He stopped when he saw the prints. 

“No!” he cried. “He was here!” 

His ruddy face grew pale. His jaw trembled with terror. 

“We’ve got to get away from here—now!” he said to Dad in a low, 
frightened voice. 

Dad tried to calm him down. “Hold on a minute. Let’s not jump to 
conclusions.” 

“We’re in terrible danger!” Arthur insisted. “The monster is nearby! He’ll 
rip us all to shreds!” 

Nicole knelt in the snow, studying the footprints. “Do you think they’re 
real?” she asked. “Real Abominable Snowman footprints?” 

She thinks they’re real, I thought. She believes. 

Dad knelt beside her. “They look pretty real to me.” 

Then I saw a light glimmer in his eyes. He lifted his head and squinted at 
me suspiciously. 

I backed away. 

“Jordan!” Nicole cried in an accusing voice. 

I couldn’t help it. I started laughing. 

Dad shook his head. “Jordan. I should’ve known.” 

“What?” Arthur looked confused—and then angry. “You mean the kid 
made these prints? It’s a joke?” 

“I’m afraid so, Arthur,” Dad sighed. 

Arthur scowled at me. Beneath his beard, his face reddened to the color of a 
slab of raw steak. 

I cowered. I couldn’t help it. Arthur scared me. He sure didn’t like kids— 
especially not kids who play jokes. 

“I’ve got work to do,” Arthur muttered. He turned and stomped away 
through the snow. 

“Jordan, you crumb,” Nicole said. “When did you do it?” 

“I woke up early this morning and sneaked out,” I admitted. “You were all 



sleeping. I carved the footprints over my own prints, with my mittens. Then I 
stepped in the prints on my way back, to cover my tracks. 

“You believed,” I added, jabbing a finger at Nicole. “For a minute there, 
you believed in the snow monster.” 

“I did not!” Nicole protested. 

“Yes, you did. I got you to believe!” 

I glanced from Nicole’s peevish face to Dad’s stern one. “Don’t you think 
it’s funny?” I asked. “It’s just a joke!” 

Usually Dad liked my jokes. 

Not this time. 

“Jordan, we’re not at home in Pasadena now. We’re out in the middle of 
nowhere. The wilds of Alaska. Things could get very dangerous. You saw that 
yesterday when you fell down the crevasse.” 

I nodded and hung my head. 

“I’m serious, Jordan,” Dad warned me. “No more practical jokes. I’m here 
to work. And I don’t want anything to happen to you, or Nicole, or any of us. 
Understood?” 

“Yes, Dad.” 

No one said anything for a minute. Then Dad patted me on the back. “Okay, 
then. Let’s go inside and get some breakfast.” 

Arthur returned to the cabin a few minutes later. He stamped the snow off 
his boots, glaring at me. 

“You think you’re funny,” he muttered. “But wait till you see the snowman. 
Will you be laughing then?” 

I swallowed hard. 

The answer to his question was no. Definitely no. 



11 


After breakfast we hitched the dogs to the sled and set off for the snow rise. 
Arthur wouldn’t talk to me and would hardly look at me. I guess he was angry 
about my joke. 

Everybody else has forgiven me, I thought. Why won’t he? 

Nicole and I walked at the front of the sled with the dogs. Behind me I 
heard Dad’s camera clicking furiously. I knew that meant he’d found something 
good to photograph. I turned around. 

A large herd of elk moved toward us, toward the snow rise. We stopped to 
watch them. 

“Look at them,” Dad whispered. “Amazing.” He quickly loaded new film 
into his camera and started snapping away again. 

The elk calmly picked their way across the snow, antlers high. They 
stopped to eat at a stand of bushes. Arthur pulled back the rein on the lead sled 
dog to keep him from barking. 

Suddenly, one elk lifted its head. It seemed to sense something. 

The other elk tensed up, too. Then they turned and began to gallop away 
across the tundra. Their hooves thundered over the snow. 

Dad let his camera fall against his chest. “That’s strange,” he said. “I 
wonder what happened.” 

“Something scared them,” Arthur said grimly. “It wasn’t us. And it wasn’t 
the dogs.” 

Dad scanned the horizon. “What was it, then?” 

We all waited for Arthur’s answer. But he only said, “We ought to turn 
around and head back to town right now.” 

“We’re not going back,” Dad insisted. “Not after coming all this way.” 

Arthur stared at him. “Are you going to take my advice or not?” 

“No,” Dad replied. “I’ve got a job to do here. And I’ve hired you to do a 
job. We’re not going back without a good reason.” 

“We’ve got a good reason,” Arthur insisted. “Only you won’t see it that 
way.” 

“Push ahead,” Dad ordered. 

Arthur frowned and shouted “Mush!” to the dogs. The sled began to move. 



We followed it, on toward the snow rise. 

Nicole walked a few feet ahead of me. I picked up a pile of snow and patted 
it into a ball. But then I thought I’d better not throw it. No one seemed to be in 
the mood for snowball fights. 

We marched through the snow for a couple of hours. I slipped off my 
mittens and wiggled my fingers. Frost kept collecting on my upper lip. I wiped it 
away. 

We reached a stand of pine trees at the base of the snow rise. Suddenly the 
dogs stopped short. They began to bark. 

“Mush!” Arthur shouted. 

The dogs refused to go farther. 

Nicole ran up to her favorite dog, Lars. “What is it, Lars? What’s the 
matter?” 

Lars howled. 

“What’s wrong with them?” Dad asked Arthur. 

Arthur’s face paled again. His hands shook. He stared intently into the trees, 
squinting into the brightness. 

“Something’s frightened the dogs,” he said. “Look how their fur stands on 
end.” 

I patted Lars. It was true. His fur stood straight up. The dog growled. 

“Not much scares these dogs,” Arthur said. “Whatever it is, it’s scaring 
them bad.” 

The dogs all howled. 

Nicole huddled close to Dad. 

“There’s something dangerous on that snow rise,” Arthur said. “Something 
dangerous—and very near.” 



12 


“I’m warning you, Mr. Blake,” Arthur said. “We’ve got to go back.” 

“No way,” Dad protested. “We’re not going back. I mean it.” 

The dogs barked and skittered nervously. Arthur shook his head. “I won’t 
go any farther. The dogs won’t, either.” 

Dad shouted, “Mush!” to the dogs. They howled and started backing up. 

“Mush!” he cried again. Instead of going forward, the dogs tried to turn 
around in the snow. 

“You’re upsetting them,” Arthur said. “They won’t go any farther—I told 
you that. 

“If we turn around now,” Arthur added, “we can make it back to the cabin 
before it gets too late.” 

“What are we going to do, Dad?” I asked. 

Dad frowned. “Maybe Arthur’s right. Something is definitely frightening 
the dogs. There could be a bear or something nearby.” 

“Not a bear, Mr. Blake,” Arthur insisted. “These dogs are spooked. And so 
am I.” 

He marched away across the snow, heading back toward the musher’s 
cabin. 

“Arthur!” Dad called. “Come back here!” 

Arthur didn’t turn around. He didn’t say a word. He just kept walking. 

He must be really scared, I thought. And that sent a chill of fear down my 
back. 

Still barking excitedly, the dogs pulled the sled around and started 
following Arthur. 

Dad peered into the woods. “I wish I could see what’s out there.” 

“Let’s go check it out,” I urged. “Whatever it is, it’ll probably make a great 
photo.” That usually gets Dad. 

He glanced back at Arthur, the dogs, and the sled, rushing toward the cabin. 
“No—it’s too dangerous. We have no choice. Let’s go, kids.” 

We trudged back to the cabin. “Maybe I can persuade Arthur to push on 
tomorrow,” Dad muttered. 

I didn’t say anything. But I had a feeling it wouldn’t be easy to get Arthur 



to climb that snow rise. 

And maybe Arthur was right, I thought. Those dogs really were scared. It 
was definitely creepy. 

Arthur was unhitching the dogs from the sled when we reached the cabin. 
The dogs had calmed down a lot. 

I yanked off my backpack and collapsed on top of my sleeping bag. 

“We might as well eat supper,” Dad grumbled. I could tell he was in a 
terrible mood. “Jordan—why don’t you and Nicole go gather some firewood. 
But be careful.” 

“We will, Dad,” Nicole promised. 

I stood up and started out of the cabin. 

“Jordan!” Dad scolded. “Put your knapsack back on. I don’t want you going 
anywhere without it. Understood?” 

“We’re just going for firewood,” I protested. “I’m tired of carrying it. We’ll 
only be gone for a few minutes—and anyway, Nicole is wearing hers.” 

“No arguments,” Dad snapped. “If you get lost, that food could keep you 
alive until we find you. You leave this cabin, you wear that backpack. Is that 
clear?” 

Boy, was he in a bad mood. “It’s clear,” I said, strapping on my pack. 

Nicole and I crunched across the snow to the nearest trees. They lined a 
snow ridge about half a mile away. 

We climbed the snow ridge. I made it to the top first. 

“Nicole—look!” 

On the other side of the snow ridge, I saw a frozen stream. The first water 
we’d seen since we’d set out. 

Nicole and I skittered down the ridge and stared into the icy stream. I tested 
the ice with my foot. 

“Don’t step on it, Jordan!” Nicole cried. “You might fall in.” 

I tapped the ice with the tip of my boot. “It’s solid,” I told her. 

“Still,” Nicole said. “Don’t take any chances. Dad will kill you if you have 
another accident.” 

“I wonder if there are fish swimming under there,” I said, staring into the 
ice. 

“We should tell Dad about this,” Nicole said. “He might want to photograph 
it.” 

We left the stream to gather dead branches under the trees. We lugged them 



over the snow ridge and back across the snow to the cabin. 

“Thanks, kids,” Dad said when we burst into the cabin. He took the wood 
from us and started a fire in the stove. “How about pancakes for supper tonight?” 

He’s in a better mood now, I thought with relief. 

Nicole told Dad about the frozen stream. 

“Interesting,” Dad said. “I’ll go take a look at it after supper. I’ve got to find 
something to photograph besides all this ice and snow.” 

The pancakes cheered all of us up—except for Arthur. 

He ate a lot, but he didn’t say much. He appeared jittery. He dropped his 
fork on the floor. Muttering to himself, he picked it up and started eating without 
wiping it off. 

When supper was over, Nicole and I helped Dad clean up. 

We were gathering up the supplies when the dogs started to bark. 

I saw Arthur freeze. 

“What’s that?” I cried. “What’s upset the dogs?” 



13 


The dogs yelped and barked. 

Was someone out there? 

An animal? A monster? 

“I’ll go check,” Arthur said solemnly. He pulled on his coat and wool cap 
and hurried out of the cabin. 

Dad grabbed his coat. “Stay here,” he instructed Nicole and me. He 
followed Arthur. 

We stared at each other, listening to the yelping dogs. A few seconds later, 
the barking stopped. 

Dad poked his head back into the cabin. “Nothing out there. We don’t know 
what got them upset. But Arthur is calming them down.” 

Dad grabbed his camera. “You two get some sleep, okay? I’m going to 
check out that stream. I won’t be gone long.” 

He draped the camera over his fur coat collar. The cabin door slammed 
behind him. 

We heard Dad’s footsteps crunching over the snow. Then silence. Nicole 
and I climbed into our sleeping bags. 

I rolled onto my side, trying to get comfortable. It was after eight o’clock, 
but still light outside. The sun filtered through the window of the cabin. 

The light reminded me of when I was little. Mom used to try to make me 
take a nap in the afternoon. I never could sleep in the daytime. 

I closed my eyes. I opened them. I wasn’t sleepy. 

I turned my head and glanced at Nicole. She lay on her back, her eyes wide 
open. 

“I can’t sleep,” I announced. 

“Me either,” she replied. 

I squirmed in my sleeping bag. 

“Where’s Arthur?” Nicole asked. “I wonder what’s taking him so long?” 

“I guess he’s hanging out with the dogs,” I said. “I think he likes them 
better than he likes us.” 

“That’s for sure,” Nicole agreed. 



We tossed and turned some more. The sky stayed bright. The light poured 
in through the cabin window. 

“I give up,” I groaned. “Let’s go outside and build a snowman or 
something.” 

“Dad said to stay put.” 

“We won’t go anywhere. We’ll stay by the cabin,” I assured her. 

I crawled out of my sleeping bag and started getting dressed. Nicole sat up. 
“We shouldn’t,” she warned. 

“Come on. What could happen?” 

She stood up and pulled on her sweater. “If I don’t do something, I’ll go 
stir-crazy,” she admitted. 

We bundled up. I pulled open the cabin door. 

“Jordan—wait!” Nicole cried. “You forgot your backpack.” 

“We’re just going out the door,” I complained. 

“Come on. Dad said we have to. He’ll be furious if he finds us outside. And 
he’ll be even more furious if you’re not wearing your pack.” 

“Oh, all right,” I grumbled. I hoisted the pack over my shoulders. “Like 
something’s really going to happen to us.” 

We stepped out into the cold. I kicked at the snow. 

Nicole grabbed my coat sleeve. “Listen!” she whispered. 

We heard the crunch of footsteps behind the cabin. “It’s Arthur,” I told her. 
We crept around to the back. It was Arthur. 

He crouched beside the dogsled, hitching up one of the dogs. Two others 
were already tied to the sled. 

“Arthur!” I cried. “What’s up?” 

Startled, he turned to us. He didn’t reply. Instead, he jumped on the back of 
the sled. 

“Mush!” he commanded the dogs at the top of his lungs. 

The dogs leaned forward, tugging hard. The sled began to slide away. 
“Arthur! Where are you going?” I screamed. “Come back!” 

The sled picked up speed. 

“Arthur! Arthur!” Nicole and I ran after him, shouting his name. 

But the sled raced farther and farther away from us. 

Arthur never turned back. 



14 


Nicole and I chased after the sled, watching it grow tinier and tinier. 

“Arthur! Come back!” 

“He’s got our food!” I cried. 

We couldn’t let him get away. We ran as fast as we could, our boots falling 
deep into the snow. 

The sled climbed over a tall ridge of snow. 

“Stop! Stop!” Nicole screamed. “Please!” 

“We can’t keep up with the dogs,” I gasped. 

“We have to try,” Nicole cried frantically. “We can’t let Arthur leave us 
here!” 

The sled disappeared over the top of the ridge. We clawed our way up. The 
snow slid under our feet. 

By the time we reached the top, Arthur and the dogs were far ahead of us. 
We watched in horror as they quickly disappeared across the tundra. 

Exhausted, I collapsed in the snow. “They’re getting away,” I choked out. 

“Jordan, get up!” Nicole pleaded. 

“We can’t catch him,” I moaned. 

Then Nicole said in a small voice, “Where are we?” 

I stood up and gazed around. Snow, snow, snow. All around us, nothing but 
snow. No landmarks. No sign of the cabin. 

Clouds had covered the sun. The wind picked up. Snow began to fall. 

I had no idea where we were. 

“Which way is the cabin?” I asked in a shrill voice. “Which way did we 
come?” 

We scanned the horizon through the falling snow. I didn’t see the cabin 
anywhere. 

Nicole tugged on my arm. “The cabin is that way. Let’s go!” 

“No!” The snow came down harder and faster, stinging my eyes. I shouted 
into the wind. “The cabin’s the other way! That’s not the way we came.” 

“Look!” Nicole yelled, pointing down. “Our tracks! We’ll just follow them 
home.” 



We started down the ridge, following the ruts we’d made in the snow. The 
wind howled, growing stronger. 

We followed our own footprints for a short while. It was so hard to see in 
the falling snow. All white and gray. The whole world. White and gray. 

Nicole peered at me through the thick curtain of snow. “I can hardly see 
you!” she shouted. 

We crouched low, searching for our footprints. 

“They’re gone!” I cried. The snow had already covered them up. 

Nicole clutched my arm. “Jordan, I’m getting scared.” 

I was getting scared, too. But I didn’t tell Nicole. 

“We’ll find the cabin,” I assured her. “Don’t worry. I bet Dad’s looking for 
us right now.” 

I wished I believed it myself. The wind pelted us with hard, icy snow. I 
squinted into the wind. Nothing but white. White on white. White on gray. 

“Don’t let go of me!” I shouted to Nicole. 

“What?” 

“I said, don’t let go of me! We could easily lose each other in the storm!” 

She tightened her grip on my arm to show she understood. 

“I’m so cold,” she shouted. “Let’s run!” 

We tried to run through the snow, stumbling against the wind. “Dad!” we 
called out. “Dad!” 

I had no idea where we were going—but I knew we had to go somewhere. 

“Look!” Nicole cried, pointing through the thick snow. “I think I see 
something!” 

I stared as hard as I could, but I didn’t see anything. 

Nicole pulled me along. “Come on!” she shouted. 

We ran blindly. Suddenly, the ground gave way under our feet. 

Still holding onto Nicole, I felt myself being sucked down under the snow. 



15 


Down we fell. Down into the freezing white. 

The snow rushed up, swirled around us. 

And buried us. 

Another crevasse, I thought. Another deep pit in the snow. 

Much deeper than the first. 

We both cried out as we landed. Tangled up in each other. 

“Get off!” Nicole shrieked. “Where are we? Get off!” 

Feeling dazed, I struggled to my feet. Then I grabbed both of her hands and 
tugged her up. 

“Oh no,” Nicole groaned. 

We both stared up to the top. I could barely make out the gray of the sky, 
high above our heads. 

And all around us, high walls of snow. Powdery snow that blew down on 
us. I peered up to the top of the pit. Chunks of snow broke off the icy walls. 
They made soft thuds as they landed beside us on the snowy pit floor. 

“We’re trapped down here!” Nicole wailed. “Dad will never find us. 
Never!” 

I grabbed the shoulders of her coat. A chunk of snow fell off the pit wall 
and landed on top of my boots. “Try to stay calm,” I told her. But my voice 
trembled as I said it. 

“Calm? How can I stay calm?” she demanded shrilly. 

“Dad will find us,” I said. I wasn’t sure I believed it. I swallowed hard, 
trying to fight down my panic. 

“Daaaaaad!” Nicole screamed. She cupped her hands around her mouth, 
raised her head toward the sky, and screamed at the top of her lungs. 
“Daaaaaaad! Daaaaaaaaad!” 

I clapped a mitten over her mouth. 

Too late. 

I heard a low rumbling. 

The rumbling became a roar as the snow walls began to crack and crumble. 

Crumble down. Down on us. 



Trembling in horror, I knew what was happening. 
Nicole had started an avalanche. 



16 


As sheets of snow tumbled down on us, I grabbed Nicole. 

I pushed her against the pit wall. Then I flattened myself against the wall, 

too. 

The snow roared down. 

I pressed myself tight against the wall—and to my shock, the wall gave 

way! 

“Ooooh!” I let out a startled cry. Nicole and I tumbled through the side of 
the pit. 

We stumbled forward into total darkness. 

I heard a crash behind us. My heart pounding, I turned in time to see the pit 
fill up. Snow piled over the opening in the wall. 

Nicole and I were sealed in. Shut in this dark hole. 

Our way out was gone. The pit was gone. 

We crouched in the dark tunnel-like opening, trembling, gasping in fright. 
“Where are we?” Nicole choked out. “What do we do now?” 

“I don’t know.” I grabbed the wall. We seemed to be in a narrow 
passageway. The walls around us were made of rock instead of snow. 

My eyes adjusted to the darkness. I could see a dim light at the end of the 
passageway. 

“Let’s see what’s down there,” I urged Nicole. 

We crawled on our hands and knees through the passage toward the light. 
The passage ended. We stood up. 

We found ourselves in a big cave. The top of the cave towered high above 
our heads. Water trickled slowly down one of the walls. A dim glow came from 
somewhere near the back. 

“The light must be coming from outside,” Nicole said. “That means there’s 
a way out of here.” 

We crept slowly through the cave. The only sound I could hear was the 
drip, drip, drip of melting icicles. 

Soon we’ll be out of here, I thought. “Jordan,” she whispered. “Look!” 

On the floor of the cave I could make out a footprint. A gigantic footprint. 
Bigger than the fake one I’d made in the snow that morning. 



Five of my shoes could fit inside that footprint. 

I took a few steps—and saw another footprint. 

Nicole grabbed my arm. 

“Do you think it’s...?” She stopped. 

I knew what she was thinking. 

We traced the giant footprints across the cave floor. They led us straight to a 
shadowy corner in the back—and stopped. 

I glanced up. 

Nicole gasped. 

We both saw it at the same time. 

The creature. 

The Abominable Snowman! 

He loomed over us. 

He stood upright like a human, covered in brown fur. Black eyes stared out 
of an ugly face, half-human, half-gorilla. 

He wasn’t that tall—about a head taller than me—but he seemed huge. His 
body was thick and powerful, with gigantic feet and fur-covered hands—as big 
as baseball gloves. 

“We’re t-trapped!” Nicole stammered. 

She was right. 

The entrance behind us had been blocked by the avalanche. There was no 
way we could slip past this giant creature. 

No way. 

The Abominable Snowman glared down at us. Then it started to move. 



17 


My teeth began to chatter. 

I squeezed my eyes shut and trembled, waiting for the monster to grab us. 

A second passed. Then another. 

Nothing happened. 

I opened my eyes. The snowman hadn’t moved. 

Nicole took a step forward. “He’s frozen!” she cried. 

I blinked in the dim light. “Huh?” It was true. The snowman stood frozen in 
a huge block of clear ice. 

I touched the ice. The monster stood inside it like a statue. 

“If he’s frozen in ice,” I wondered, “then what made those giant 
footprints?” 

Nicole bent down to study the prints. She shuddered again at their huge 

size. 

“They lead right to the block of ice,” she declared. “The snowman must 
have made them somehow.” 

“Maybe he walked back here and accidently froze,” I suggested. I touched 
the back wall of the cave, where icy water dripped from above. 

“Or maybe he goes into the ice to rest,” I added. “Like Dracula going to 
sleep in his coffin at dawn.” 

I backed away. It was too frightening, being this close to him. But the 
monster stayed perfectly still under the thick ice. 

Nicole leaned close to the ice. “Look at his hands!” she cried. “Or paws, or 
whatever.” 

Like the rest of his body, his hands were covered with brown fur. He had 
thick fingers, like a man’s. Jutting out of them were long, sharp claws. 

A chill ran down my spine at the sight of those claws. What did he use them 
for? Ripping wild animals to pieces? Tearing up people who got in his way? 

He had powerful legs, with shorter claws on his toes. I studied his face. Fur 
covered his whole head, except for a circle of hairless skin around his eyes, nose, 
and mouth. The skin was a pinkish red. His lips were thick and white and set in a 
mean-looking grimace. 

“He’s definitely a mammal,” Nicole declared. “The fur is a dead giveaway.” 



I rolled my eyes. “This is no time for biology lessons, Nicole. Wait until 
Dad sees this. He’ll go crazy! If he can get a picture of this, he’ll be famous!” 

“Yeah,” Nicole sighed. “If we can find Dad. If we ever get out of here.” 

“There’s got to be a way out,” I said. I moved to a side wall and pressed it 
with my hands, searching for a hole, a chink in the rock, anything. 

After a few minutes I found a tiny crack. “Nicole!” I cried. “I found 
something!” 

She raced to my side. I pointed out the crack in the cave wall. She frowned 
with disappointment. 

“That’s just a crack,” she said. 

“You don’t know everything,” I protested. “Maybe there’s a secret door 
here. A hidden passage. Or something.” 

She sighed. “I guess it’s worth a shot.” 

We pressed on the crack. We stuck our fingers into it. We kicked it. I even 
tried karate-chopping it. 

Nothing. 

“I hate to break this to you, Jordan,” she said. “But I was right. As always. 
All you found was a crack in the wall.” 

“Well, keep looking,” I snarled. “We’ve got to get out of here!” 

I kept searching. I ran my hands along the wall, my back to the monster. 

Suddenly I heard a noise. A loud crack! 

“Nicole!” I cried. “Did you find something?” 

I whirled around. I realized Nicole hadn’t made that sound. She stared at the 
monster in horror. 

“What?” I asked her. “What’s wrong?” 

I heard another crack! 

“The ice is cracking!” Nicole screamed. “The monster—he’s breaking out!” 



18 


Crack! 

The block of ice splintered apart. Nicole and I pressed ourselves against a 
wall, watching in horror. 

The Abominable Snowman burst from the ice. Chunks of ice smashed on 
the floor and shattered like glass. The snowman shook himself, growling like a 
wolf. 

“Run!” I screamed. 

Nicole and I took off. But there was nowhere to go. We scrambled to the 
other side of the cave—as far away from the monster as we could get. 

“The passageway!” I cried. I ducked down and started to crawl through the 
passage. 

Nicole grabbed me. 

“Wait! It’s blocked! The avalanche—remember?” 

Yes. Of course. The way out of the cave was blocked by tons of snow. 

Across the cave, the monster uttered a ferocious roar that shook the walls. 

Nicole and I cowered in a corner of the cave. I felt her trembling next to 
me. 

“Maybe he didn’t see us,” I whispered. 

“Then why is he roaring?” Nicole whispered back. 

The monster twitched his gorilla nose in the air, sniffing. 

Oh, no! I thought. Can he smell us from across the cave? 

He turned his huge, furry head one way and then the other. 

He’s searching for us, I realized. He smells us. 

“Unh!” he grunted. He stared into a corner of the cave—our corner of the 

cave. 

“Unh!” he grunted again. 

“Oh, no!” Nicole moaned. “He sees us!” 

The big creature staggered toward us, grunting with each heavy step. 

I pressed myself against the cave wall, wishing the cave would swallow us 
up. 

Anything would be better than having him swallow us! 



The monster kept coming. His footsteps shook the floor of the cave. Boom, 
boom, boom. 

We huddled on the floor. We tried to make ourselves as small as we could. 
He stopped inches in front of us and roared again. A deafening roar. 

“His teeth!” Nicole cried. 

I saw them, too. Two rows of huge, razor-sharp teeth. 

The monster growled. 

And reached for us. His sharp claws flashed. 

He swiped at me. I tried to duck away. 

The monster snarled in frustration. He reached out again.... 

He clamped a powerful paw on Nicole’s head. 

“Help!” Nicole screamed. “He’s crushing me!” 



19 


“Let go of her!” I shrieked. 

But I knew I was helpless. 

The Abominable Snowman growled and turned Nicole around roughly. 

Then he reached behind her and grabbed her backpack. He ripped it off her 
shoulder with a sharp, hard tug. 

“Hey!” I cried in horror. 

With one claw he sliced open the canvas backpack. He reached inside. And 
pulled something out. 

A bag. A bag of trail mix. 

Nicole and I stared in amazement as he poured the trail mix into his mouth. 

“Weird,” I choked out. “He likes trail mix.” 

The monster crumpled up the bag and shifted through Nicole’s pack, 
searching for more. 

“That’s all there is,” Nicole whispered to me. 

With an angry growl, the monster tossed Nicole’s pack away. 

“Now what?” Nicole whispered. 

I reached into my own backpack, and with a trembling hand I yanked out 
my bag of trail mix. I heaved it at the monster. 

The bag hit the floor and slid to the monster’s feet. He bent down. Grabbed 
it. Tore it open. And hungrily gulped down the trail mix. 

When he finished, I shoved my pack toward him. 

He grunted. Then he dumped out my stuff. 

No more trail mix. 

Uh-oh. 

The monster stretched and roared. Then he reached down. With two 
gigantic arms, he grabbed Nicole and me. 

He lifted us up. 

He raised us toward his face. 

Toward his mouth. 

Preparing to eat us. 



20 


I struggled, but he was too strong. I pounded my fists on his chest. I kicked as 
hard as I could. He didn’t seem to feel it. 

He clutched Nicole and me like a couple of dolls. 

“Please don’t eat us!” I begged. “Please!” 

The monster grunted. He draped us both over the crook of one arm. Then he 
staggered back across the cave, gripping us tightly. 

I kicked him in the side. No reaction. Nothing. 

“Let go!” I shrieked. “Let us down!” 

“Where’s he taking us?” Nicole cried, bouncing as the creature tromped 
across the cave. 

Maybe he wants to roast us, I thought grimly. Maybe he doesn’t like his 
kids raw. 

He lugged us to the back of the cave. With one powerful swipe of the paw, 
he knocked a boulder aside. A narrow passage appeared behind it. 

Nicole moaned. “Why didn’t we see that before? Maybe we could have 
escaped!” 

“Too late now,” I groaned. 

The snowman pulled us through the passage. We came out into a smaller 
cave, flooded with light. I glanced up. 

Above us I could see the gray sky. 

Away out! 

Balancing us in one arm, the monster scaled the wall of the cave. With big, 
lurching steps, he climbed out of the hole. 

Cold air blasted me in the face. But the monster’s body pulsed with heat. 

The blizzard had stopped. Fresh snow covered the tundra. 

The monster stumbled through the snow, grunting as he walked. 

His gigantic feet sank deep into the snow. But with each huge step he 
covered a lot of ground. 

Where was he taking us? Where? 

Maybe he has another cave, I thought with a shudder. A cave with more 
monsters in it. His friends. They’ll all feast on us! 



I tried again to break out of the snowman’s grip. I kicked and squirmed as 
hard as I could. 

The monster growled. He dug his claws into my side. 

“Ow!” I yelped. But I stopped squirming. If I moved, his claws dug deeper. 
Poor Dad, I thought sadly. He’ll never know what happened to us. 

Unless he finds our bones buried in the snow. 

Suddenly, I heard barking. A dog! 

The Abominable Snowman stopped. He growled and sniffed the air. Then 
he gently dropped Nicole and me in the snow. 

We landed unsteadily on our feet. 

Nicole stared at me in surprise. 

We started to run, stumbling through the deep snow. I glanced back. 

“Is he chasing us?” Nicole asked. 

I couldn’t be sure. I couldn’t see him now. I only saw white. 

“Keep running!” I shouted. 

Then I saw something familiar in the distance. A brown speck. 

I bumped Nicole. “The cabin!” 

We ran even faster. If we could just get to the cabin... 

From the cabin we heard furious barking—the dog Arthur had left behind. 
“Dad! Dad!” we shrieked. We burst through the door. “We found him! We 
found the Abominable Snowman!” 

“Dad?” 

The cabin stood empty. Empty and bare. 

Dad was gone. 



21 


My eyes darted around the empty cabin. 

“Dad? Dad?” 

My heart skipped a beat. My throat went dry. 

Where did he go? 

Was he out searching for Nicole and me? Did he get lost in the snow? 

“We—we’re all alone,” I murmured. 

Nicole and I ran to the window. A thin layer of snow frosted the pane. We 
peered out into the bright sunlight. 

No sign of Dad. 

“At least the snowman didn’t follow us,” I said. 

“Jordan, why did he drop us?” Nicole asked softly. 

“I think the barking dog scared him,” I replied. 

If that dog hadn’t barked, what would the monster have done to us? 

As the question pushed into my mind, I heard the dog start to bark again. 
Nicole and I both gasped. 

“The snowman—!” I cried. “He’s back! Hide!” 

We glanced around, frantically searching for a good hiding place. The cabin 
was so bare—it wouldn’t take the monster long to find us. 

“Behind the stove!” Nicole urged. 

We dashed to the small, square stove and crouched behind it. 

Outside the cabin we heard the slow, heavy footsteps of the monster. 

Crunch, crunch, crunch. Footsteps over the snow. 

Nicole grabbed my hand. We froze, waiting. Listening. 

Crunch, crunch. 

Please don’t come into the cabin, I prayed. Please don’t capture us again. 
The footsteps stopped outside the door. I squeezed my eyes shut. 

The door burst open. A blast of cold air blew into the room. 

“Jordan? Nicole?” 

Dad! 

We jumped out from behind the stove. There stood Dad, with his camera 
around his neck. 



We both ran to him and hugged him. “Dad! I’m so glad it’s you!” 

“Hi!” he replied. “What’s going on, guys? I expected you to be asleep.” He 
glanced around the cabin. “Hey—where’s Arthur?” 

“He took off!” I cried breathlessly. “He took the sled. He took all the food 
and three of the dogs.” 

“We chased after him,” Nicole added. “But he got away.” 

Dad’s face filled with surprise, then horror. “I’d better radio for help. We 
won’t last long without food.” 

“Dad—listen.” I blocked his way to the radio. “Nicole and I—found the 
Abominable Snowman!” 

He sidestepped around me. “This is no time for jokes, Jordan. If we don’t 
get help, we could starve to death out here!” 

“He’s not joking, Dad,” Nicole insisted, tugging Dad’s arm. “We really 
found the snowman. He lives in a cave under the snow.” 

Dad stopped and studied Nicole. He always believes her. But this time he 
wasn’t sure. 

“It’s true!” I cried. “Come on—we’ll show you!” 

Nicole and I tugged him out the door. 

“Jordan, if this is one of your tricks, you are going to be in major trouble,” 
he warned. “We’re in a serious situation here and—” 

“Dad, he’s not kidding!” Nicole cried impatiently. “Come on!” 

We led him out into the snow to the spot where the snowman had dropped 
us. We pointed out his huge footprints. 

“Why should I believe this?” Dad said. “You faked the snowman’s 
footprints this morning, Jordan. These just look a little bigger.” 

“Dad, I swear—I didn’t make these prints!” 

“We’ll show you the cave, Dad,” Nicole promised. “Follow the footprints. 
You’ll see. It’s unbelievable!” 

I knew Dad went along with us only because Nicole insisted. He trusted 
her. She never played jokes on him. 

Leaning into the wind, we traced the giant prints across the snow. Dad 
couldn’t resist snapping pictures of them—just in case. 

The footsteps led us back to the cave. They stopped at an opening in the 
ground. 

“The cave is down that hole,” I told Dad, pointing. 

I think Dad believed us now. “Let’s go. Check it out,” he said. 



“Huh?” I cried. “Back down there? To the monster?” 

Dad was already sliding down to the cave opening. He reached up to help 
Nicole climb down. 

I hesitated. “Dad—wait. You don’t understand. There’s a monster down 
there!” 

“Come on, Jordan,” Dad urged. “I want to see this for myself.” 

I had no choice. Dad was going in there no matter what I said. And I didn’t 
want to wait outside alone. I scrambled down to the opening of the cave. 

The three of us felt our way along the narrow passage until we reached the 
mouth of the big cave. 

Keeping close together, Dad and Nicole walked in. But I stopped at the 
entrance and stared into the cave. 

“Jordan! Come on!” Dad whispered. 

There’s a monster in there, I thought with a shudder. A huge monster with 
long claws and sharp teeth. 

We managed to escape from him once. Why are we going back? What’s 
going to happen to us in there? 

I had a bad feeling. A very bad feeling. 



22 


Dad grabbed me by the hand and pulled me into the cave. I heard the drip of icy 
water against the back wall. I blinked in the darkness. 

Where was he? Where was the Abominable Snowman? 

I heard Dad’s camera clicking away. I tried to stay close to Dad. I cried out 
when I spotted the snowman. I expected him to roar and lumber after us. 

But he stood stiffly, staring straight ahead. 

Refrozen again. Inside a huge block of ice. 

Nicole stepped closer to the block of ice. “How does he do that?” 

“This is amazing !” Dad cried, snapping picture after picture. “ Incredible /” 

I stared up at the monster’s face. He glared out at us from inside the ice. His 
black eyes glittered, his mouth set in a toothy snarl. 

“This is the most amazing discovery in history!” 

Dad exclaimed. “Do you realize how famous we are going to be?” 

He stopped shooting for a second and peered up at the brown-furred 
monster. 

“Why stop here?” he murmured. “Why go home with nothing but photos? 
Why not take the snowman himself back to California? Do you know what a 
sensation that will create?” 

“But—how?” Nicole asked. 

“He’s alive, you know, Dad,” I warned. “I mean, he can crack out of that 
ice. And when he does, it’s really scary. I don’t think you could control him.” 

Dad knocked gently on the ice, testing it. “We won’t let him out of the ice,” 
he said. “At least not until we’ve got him under control.” 

Dad walked all the way around the block of ice, rubbing his chin. “If we cut 
the ice a bit, it might fit into the supply trunk,” he said. “Then we could carry the 
snowman back to California in the block of ice, locked in the trunk. It’s airtight, 
so the ice won’t melt.” 

He stepped up close to the ice and snapped a few more shots of the 
snowman’s snarling face. “Let’s go get the trunk, kids.” 

“Dad—wait.” I didn’t like this idea. “You don’t understand. The snowman 
could rush us! He let us go once. But why take another chance?” 

“Look at his teeth, Dad,” Nicole pleaded. “He’s so strong, he picked us both 



up at once!” 

“It’s worth the risk,” Dad insisted. “Neither of you is hurt, right?” 

Nicole and I nodded. “Yes, but—” 

“Let’s go.” Dad had made his mind up. He wasn’t going to listen to our 
warnings. 

I’d never seen him so excited. As we hurried from the cave, he called to the 
snowman, “Don’t go away—we’ll be right back!” 

We rushed over the snow to the cabin. Dad pulled the supply trunk outside. 
It was about six feet long and three feet wide. 

“The snowman will fit,” he said. “But with him inside the trunk, it will be 
very heavy.” 

“We need the dogsled to pull it,” Nicole said. 

“But Arthur took the sled,” I reminded them. “So I guess the deal is off. 
We’ll just have to go home without an Abominable Snowman. Too bad!” 

“Maybe there’s another sled around somewhere,” Dad suggested. “This is 
an old musher’s cabin, after all.” 

I remembered the old sled I’d seen in the dog shed. Nicole had seen it, too. 
She led Dad to it. 

“Fantastic!” Dad cried. “Now let’s go get that snowman before he escapes.” 

We hitched Lars, our only dog, to the old sled and towed the supply trunk to 
the cave. 

Then we crept silently into the cave, pulling the trunk behind us. “Careful, 
Dad,” I warned. “He might have broken out of the ice by now.” 

But the Abominable Snowman stood where we’d left him, frozen in his 
block of ice. 

Dad began to cut the ice down to size with a hacksaw. 

I paced nervously. “Hurry!” I whispered. “He could burst out any minute!” 

“This isn’t easy,” Dad snapped. “I’m working as fast as I can.” He hacked 
away. 

Each second felt like an hour to me. I watched the snowman carefully for 
any signs of movement. 

“Dad, do you have to saw so loudly?” I complained. “The noise could wake 
him up!” 

“Relax, Jordan,” Dad said. But his voice was tight and shrill, too. 

Then I heard a crack. 

“Look out!” I cried. “He’s breaking out!” 



Dad straightened up. “I cracked the ice a bit, Jordan.” 

I studied the monster. He hadn’t moved. 

“Okay, kids,” Dad said. “We’re ready.” Dad had cut the ice into a six-foot- 
long rectangle. “Help me slide this into the trunk.” 

I opened the lid of the trunk. Nicole and I helped Dad tip the ice over and 
gently drop it into the trunk. It just barely fit. 

We slid the trunk along the ground to the opening of the cave. Dad tied a 
rope around it and climbed out of the hole. “I’ll tie the rope to the sled,” Dad 
called from above. “That way Lars can help me hoist it out.” 

“Hey,” I whispered to Nicole, “let’s sneak some snowballs into the trunk— 
just for fun. We can throw them at Kyle and Kara when we get home. Snow 
from the cave of the Abominable Snowman—they’ll never top that!” 

“No—please. Don’t open the trunk,” Nicole begged. “We just barely got the 
snowman inside.” 

“We can squeeze a few snowballs in,” I insisted. I quickly made a bunch of 
snowballs, packing them tight. Then I cracked open the trunk and slipped them 
inside, next to the block of ice. 

I checked the monster one last time for signs of life. The ice was solid. We 
were safe. 

“They won’t melt in there,” I said sealing the lid of the trunk shut. We 
locked it with the bolt and tightened the rope around it. I felt pretty sure the 
snowman wouldn’t be able to break out of there; even if he did crack through the 
ice. 

“Ready?” Dad shouted from up above. “One, two, three—heave!” 

Dad and Lars tugged on the rope until the chest lifted off the ground. Nicole 
and I squatted beneath it to help push it up. 

“Again!” Dad yelled. “Heave!” 

We pushed as hard as we could. “It’s so heavy!” Nicole complained. 

“Come on, kids!” Dad called. “Push!” 

We gave the trunk a shove. Dad and Lars tugged it over the lip of the cave 
opening. 

Dad collapsed in the snow. “Whew,” he muttered, wiping his brow. “Well, 
the hardest part is over.” 

He helped Nicole and me scramble out. 

We all rested a few minutes. Then we dragged the trunk onto the sled. Dad 
secured it with the rope. Lars pulled the sled back to the cabin. 



Once inside, Dad hugged us both. “What a day! What a great day!” 

He turned to me. “See, Jordan? Nothing terrible happened.” 

“We’re lucky,” I said. 

“I’m so sleepy,” Nicole complained, sinking onto her sleeping bag. 

I glanced out the window. The sun sat high in the sky, as usual. But I knew 
it had to be very late. 

Dad glanced at his watch. “It’s almost midnight. You two should get some 
sleep.” He frowned. “I’d hate to wake up here in the morning with no food, 
though. I’m going to radio for help. You guys can sleep when we get back to 
town.” 

“Can we stay in a hotel?” I asked Dad. “In a bed?” 

“If we can find one,” he promised. He opened his pack, searching for the 
radio. 

He shuffled stuff around in his pack. Then he pulled things out, one by one. 
A compass. An extra camera. Cans of film. A pair of socks, balled up. 

I didn’t like the look on his face. He turned the pack over and dumped 
everything on the floor. He sifted through it, again, getting frantic. 

“Dad? What’s the matter?” 

When he turned to me, he had a terrified expression on his face. “The 
radio,” he murmured. “It’s gone.” 



23 


“No!” Nicole and I both shrieked. 

“I don’t believe it!” Dad cried, pounding his fist against his empty pack. 
“Arthur must have taken the radio so we wouldn’t report him.” 

I stomped around the room, frightened and furious. Our dogs, our sled, our 
food—Arthur had taken them all. 

And now the radio. 

Did Arthur leave us here to freeze? To starve? 

“Calm down, Jordan,” Dad said. 

“But, Dad—” Nicole interrupted. 

Dad shushed her. “Just a second, Nicole. I’ve got to think of a way out of 
this.” Dad searched the cabin. “Don’t panic. Don’t panic. Don’t panic,” he 
instructed himself. 

“But Dad—” Nicole said, tugging at his sleeve. 

“Nicole!” I snapped. “We’re in huge trouble. We could die out here!” 

“Dad!” she insisted. “Listen to me! You wrapped up the radio last night so 
it wouldn’t freeze. It’s in your sleeping bag!” 

Dad’s mouth dropped open. “You’re right!” he cried. He hurried to his 
sleeping bag and reached inside. He dug into his sleeping bag—and pulled out 
the radio, wrapped in a wool scarf. 

He switched on the radio and fiddled with the dials. “Iknek, Iknek. Come 
in, Iknek.” 

Dad asked the Iknek airport to send us a helicopter. He tried to describe 
where we were. 

Nicole and I smiled sleepily at each other. 

“We’re going home!” she said happily. “Home to sunny, hot Pasadena.” 

“I’m going to kiss a palm tree!” I declared. “I never want to see snow 
again.” 

I had no idea that our snowy adventure was just beginning! 



24 


“Ahhhh,” I sighed. “Feel that sun? Nice and hot.” 

“The radio said it’s a hundred degrees today,” Nicole reported. 

“I love it!” I beamed. “Love it!” 

I slapped more tanning lotion on my chest. 

Our Alaska trip all seemed unreal, now that we were home in Pasadena. 
The cold, the snow, the wind blowing over the rolling white tundra. The snarling, 
brown-furred Abominable Snowman. It all seemed like a dream. 

But I knew it was no dream. 

Dad had hidden the trunk with the Abominable Snowman inside the 
darkroom in the backyard. Every time I passed it, I remembered the trip... 
remembered the creature lying frozen in there—and shivered. 

In our swimsuits, Nicole and I caught some rays in the backyard. Good old 
sunny Pasadena. Where it never, never snowed. 

Thank goodness. 

Lauren came over to hear about our trip. I wanted to tell her the whole story. 
But Dad told us to keep quiet about it—at least until the snowman was safely 
settled somewhere. 

“I don’t believe you two!” Lauren snorted. “A week ago you wouldn’t shut 
up about snow. Now you’re letting the sun burn you to a crisp!” 

“Well, we did the cold thing and now we’re doing the hot thing,” I told her. 
“Anyway, I’ve seen enough snow to last me the rest of my life.” 

“Tell me about the trip,” Lauren insisted. “Tell me everything!” 

“It’s a big secret,” Nicole told her. She and I exchanged glances. 

“Secret? What kind of secret?” Lauren demanded. 

Before we could reply, Dad emerged from the darkroom. He squinted in the 
sunlight. He wore a down jacket, a ski cap, and gloves. He had turned the air- 
conditioning way up in the darkroom and covered the trunk with ice packs, to 
keep the snowman cold. 

“I’m going into the city now,” he announced, removing his coat. Dad had a 
meeting with some scientists and wildlife experts in Los Angeles. 

He wanted to turn the Abominable Snowman over to the right people. He 
wanted to be sure the snowman would be treated well. 



“Are you kids going to be all right while I’m gone?” he asked. 

“Of course,” Nicole replied. “We survived the Alaskan tundra. I think we 
can live through one afternoon in our own backyard.” 

“My mom is home,” Lauren said. “She’ll be around if we need anything.” 
“Good.” Dad nodded. “Okay, I’m off. But remember—Jordan and Nicole, 
are you listening? Don’t touch the supply trunk. Stay away from it— 
understood?” 

“Gotcha, Dad,” I promised. 

“All right. I’ll bring a pizza home for dinner.” 

“Good luck, Dad!” Nicole called. I watched him jump into the car and drive 
off. 

“So what’s the big secret?” Lauren asked as soon as Dad was gone. “What’s 
in the supply trunk?” 

Nicole and I glanced at each other. 

“Come on. Spill,” Lauren urged. “I won’t leave you alone until you tell 

me.” 

I couldn’t resist. I had to tell someone. “We found him. We found him and 
we brought him back.” 

“Found who?” 

“The snowman!” Nicole exclaimed. “The Abominable Snowman!” 

Lauren rolled her eyes. “For sure. And did you find the Tooth Fairy up 
there, too?” 

“Yes, we did,” I joked. 

“He’s lying in the darkroom right now,” Nicole told Lauren. 

Lauren’s face twisted in confusion. “Who—the Tooth Fairy?” 

“No. The Abominable Snowman. Areal one,” I said. “Trapped in a block of 

ice.” 

Along with four or five snowballs, I thought to myself. 

Snowballs I could throw at Lauren. For a nice little surprise. 

“Prove it,” Lauren challenged us. “You’re making it all up. You think 
you’re really funny.” 

Nicole and I exchanged glances. I knew what she was thinking. Dad had 
just told us to stay away from the trunk. 

“You two are as bad as the Miller twins,” Lauren complained. 

That did it. “Come on,” I said. “We’ll show you.” 

“We’d better not, Jordan,” Nicole argued. 



“We won’t hurt anything,” I promised. “We’ll just pull open the lid a tiny 
bit so Lauren can see him. Then we’ll slam it shut. No harm done.” 

I climbed off my lounge chair and started across the lawn to the darkroom. 
Nicole and Lauren followed me. 

I knew they would. 

I opened the darkroom door and switched on the light. A blast of cold air 
swept over me, making my bare chest tingle. 

Nicole hesitated in the doorway. “Jordan, maybe we shouldn’t.” 

“Oh, come on, Nicole,” Lauren chided. “There’s no Abominable Snowman. 
You two are ridiculous!” 

“We’re not ridiculous!” Nicole protested. 

“We might as well show her, Nicole,” I said. 

Nicole didn’t reply. She stepped into the darkroom and shut the door. 

In my bathing suit, I was shivering from the cold. It was almost like being 
back in Alaska. 

I knelt beside the huge trunk. I unhooked the latches. 

Slowly, carefully, I lifted the heavy lid. 

Peered inside. 

And let out a chilling, bloodcurdling scream of horror. 



25 


Nicole and Lauren shrieked and leaped back. 

Nicole backed into the wall with a crash. 

Lauren ducked under the developing table. 

I couldn’t keep a straight face. I started to laugh. “Gotcha!” I cried 
gleefully. I was so pleased with myself. 

I had scared them to death. They were both stiffer than the Abominable 
Snowman. He lay frozen and still inside his block of ice. 

“Jordan—you creep!” Nicole declared angrily. She punched me in the back. 

Lauren punched me too. Then she peered into the open trunk. 

And let out another scream. “He’s real! You—you weren’t kidding!” I could 
see that she was breathing hard. 

“It’s okay, Lauren,” I assured her. “He can’t hurt you. He’s frozen.” 

She stepped closer and stared down at him. 

“He’s huge!” she cried in amazement. “His—his eyes are open. They’re so 
mean-looking!” 

“Close the lid, Jordan,” Nicole insisted. “Quick. We’ve seen enough.” 

“Now do you believe us?” I asked Lauren. 

She nodded. “It’s... awesome!” She shook her head, stunned at the amazing 
sight. 

Before I shut the lid, I sneaked two snowballs out of the bottom of the 
trunk. Snickering, I passed one to Nicole. 

“What’s so funny?” Lauren asked suspiciously. 

“Nothing,” I said. I sealed the lid shut and latched the trunk. That’ll hold 
him, I thought. We’re safe. Dad will never know we sneaked a peek at the 
monster. 

We left the darkroom, closing the door carefully behind us. 

“That creature is just so awesome!” Lauren exclaimed. “What is your dad 
going to do with him?” 

“We’re not sure yet,” Nicole replied. “Dad’s trying to figure that out.” 

She held her hands behind her back, hiding the snowball from Lauren. 
Suddenly she shouted, “Hey, Lauren! Think fast!” 



She threw the snowball at Lauren. It missed. 

Splat! It hit a tree. 

“Nice shot, ace!” I cried sarcastically. 

But then I gaped at the tree in shock. 

The snowball—it didn’t crumble to the ground. 

It started to growl 

Thick white snow spread quickly up the tree trunk—and over the branches. 
Within seconds, the entire tree was covered with snow! 

“Wow!” Lauren gasped. “Nicole—how did you do that?” 

Nicole and I stared open-mouthed at the snow-covered tree. 

I was so stunned, the snowball fell out of my hand. 

I jumped back as it hit the ground—and spread! 

“Oh, wow!” I shrieked. I watched snow spread over the lawn like a white 
blanket. 

It spread under our bare feet. Over the driveway. Out to the street. 

“Ooooh! It’s cold!” Nicole wailed, hopping from foot to foot. 

“This is too weird!” I cried. “It’s a hundred degrees out—and the snow isn’t 
melting! It’s spreading—and growing deeper!” 

I turned to see Lauren hopping and dancing, whirling around wildly. 
“Snow! Snow!” she sang. “It’s wonderful! Snow in Pasadena!” 

“Jordan—” Nicole said quietly. “This isn’t right. We should have left this 
snow in the cave. It isn’t normal snow.” 

Of course she was right. Any cave where an Abominable Snowman lives 
has got to be a weird place. But how could we have guessed—? 

“Let’s build a snowman!” Lauren cried gleefully. 

“No!” Nicole warned. “Don’t touch it. Don’t do anything, Lauren. Not until 
we’ve figured this out.” 

I don’t think Lauren heard my sister. She was too excited. She kicked a 
spray of snow at an evergreen bush. The bush froze over with snow. 

“What are we going to do?” I asked Nicole. “What’s going to happen when 
Dad comes home? He’ll kill us!” 

Nicole shrugged. “Beats me.” 

“But—but—you’re supposed to be the brain ]” I sputtered. 

“This is so cool!” Lauren squealed. “Snow in Pasadena!” She picked up a 
chunk of snow and started balling it up between her hands. 

“Snowball fight!” she shouted. 



“Stop it, Lauren!” I cried. “We’re in big trouble here. Don’t you understand 

_ ?” 

Lauren fired the snowball at Nicole. 

Instantly, thick white snow spread all over Nicole’s body. Covering her. 
Covering her until she looked like a snowman! 

“Nicole!” I cried, running over the snowy ground to her. “Nicole—are you 
okay?” 

I grabbed her arm. Stiff as an icicle. She was frozen solid! 

“Nicole?” I stared into her snow-covered eyes. “Can you hear me, Nicole? 
Can you breathe in there? Nicole? Nicole?” 



26 


“Oh, no!” Lauren shrieked. “What have I done?” 

My sister was a statue. A frozen, snow-covered statue. 

“Nicole, I’m so sorry,” Lauren cried. “Can you hear me? I’m so sorry!” 

“Let’s take her inside,” I suggested frantically. “If we get her in the warm 
house, maybe we can warm her up.” 

Lauren grabbed one of Nicole’s arms. I grabbed the other. We carefully 
dragged her stiff body to the house. Her bare toes, hard as ice, left a long trail in 
the snow. 

“She’s so freezing!” Lauren cried. “How can we melt the snow?” 

“Let’s put her next to the oven,” I said. “Maybe if we turn it up full blast, 
the snow will melt.” 

We stood her in front of the oven. For good measure, I turned on all the 
burners on top of the stove. 

“That ought to do it,” I said. A bead of sweat trickled down my face. From 
the heat—or from worry? 

Lauren and I watched and waited. 

Watched and waited. 

I didn’t move. I didn’t breathe. 

The snow didn’t melt. 

“It’s not working,” Lauren groaned. “Nothing’s happening.” 

I tapped Nicole’s arm. Solid ice. 

I tried to stay calm. But I felt as if a hundred butterflies were tap dancing in 
my stomach. “All right, it’s not working. We’ll have to try something else. 
Something else...” 

Tears rolled down Lauren’s cheeks. “Like what?” Lauren demanded in a 
trembling voice. 

“Well...” I racked my brain for the hottest place I could think of. “The 
furnace! We’ll hold her in front of the furnace.” 

We dragged Nicole into the furnace shed behind the garage. The snow 
seemed to weigh a ton. It took all our strength to drag her. 

I turned the furnace on full blast. Lauren stood Nicole in front of the open 
furnace door. 



A blast of hot air sent Lauren and me staggering back. “If this doesn’t work, 
nothing will,” Lauren sobbed. 

The heat roared out of the furnace. I saw reflections of the red flames on 
Nicole’s icy face. 

My heart pounding, I watched to see the ice start to drip and the snow slide 
off her. 

But the ice didn’t melt. My sister remained a human snow cone. 

“Jordan—what are we going to do?” Lauren wailed. 

I shook my head, thinking hard. “The furnace isn’t working. What else is 
hot?” I was too scared to think clearly. 

“Don’t worry, Nicole,” Lauren told my frozen sister. “We’ll get you out of 
this—somehow.” 

I suddenly remembered how warm the Abominable Snowman had felt 
when he carried us across the Alaskan tundra. There we were, ten degrees below 
zero, surrounded by deep snow, and heat had poured off the creature’s body. 

“Come on, Lauren,” I ordered. “We’re taking her to the darkroom.” 

Struggling and straining, we dragged Nicole back outside and across the 
backyard to the darkroom. 

“Stay here,” I told Lauren. “I’ll be right back.” 

I raced into the kitchen. I pulled open all the cupboards and drawers, 
desperately searching for one thing—trail mix. 

Please, please let there be trail mix somewhere in this house! I prayed. 

“Yes!” I found a plastic bag of trail mix behind an old box of spaghetti. I 
grabbed it and flew back to the darkroom. 

Lauren stared at the bag in my hand. “What’s that?” 

“Trail mix.” 

“Trail mix? Jordan, can’t you wait to eat later?” 

“It’s not for me—it’s for him” I motioned at the trunk. 

“What?” 

I unlatched the trunk and pulled it open. The Abominable Snowman lay 
inside as before, frozen in the block of ice. 

I grabbed a handful of trail mix and waved it above the snowman’s face. 
“Wake up!” I begged. “Please wake up! Look—I brought you some trail mix!” 

“Jordan—have you totally lost it?” Lauren screeched. “What on earth are 
you doing?” 

“I can’t think of any other way to save Nicole!” I cried. 



My hand trembled as I frantically waved the trail mix over the snowman. 
“Come on! You know you love trail mix. Wake up! Please wake up! Come out 
and help us.” 

I leaned over, staring hard at the monster’s eyes. Watching for him to blink. 
Watching for any signs of life. 

But the eyes didn’t move. The creature stared lifelessly up through the 
block of ice. 

I refused to give up. 

“Yum, yum!” I shouted, my voice high and wild. 

“Trail mix! Boy, is that good!” I popped a few raisins into my mouth and 
chewed. “Mmm-mm! Delicious trail mix. So good! So tasty! Come on—wake 
up and try some!” 

“He’s not moving!” Lauren sobbed. “Give up, Jordan. It isn’t going to 
work.” 



27 


I jumped when I heard a soft sound. A faint crick. 

I stared down at the block of ice. 

Did the monster move? 

No. Silence now. The Abominable Snowman’s black eyes glittered up at 
me, lifeless and blank. 

Was it my imagination? 

Lauren is right, I thought sadly. My plan isn’t working. 

Nothing is working. 

I gently touched my sister’s stiff, frozen arm. Maybe when Dad gets home, 
I hoped. Maybe he’ll think of some way to save her. 

“What are we going to dooooo?” Lauren sobbed. She was no help at all. 
Crack. 

I heard it again—louder this time. 

And then: Crrraaaaaccckkkk! 

A long crack ripped across the ice. 

The Abominable Snowman groaned. 

Lauren leaped back with a wild scream. “It’s alive!” 

The ice broke up. The furry snowman slowly pulled himself up, moaning. 
Lauren cried out in fear. She pressed herself against the darkroom wall. 
“What’s he going to do?” 

“Shhh!” 

The monster shook shards of broken ice from his shoulders. He lifted 
himself out of the trunk. He uttered a low growl. 

“Jordan, look out!” Lauren cried. 

The monster lurched toward me. My heart jumped. I wanted to back away 
—or run away. But I couldn’t. I had to stay and help Nicole. 

“Unh!” the snowman grunted. He swiped a giant paw at me. 

Lauren let out another shrill scream. 

I leaped back. What would the monster do? 

“Unh!” the monster cried again. He took another swipe. 

“Let’s get out of here!” Lauren shouted. “He’s going to hurt you!” 



I wanted to run. But Nicole... 

The monster swiped at me again—and snatched the bag of trail mix out of 
my hands. 

I suddenly realized that was all he wanted. He had been grabbing for the 
trail mix. 

He poured the trail mix into his mouth, gulping it down, swallowing it 
noisily. Then he tossed the bag away. 

Lauren pressed her back against the corner of the darkroom. “Make him go 
back into the trunk!” she cried. 

“Are you crazy? How can I do that?” 

The snowman growled and staggered across the floor. 

His heavy footsteps shook the floor. He stopped in front of Nicole. 

He reached his powerful arms around her snow-covered body—and 
squeezed. 

“Stop him!” Lauren screamed. “He’s crushing her!” 



28 


I couldn’t move. I stared in horror. 

The big creature hugged Nicole hard—so hard that he lifted her off the 
ground. 

“Stop!” I finally choked out. “You’re hurting her!” 

Without thinking of the danger, I dove forward. I grabbed his furry arms 
with both hands—and struggled to pull him off my sister. 

With an angry grunt, he brushed me away. 

I stumbled back—and fell into Lauren. 

I turned to see the monster squeezing Nicole. 

Lauren pointed down at the floor. “Jordan—look!” 

Gazing down, I saw a small puddle under Nicole’s feet. Water dripped off 
her and onto the floor. As it hit the floor, it evaporated. Vanished from sight. 

Did I see Nicole’s toes wiggle? 

Yes! 

I stepped closer. Caught a glimpse of her face. 

A dot of pink appeared on her cheeks. 

Yes! 

Chunks of snow dropped off her body. They thudded to the floor, melted, 
and disappeared. 

I turned to Lauren. “It’s working!” I cried happily. “He’s defrosting her!” 

A trembling smile crossed Lauren’s worried face. 

A few seconds later, the snowman let Nicole go. The ice and snow had all 
melted and disappeared. The snowman gave a satisfied grunt and stepped back. 

Nicole moved her arms stiffly. She rubbed her face, as if she were waking 
up. 

“Nicole!” I cried, grabbing her by the shoulders. Warm. Her shoulders were 
warm. “Are you okay?” 

She shook her head, dazed. “What happened?” 

Lauren ran up to Nicole and threw her arms around her. “You were frozen!” 
she said. “Frozen like a snowman! But thank goodness—you’re all right!” 

I turned to see the snowman watching us. 



“Thank you,” I called to him. 

I don’t know if he understood me. He grunted. 

“Let’s get out of here,” Lauren urged. “I’m freezing!” 

“Maybe the sun will warm you up,” I told her. 

We opened the darkroom door and stepped outside. The sun still beamed 
down. The air felt sweltering hot. But the whole yard was covered in snow. 

“Oh, yeah,” Lauren murmured. “I forgot about that.” 

“Hey—!” I cried out when I saw the Abominable Snowman leap out of the 
darkroom. “He’s escaping!” I shrieked. 

“Dad will kill us!” Nicole cried. 

All three of us started shouting at the creature. 

He ignored our cries and thudded heavily across the snow. His black eyes 
narrowed on the snow-covered tree. He stepped up to the tree. Threw his arms 
around it. And hugged it tightly, just like when he had hugged Nicole. 

I watched as the snow began to melt. The blanket of white slipped down, 
down, shrinking away—until the tree stood green and golden again under the 
sunlight. 

“Wow!” I uttered, hands pressed against my face. 

But the big, furry creature had more surprises in store. 

With a loud grunt, he dropped to the snowy ground. As we stared in 
surprise, he began to roll in the snow. 

The snow appeared to stick to his fur. As he rolled, the snow vanished 
beneath him. 

Before long, the big creature was rolling on green grass. The last of the 
snow had vanished. 

He jumped to his feet. His eyes went wide, and he uttered a pained cry. 

“What’s the matter with him?” Lauren demanded. 

The Abominable Snowman gazed around, stunned, at the green grass, the 
palm trees. Then he raised his eyes to the blazing sun. 

He clutched his fur-covered head and let out a scream of terror. 

He seemed confused for a moment. Frightened. Then he let out a deep grunt 
—and took off down the street. His big paws thudded heavily over the pavement. 

I ran after him. “Wait! Come back!” 

He tore through someone’s yard and kept running. 

I gave up. No way I could catch him. 

Nicole and Lauren caught up to me. “Where’s he going?” Nicole 



demanded. 

“How should I know?” I snapped, struggling to catch my breath. 

“I think he’s looking for someplace cold,” Lauren said. 

Nicole agreed. “You’re probably right. He must be so hot. Pasadena is no 
place for an Abominable Snowman.” 

“He’ll probably find a cave in the mountains,” I said. “It’s a lot colder up 
there. I only hope he finds a way to get trail mix.” 

We trudged back to our yard. Green again. And hot. I knew that Nicole and 
I had one word in our minds—D-A-D. 

He had instructed us not to touch the trunk. We had ignored his warning. 

Now the snowman was gone. Dad’s big discovery. Dad’s big chance for 
fame. 

Gone. Gone forever. 

It was all our fault. 

“At least Dad has his photos,” I said softly. “The photos will amaze 
everyone all by themselves.” 

“I guess so,” Nicole replied, biting her bottom lip tensely. 

We walked back to the darkroom to close up the supply trunk. I glanced 
inside the trunk. Two magic snowballs were left. 

“Those things are dangerous. We’d better get rid of them,” Nicole warned. 

“I’m not touching them.” Lauren backed away. 

“You’re right,” I told my sister. “We should hide them somewhere. They’re 
too dangerous to keep around.” 

Nicole ran into the house and returned with a heavy-duty garbage bag. 
“Quick—stuff them in here.” 

I carefully scooped up each snowball and dropped it in the trash bag. Then I 
twisted the bag closed and knotted it tightly. 

“Now what?” Lauren asked. 

“We should blast them into outer space,” Nicole said. “If anyone gets hold 
of them and starts spreading snow around, we’ll be in big trouble. We need the 
Abominable Snowman to get rid of the snow—and he’s gone.” 

“Pasadena could turn into a ski resort!” I joked. “We could ice skate on 
Kyle and Kara’s swimming pool.” 

I shivered. I didn’t want to think about Kyle and Kara. And I didn’t want to 
think about snow. “We should bury the snowballs,” I told them. “But where?” 

“Not in my yard!” Lauren protested. 



I didn’t want to bury them in our yard, either. What would happen to them 
down there? Would they spread snow underground? Would snow spring up 
through the grass? 

We left the darkroom and scanned the area for good burial spots. 

“What about the empty lot?” Nicole suggested. 

Across the street, right next to Kyle and Kara Miller’s house, stood a vacant 
lot. There was nothing in it but piles of sand and a few empty bottles. 

“Perfect,” I declared. “No one will ever find the snowballs there.” 

Nicole hurried to the garage and grabbed a shovel. We crossed the street, 
glancing around to make sure no one saw us. 

“The coast is clear,” I said. 

I grabbed the shovel and dug a deep hole in the sand. It took longer than I 
thought. Sand kept falling back into the hole. 

Finally, the hole was deep enough. 

Nicole dropped the trash bag into the hole. “Good-bye, snowballs,” she 
said. “Good-bye, Alaska.” 

I covered the hole with sand. Lauren smoothed it out so you couldn’t tell 
the sand had been dug up. 

“Whew,” I groaned, wiping the sweat from my face. “I’m glad that’s over. 
Let’s go inside and cool off.” 

I put away the shovel. Then Nicole, Lauren, and I got ourselves some cold 
apple juice and collapsed in front of the TV. 

A short while later, we heard Dad’s car pull into the driveway. 

“Uh-oh,” Lauren gasped. “I think I’d better go home now. See you guys 
later.” She hurried out the back door. “Good luck!” she called. The door 
slammed behind her. 

I gave Nicole a nervous glance. “How angry will Dad be? He finds an 
amazing, rare creature, brings it home—we let it loose, and it runs away. That’s 
not so bad —is it?” 

Nicole shuddered. “Maybe if we tell him the whole story, he’ll be so glad 
we’re not hurt that he won’t be angry.” 

“Uh-huh. Yeah. Maybe.” 

The front door swung open. “Hey, kids!” Dad called. “I’m home! How’s 
our snowman doing?” 



29 


We ate supper early that evening. Things were pretty quiet around the dinner 
table. 

Tm glad you kids are safe and sound,” Dad said for the fifth time. “That’s 
what counts.” 

“Yeah,” Nicole said, chewing her pizza. 

“Uh-huh,” I added quietly. I usually had three slices. Tonight I could barely 
manage one. And I left the crust on the plate. 

Poor Dad. He was trying so hard not to get upset about losing the 
Abominable Snowman. But Nicole and I knew how bad he felt. 

Dad dropped his half-eaten slice of pizza on his plate. “I’ll tell the Museum 
of Natural History that they’ll have to make do with the photographs.” 

“Photographs are better than nothing,” I said. 

“Better than nothing? Are you crazy?” Nicole cried. “Those pictures are 
going to amaze the whole world!” 

Dad perked up. “That’s true. I mentioned them to some TV producers. They 
went wild.” 

He stood and carried his plate to the sink. “I think I’ll go out to the 
darkroom and develop that film right now. These pictures are going to cheer me 
up. I mean, they’re historic. Historic!” 

I was glad to see Dad snap out of his disappointment. Nicole and I followed 
him, eager to see the photos. 

We sat quietly under the red light while Dad developed the negatives. At 
last he pulled the first set of contact sheets out of the chemical baths. 

Nicole and I leaned close to see the pictures. 

“Huh?” Dad uttered an astonished cry. 

Snow. Nothing but snow. Ten pictures of snow. 

“That’s strange,” Dad choked out. “I don’t remember taking those shots.” 

Nicole flashed me an evil stare. I knew what she was thinking. 

I held my hands up innocently. “I’m not playing any tricks. I swear!” 

“You’d better not be, Jordan,” Dad warned sternly. “I’m in no mood for 
kidding around.” 

Dad turned back to the chemical trays and developed another set of photos. 



As he pulled them up, dripping wet, we all squinted at them. 

More snow. Nothing but snow. 

“This can’t be happening!” Dad screamed. “The Abominable Snowman— 
he should be standing right there!” He pointed. 

His hands shook as he grabbed the rest of the negatives and held them up to 
the red light. “The tundra shots came out fine,” he declared. “The dogs, the sled, 
the elk herd—all there. All perfect. All of them. But the shots in the monster’s 
cave—” 

His voice trailed off. He shook his head sadly. “I don’t get it. I just don’t get 
it. How could this be? Not a single shot of the creature. Not one.” 

I sighed. I felt so bad for Dad. I felt so bad for all three of us. 

No Abominable Snowman. No photos of the Abominable Snowman. 

It was almost as if he never existed. As if the whole thing never happened. 

Nicole and I left Dad in the darkroom to finish his work. 

We trudged around the house to the front. Nicole groaned and grabbed my 
arm. “Oh, no! Look!” 

Across the street in the vacant lot, I saw the Miller twins kneeling down, 
digging in the sand. 

“They’re digging up the snowballs!” I gasped. 

“Those creeps!” Nicole growled. “They must have been spying on us while 
we buried them.” 

“We’ve got to stop them!” I cried. 

We hurried across the street, running full speed. 

I saw Kyle rip open the garbage bag—and pull out one of the snowballs. 

He swung back his arm and aimed at Kara. 

“No—Kyle! Stop!” I screamed. “Don’t throw it! Stop! Don’t throw it, 
Kyle!” 

THWOCK. 

